Data, you can turn it all the way up to a hundred if you increase it slowly enough. Give my nervous system chance to adjust.
That is theoretically true, but even at this level of input you are already experiencing dangerous neural feedback.
There are over three hundred people on board the Hera, Data. You and I are the only chance they've got.
I will increase the gain incrementally as you descend.
It's working.
When we are ready to disconnect the interface, we must allow enough time to lower the input levels, otherwise your nervous system will go into shock from the sudden drop in input.
Once I initiate the warp cascade we can start dropping the gain.
Understood.
We'll be in sensor range of the Hera within a few minutes. Mom, I'm really sorry I didn't by to see you a few weeks ago.
You were too busy with work.
Yeah, well, I'm sorry. It won't happen again.
Captain, the Raman is descending toward the planet.
Geordi.
We are at ninety percent of tolerance. My calculations show you will reach one hundred percent of tolerance before you are in range of the Hera.
Then we're going to have to go beyond tolerance.
That would not be advisable. You must cease your descent.
No, Geordi, don't, please.
Data, I'm taking this ship down. Now, if you don't boost the gain past tolerance levels, I'll lose the interface when we go out of range and my system will go into shock.
Geordi, you are putting me in a difficult position. Please, cease your descent.
I won't do it, Data. You're going to have to increase the tolerance.
Disengaging safety systems. Going to full tolerance levels, now.
Thank you, Data.
We're getting close.
Thank God.
Commander La Forge.
Yes, Captain?
Stop your descent. Prepare to disengage the interface.
Sorry, Captain, but I can't do that.
Damn it, Geordi, you're going to kill yourself.
If I come back now, my mother and her entire crew will die.
I'm scanning for your ship. I'm not getting anything.
We're still too far away.
No, not really. I should be picking something up by now. I'm not finding anything. There's no warp funnel, no ship. There's nothing there.
Doctor, report.
His neural synapses are overloading. He can't survive this.
Geordi, what's happening to you?
Reverse tractor beam.
Reversing tractor beam.
What are you?
You're killing us. We must go down.
Geordi?
What's happening? Report.
You're, you're trapped?
Is there any way that we can disconnect him?
If we take him off too abruptly, he'll go into neural shock.
Caught on the ship?
Reduce the input gradually, and still get him out before it's too late.
Are you saying that you killed the Raman's crew?
Perhaps we could deceive his neural receptors.
Deceive them?
By feeding them the sensory information recorded from his earlier experiences with the probe.
We could disconnect the interface and still maintain the input levels.
We could then lower them in a controlled manner.
What do you want?
Like a decompression tank? Let's try it.
Then, it was an accident? Captain, I have to take the ship into the lower atmosphere.
Explain.
As I understand it, when the Raman got close to the planet it accidentally picked up some lifeforms that live in the lower atmosphere.
Subspace beings of some kind. Intelligent. When the ship went back into a higher orbit, the beings were trapped.
How do you know all this?
One of them can communicate with me.
It must have read my thoughts through the probe interface and took the form of my mother to try to talk me into taking the ship closer to the surface.
Are these beings
Responsible for the death of the Raman's crew?
Yes, but I don't think it was on purpose. They probably tried communicating with them the same way they're communicating with me, by directly accessing their thoughts. It must've been fatal to the crew. I guess the interface is what protected me.
I have to take them back, Captain. They can't survive so far up in the atmosphere. I'll turn the ship around and come back as soon as I'm
Geordi, what's happening?
The atmosphere is getting more turbulent. It's overloading the systems.
I'm having difficulty keeping the shields up.
Geordi. We're safe now. Goodbye.
I'm losing power.
Total shield failure in eight seconds.
Can we switch the input?
Almost.
Shields are failing!
Switching inputs.
Is it working?
His vital signs are stabilising. He's going to make it.
Captain's log, supplemental. We have succeeded in disengaging Mister La Forge from the interface and are en route to Starbase four nine five.
You disobeyed my direct order. You put yourself in grave danger. I am not happy.
Yes, sir. I take complete responsibility. Data was only
I will deal with Mister Data at another time. Meanwhile, I will have to write this incident into your permanent record.
Yes, sir.
Dismissed. Geordi? I'm very sorry that you didn't find your mother.
Thank you, sir. You know, it was funny. When I was down there, it was so real. I felt like I had a chance to say goodbye.
Ambassador Odan, Doctor Crusher. I was just on my way to speak to you.
Hello, Data.
I have completed my study on the atmospheric variations which have occurred on the moon since the new technology was implemented.
Thank you, Commander. That will be most helpful in my efforts to mediate the quarrel.
I could go over it with you now. It would not require more than two hours.
We do appreciate that, Data, but the Ambassador and I have set aside this time to analyse the incidence of the lung disease on the moon's inhabitants.
Then it is perfect timing, Doctor. What better occasion to integrate my results into your study?
Now that I think about it, you're absolutely right, Commander. Unfortunately, I'm not feeling very well. Perhaps Doctor Crusher could get you started inputting your information. I myself must return to my quarters.
Ambassador, are you still having those awful headaches? I'd better bring you a hypospray to take care of it.
I would be most grateful.
Okay.
Put a cold cloth on your forehead, Ambassador. I'll do my best to be with you shortly.
I'll set you up at the medical monitor, Data. It'll take you a while to input the figures, won't it?
At least an hour, but I do not believe much time can be saved by exhibiting such haste now.
Data, there are times when every second does count.
Somehow, I had an unnatural fear that Data was going to barge in and ask to discuss the peripheral effects of magnetospheric energy taps.
Well if I don't get back soon and take a look at his projections, he just might come looking for me.
Do you know, when I first met the formidable Doctor Beverly, what, ten days ago? I thought to myself, this woman is ice through to her bones. Who would have ever guessed that instead of ice, there is fire.
Odan.
Stay here, don't go.
Odan, are we? Is this interfering with your work on the Peliar Zel problems?
Fortunately, I've done about as much as I can until we get there. Because I just can't seem to keep my mind on my work right now.
Odan, I have to go.
Promise me we'll be together tonight.
I promise.
Then you may go, Doctor Beverly.
It's just Beverly.
Not just Beverly. It's Beverly's smile, it's her kindness, her beauty within and without. So much more than just Beverly.
Picard to Ambassador Odan.
Yes, Captain? This is Odan.
The Federation representative from Peliar Zel has come on board. Would you care to meet us in the Observation Lounge?
I'll be right there, Captain.
If the news were encouraging, I assume you would not be here.
I'm afraid you're correct, Captain. The situation's growing progressively worse.
Where've you been?
With a patient. Minor emergency.
Ambassador Odan, this is Governor Leka Trion of Peliar Zel.
Ambassador. thank you for coming. I knew your father. His efforts helped keep our people at peace for several generations.
I would hope to serve you as well as he.
Governor. Ambassador.
I hope Doctor Crusher was able to help you with your headache.
Thank you. Actually, she was.
Governor Leka has intercepted us before we reach her planet in order to update us on the situation.
The people on our moons have been in discord ever since they migrated from our planet five centuries ago. To us on the planet They're like two squabbling children. We try to help settle their arguments by not taking sides, but this time we are at a loss.
I've been studying the information you sent. If I understand correctly, the people of Alpha moon have found a way to tap directly into the magnetic field of your planet, and now rely exclusively on that energy source.
Yes, but the Beta moon is now suffering some environmental damage as a result.
My design models suggest that Beta will eventually experience rising temperatures, erratic tide surges and in general the beginnings of global warming.
The impact on the health of the Betan people is clear. There will be profound medical repercussions.
Alpha is unwilling to give up its new-found energy source. Beta accuses them of intentionally courting genocide. Our efforts to reach a compromise have failed. And now, we have received intelligence that both sides are arming for war. If that happens the people of my planet will begin to take sides, and the outcome can only be disastrous.
We will be in orbit around Peliar Zel within six hours. If you could arrange for the representatives of Alpha and Beta to be there, then Ambassador Odan could beam directly down to the planet.
Excuse me, Captain. I prefer to shuttle to the surface.
I would not recommend it. There are many radical factions involved in this dispute. It would be difficult to guarantee your safety.
I'm sure I'm not the first who has expressed discomfort at the idea of molecular transport. Thank you, but I prefer to remain intact. I'll shuttle down.
As you wish.
Counsellor, what is it?
It's Ambassador Odan. I continually feel fluctuations of emotion from him.
Perhaps it's perfectly normal among the Trill.
It could be. We know so very little about them.
Yes. Quite.
Hi, Deanna.
Hi. Is that the colgonite astringent you have on your eyes?
Yes. I guess so.
I've never tried it.
Someone just put it on me.
I didn't know you even came in here.
I don't. At least, not very often.
But it feels good to indulge yourself sometimes.
I guess so.
Especially when you haven't done so in a while.
What is that supposed to mean?
Beverly, you're in love.
Sometimes I wish you weren't so empathic
I don't really think it's really a secret.
It isn't?
You've been glowing.
Oh. Must be the astringent. What?
Nothing.
Oh, yes, there is. What is it?
It's just something I sense in Odan.
What? What do you sense?
It's just, how well do you really know him?
I feel I know him better than I've known anyone in my life. Am I being foolish? I don't think so. And yet, I've only known him for a couple of weeks. Of course, that could be infatuation, but I am a grown up and I know the difference between love and infatuation. All I know is, I haven't felt this way for a long time.
And you like it.
I like it.
Come.
You wanted to see me, Captain?
Yes, Ambassador. Please, sit down. We have entered orbit. We shall be transporting you to the planet in a few minutes.
I am ready, Captain.
How will you proceed when you're there?
Oh, I cannot answer that. I never know until I am into the situation, meet the people involved. I work very much by instinct, not by pre-arranged plan.
It seems to work well for you.
Well, I do like to go into a situation as well-informed as possible, and I must say that your staff has been quite helpful in briefing me on the problems down here. Particularly Doctor Crusher.
My staff is quite capable. I'm glad they've been useful.
Your Doctor Beverly is an extraordinary person, both as a scientist and as a woman.
Yes, I'm sure that's true. Well, shall we make our way to the shuttlebay?
Captain, you know her better than I. Do you have any idea how committed she is to remaining with Starfleet?
I wouldn't presume to speak for her.
Oh no, of course not. I just thought, well, you've known her so much long than I.
Ensign Taggart to Captain Picard.
Yes, Ensign.
The shuttle is ready to transport the Ambassador.
Very well.
I'll find my own way, Captain. I hope to return with good news.
Commander Riker has asked to pilot you himself, Ambassador.
I am honoured.
I don't know when I'll be back.
I know. Have a safe trip.
I will stay safe, Doctor Beverly. I have good reason to return. I've researched Earth customs. This flower is given to express love.
Yes, it is.
Initiate shuttle preflight sequence.
Preflight underway. Counting to clearance.
Shuttle has cleared the bay door.
Commander Riker, you will be out of shield range in five seconds.
Acknowledged
Lieutenant. We'll be entering the upper ionosphere in two minutes and twenty seconds.
Sir, an unidentified ship is emerging from the limb of the moon.
Hail the vessel.
I have visual contact. I don't recognise it.
It claims to be an escort vessel from the Beta moon.
There was no mention of an escort. Request a security clearance code.
They do not answer, sir.
Commander Riker, prepare to return to the shuttlebay.
Acknowledged.
Captain, they are loading its phaser banks.
Increasing power to the shields.
Coming about.
Engage tractor beam. Report, Number One.
We've lost port thrusters
And both backup stabilisers. I'm losing control.
We're bringing you in.
Captain, the shuttle hull has been weakened. We're breaking up. You can't tow us. You'd better beam us directly on board.
No, don't do it.
I can't stabilise the shuttle.
If you transport me, it will kill me. Please.
Number One we're ready to beam you aboard.
Belay that order, Captain. I'll bring her in manually.
Advise Doctor Crusher we have a medical emergency.
He's in shock, he's lost a lot of blood, but that still doesn't explain these readings. Eosinophilia in the cerebrospinal fluid at forty six percent.
Sedimentation rate is twenty nine, but his lymphocytes are still intact.
It's as though there's a parasite at work. Odan, Odan. I need to do exploratory surgery. You may have a parasitic infection.
You must not.
But you won't survive.
What is that?
Beverly, that is me.
What?
This body is just a host. I am that parasite. That is what must survive. It has always been this way. The Trill are a joined species. A host and a symbiont, and in this fashion we have survived for millennia.
You're dying. What can I do?
The host body is dying. You must contact the Trill quickly. Tell them I need another host. They will send a replacement. I know this is difficult to accept, but I beg you, Doctor Beverly, help me. This mission must be completed.
Odan's host body died of the injuries just over an hour ago. But the symbiont being, Odan, is still alive. Odan is the one who negotiated the last treaty, but the man everyone thought was his father was just another host body.
And the reason Odan refused the transporter?
It would have damaged the symbiont.
We've contacted the Trill. Another host will be here in forty hours.
I've placed Odan in stasis. He can survive another hour, maybe two, but not beyond that.
Would it be possible for me to serve as a temporary carrier?
No, Data. The relationship requires a biological being.
We are at a desperate impasse in the Peliar system. The attack on the shuttlecraft has inflamed the dispute.
Who was responsible?
No one will admit anything. Each side accuses the other and the threats are mounting. We need Odan.
Doctor, could a human host carry him?
I believe so. From Odan's description of the process it should be possible. But I don't have
Then I volunteer.
There's been no precedent for a human host. I couldn't guarantee what might happen.
The risk is too great, Commander.
Weigh it against the prospect of war.
It's your choice, Will.
Let's get to it.
I've given you a local anaesthetic. You must be conscious during the implantation. Drugs might damage the symbiont.
I understand.
Laser scalpel.
How do you feel? Is there pain?
No, just some strange sensations.
Vital signs?
Heart rate one hundred ten. Blood pressure ninety over forty.
I can't close yet, The assimilation's not complete.
Pulse one thirty and climbing. EEG is erratic.
He's going to start fibrillating. Two hundred milligrams of metrazene.
Yes, Doctor.
Hang on, Will.
We've got incorporation, Doctor.
I'm closing.
Brain waves are still irregular.
The metrazene should have stabilised him. I'll give it ten seconds more before we go in again.
Here we go. EEG approaching regular.
Blood pressure levelling off.
That's better. Signs are returning to normal. Will, it's Beverly. Can you hear me?
Hello.
You're going to be all right. How do you feel?
I'm fine. You look a little tired, Doctor Beverly.
I know this must be disturbing, Governor, but you must convince the inhabitants of the moons that I am Odan. I have his skills, his thoughts, his memories.
They will perceive you as a Starfleet officer, perhaps with your own agenda.
The man they knew as my father, the man who stands before them, both are merely hosts. It is your task to help them understand.
I will try. I cannot promise they will listen. They are more factionalised than ever. Listening is a skill which seems to have evaporated with the heat of argument.
Speak softly, Governor. Those who cannot hear an angry shout may strain to hear a whisper.
I will do what I can.
Well done. Mister Worf, will you escort the Ambassador to his quarters.
I'm just a little dizzy. I'll be fine. I just need to lie down.
Picard to Doctor Crusher.
Yes, Captain?
Doctor, the Ambassador is not well. Will you please attend to him in his quarters.
Right away, sir.
White cell count is elevated, six tenths of a degree of temperature. But no sign of rejection.
That's good.
You look awfully pale.
Just a little weak and light-headed.
Cerebral blood flow looks normal. I'll leave you a metabolic booster. Use it if the symptoms get worse.
Beverly.
Beyond that, I don't know what to do. This is all new to me.
It is new to me as well. Please, don't go. We've got to talk about this.
I don't know what to say.
Nor do I, but I know that this silence will injure us.
Well maybe you should have thought about that sooner. Maybe you should have told me what you were. It didn't seem to bother you to remain silent yesterday.
It never occurred to me. This is what I am. Did you ever tell me that you are only a single being? Of course not. That was normal to you.
I don't know who you are.
You must understand, whoever I seem to be, I am Odan, who loved you. That has not changed. I still love you. I can't help that. If this causes you pain, I will suppress it, I will keep my distance. Doctor Beverly, I would never hurt you.
May I join you?
You know, Deanna, the first man I ever loved unconditionally was named Stefan. He was a soccer player, and I would watch him as he would race down the field and I thought my heart would stop because he was so beautiful. We married and had three children. Twin boys, Andrew and Alexander, and then later a little girl, Jennifer. Stefan became an artist, very famous. He created huge, breathtaking, metal sculptures. He came to adore me as much as I worshipped him. In my daydreams at least. Stefan was eleven and I was eight. He never even knew I existed. Oh, Deanna, I loved Odan. I'm sure of it. I had no doubts, no fears, but what it was I loved? His eyes? His hands? His mouth? They're gone. If that was all it was, I should mourn him and go on. But it was more than that. I felt completely free with him. Unguarded. At ease with myself. There were so many things that made him special to me. Where are they? Are they still here, alive in Will Riker? I look at Will and I see someone I've known for years. A kind of brother. But inside, is he really Odan? Help me, please.
What do your feelings tell you?
I feel his pull. It's very powerful. I wish he'd never come on this ship.
Don't wish that, Beverly. You can't be open to love if you don't risk pain.
I don't care. I'd give anything not to feel the way I do now. He's here, isn't he?
Look at him.
I don't want to look at him. Talk to me. Just keep talking to me.
The first man I ever loved was my father. He was strong and tall. He carried me when the ground was muddy. He chased away the monsters that hid under my bed at night. And he sang to me, and kept me safe. And he went away. What I wouldn't give to hear those songs again. To feel his arms protect me. I never will, but I can still feel his warmth and his love as though he were here with me. If you can feel those things from the man we know as Will Riker, accept them. Accept the love.
Captain's log, stardate 44823.8. Representatives of the two moons of Peliar Zel have agreed to come on board to meet the new Ambassador Odan.
White count is elevated. It's getting higher and higher every time I read it. Are you in pain?
Not much.
Ambassador, we can stall the representatives.
They would see that as deception. I must meet with them.
But surely, to present yourself in this condition is not going to help our cause.
I promise you, Captain, they will never know that I am ill.
Captain, the emissaries.
May I present Kalin Trose of Alpha Moon, and Lathal Bine of Beta Moon.
Thank you for receiving us, Captain.
Is this Ambassador Odan?
Lathal Bine. It was your aunt who represented Beta thirty years ago.
That is correct.
She was a formidable woman. I had the utmost respect for her.
And who was it who spoke for Alpha so long ago?
That was you, of course, Kalin Trose. Then you were a young man, bristling with passion and zeal, yet wise enough to understand that your people needed peace to ensure their future.
And how did you manage to achieve a compromise between that young man and the iron willed woman of Beta Moon?
They agreed to trade places for a week, to understand each other's situation with more informed eyes. After that an agreement came swiftly.
Nothing that you have said is beyond what a school child could learn in a history book.
What is not commonly known that during those negotiations, you, Kalin Trose, quelled a plot by a radical from your moon who was attempting to assassinate the Beta delegate.
It is true.
Perhaps he was wiser in his youth than he is now. Odan, you must convince him to stop.
Will you accept me? Will you allow me to work with you?
Yes.
And Alpha moon?
I will consider it, but I must consult others.
This is a typical tactic. He is an obstructionist. You can see that.
Kalin Trose, you may confer with your people, but we must have your answer within eight hours.
You shall have it.
His vital functions are overworked. His immune system is under attack. I can only guess that he's suffering from classic rejection syndrome.
Is there any treatment you can give him?
I can administer an immunosuppressant. That could help relieve the symptoms but it Can't correct the underlying cause. There is a foreign organism in his body. Medical school didn't exactly prepare me for situations like this.
You're doing all you can.
Don't worry about me, Captain. I'm fine.
Ambassador, when you feel up to it, would you join me in my Ready room?
Of course.
I'm giving you something that should help with the pain. At least for a little while.
The pain's gone. Thank you.
Please don't.
Please let me touch you, just for a moment.
No. Please.
It was a fast decision, which we must take as positive. The Alphan representative has agreed, however reluctantly. to let you mediate the dispute.
I knew they would. They are reasonable people, they're just trapped in their own anger.
I have no doubt, however, that they will bolt if something goes wrong in the discussion.
Then it's my job to see nothing goes wrong. Did I said something wrong, Captain Picard?
No, it's just that for a moment you sounded more like Will Riker. We have received information that the new host will arrive in eighteen hours. Will you be all right until then?
The medication Doctor Beverly gave me has helped. I will find a way to keep going.
Lemon tea.
Computer, location of Doctor Beverly Crusher.
Doctor Crusher is in her quarters.
Can you make balso tonic?
There is no formula on record. Please supply a molecular structure.
Never mind.
Come in.
I thought I should see how you were doing. If you needed another hypospray?
I don't think so. The symptoms haven't returned.
Oh. Well, that's good.
Yes.
Tomorrow's an important day. Do you feel ready for it?
I'll be fine. I've been preparing.
That's good.
Yes.
I'll check your vital signs in the morning before the representatives get here.
I don't want them knowing I'm taking any medication.
Maybe you could schedule a series of breaks.
That's good.
Yes.
Beverly, I want you. If you're going to leave, you'd better go right now.
I'm not leaving.
Captain's log, stardate 44824.4. Governor Leka and the representatives of the two moons are ready to transport on board. We have learned that they each have troops massed and are ready for combat if this final effort at peace is not successful.
White count is back up, temperature is elevated. The effects of the medication are wearing off faster every time. I'll administer one now and hope that it will hold for an hour or two.
No, no more.
Ambassador, it's clear you're in pain. You can't get through the next hours without help.
I must.
Are the injections damaging to the host's body, Riker's body?
Yes. We can't put him through any further risk.
But how can you function, conduct the meeting?
I'll manage.
We'll respect your wishes.
One more thing. I will conduct the mediations today, but at the end of today, regardless of the outcome, I must be removed from Riker's body. Even if the new host has not arrived.
But you wouldn't survive.
Riker will not survive if I am removed. He has done enough. Your word.
Very well.
Worf to Captain Picard.
Yes, Mister Worf?
The Governor and the two representatives have returned. I will escort them to the Observation Lounge.
Thank you.
I'll stand by with the medication, just in case. The pain may become so intense that I'll have to
Beverly. Whatever else I may be to you, I am your friend. I can only imagine what you're going through, and I want you to know I'm here.
Jean-Luc.
Computer, what is the time?
Fifteen thirty five hours.
They've been in there for almost six hours.
Captain, I am receiving a message from the ship carrying the Trill host.
Are they here, Worf?
No, they are experiencing difficulty. They do not anticipate their arrival for another nine hours.
Nine hours.
It was worth it.
Ambassador!
They will not go to war.
Mister Worf, see that the representatives are safely transported off the ship. Ensign, set a course to intercept with the Trill ship. Prepare to go to warp nine.
Sir, it could take more than two hours to reach the vessel.
I must remove him. I gave my word.
Will is going to be all right. His vital signs have stabilised and he's sleeping now.
How is Odan?
I've placed him in stasis. He's fine for the moment.
You need some rest, Doctor.
No. If Odan is to survive, he needs to be implanted in the new host as soon as he arrives. I'll wait here.
It'll be some time.
I know.
Doctor.
Is the Trill host here?
Yes.
Good. Bring him in.
Doctor?
I am Kareel. I am to become host to Odan.
The operation to implant Odan into the new host was completed at nineteen hundred hours and appears to have been successful. There were no difficulties in assimilation.
Doctor Beverly, could we talk for a moment?
You should be sleeping. You need to rest.
I've never felt better, except once or twice. My poor Beverly. This has been so hard for you. I want to thank you for your caring, for your standing by me.
I congratulate you. You averted a war that would have cost many lives.
Yes. It seems as though everything has turned out for the best. And yes, I am still Odan, and I still love you. I cannot imagine that ever changing.
I am glad that you're all right.
Is there to be nothing more?
Perhaps it is a human failing, but we are not accustomed to these kinds of changes. I can't keep up. How long will you have this host? What would the next one be? I can't live with that kind of uncertainty. Perhaps, someday, our ability to love won't be so limited.
I understand.
Odan, I do love you. Please remember that.
I will never forget you.
Send a message to Commander Data and inform him of our delay.
Aye, sir.
Deanna, welcome back.
Thank you. I was just reporting in. I didn't expect to find anyone up except Data.
Data's away on assignment. A Federation deep space probe went off course and crashed on Barkon Four. Some of the material in the casing was radioactive, so Data was sent to recover it before it could contaminate the biosphere.
Isn't Barkon Four inhabited?
Yes, it's a pre-industrial society, but the probe crashed over a hundred kilometres from the nearest settlement so Data shouldn't have any contact with the Barkonians. So, how was the reunion?
Fine. It was good to see some old friends. I'd lost touch with most of them. It's interesting to see the different paths some of their lives have taken. Beverly, you don't usually stand a watch on the Bridge even when Data's not here.
I volunteered tonight. I like to put in a little Bridge time now and then, stay on top of operations, tactical procedures. The truth is, I like it. It's not every doctor who gets to command a starship, even if it is the night shift.
May I ask you a personal question? Why did you decide to become a Commander? I mean, you didn't need the rank in order to be Chief Medical Officer, so why put yourself through all the extra work?
Oh, I don't know. I never even thought about my rank for a long time. It seemed pretty trivial compared to being a doctor. But then, about eight years ago, I started to feel like I wanted to stretch myself a little.
Commander, there's no response from Commander Data to our signal.
Continue sending him updates on our schedule.
Aye, sir.
Is something wrong?
No. I wanted to let Data know there'd be a delay in picking him up for a few of days. We have orders to rendezvous with the Lexington and take some medical supplies to the Taranko Colony.
But he's not responding.
Geordi said that the radiation from the probe might interfere with communications. I just thought I'd try anyway.
So when you return from school tonight, I'll be meeting with the village elders.
Again?
Gia.
I know, I know. You're the town magistrate and you have a lot of work to do, but it always seems like you're always in some meeting or
Gia, go home. Now. Who are you? What do you want?
Who are you? What do you want?
What's wrong with you?
What's wrong with you?
There's nothing wrong with me. Who are you? What is your name? Can you understand me? My name is Garvin.
My name is Garvin?
I thought I told you to go home.
I know.
I do not know my name.
What?
You asked if I knew my name. I do not.
Well at least you seem to be understanding a little more.
Yes. It is becoming easier.
Ask him where he's from, father.
Gia, go on to school. I'll deal with the stranger.
Yes, Father. Goodbye.
Goodbye.
Your eyes and skin look so strange. Your clothes, you look like you've been in some kind of accident.
I do not remember being in an accident.
What do you remember?
I walked here from the mountains.
The mountains? The mountains are over two hundred seltons from here.
I have a clear memory of my journey.
What do you remember before that?
I have no prior memory.
Do you know what that is?
No.
May I? May I have it?
Yes.
There might be something in here that can tell us who you are.
I wonder what these markings mean.
Radioactive.
What?
That is what is written on the container.
You can read this language?
Evidently.
Radioactive. What does that mean?
I do not know. Perhaps it is my name.
I've never heard a name like that. You must come from a very distant place.
Is that supposed to be a question?
Because if you're asking me if I liked what you were playing, then the answer is yes.
You know, this is a much better way of communicating for you. It's far less confusing than the way you normally speak.
I knew I could count on my Imzadi, the ship's Counsellor to boost my self-image.
I'm glad to be of service.
Did you come here for something in particular, or just general Riker bashing?
Actually I wanted to ask your opinion about something. I've been thinking about taking the Bridge Officer's test and becoming a full Commander.
What brought this up?
A lot of things. Working on the personnel review last month, talking with Beverly about her experiences, going to my class reunion.
Ah, the class reunion. You saw a few old friends who had already taken the test?
All right, I admit it was a catalyst. But I can honestly say that I've been thinking about this off and on over the past two years.
Why the past two years?
Do you remember when the Enterprise hit that quantum filament and I was in command on the Bridge?
I do.
Well, when that happened, I was overwhelmed. But when it was over I realised that a part of me missed it. Not the actual disaster, but the experience of being in command. I felt like I was exploring a whole new side of myself. Not that I want to give up counselling by any means, but I really would like to stretch myself a little.
Deanna, if you take the Bridge Officer's test, you'll have my complete support. But as First Officer, I'll be the one judging your performance, and you should know I am a pretty tough judge.
And I'm a pretty good student.
We'll start tomorrow morning, oh eight hundred hours.
Remarkable set of teeth. Breath smells like, well, it doesn't have any smell actually. You can close your mouth. Let's see. Heartbeat sounds a little odd, but seems very regular. Skin feels clammy, but you say you feel fine?
That is correct.
No headaches, palpitations, sluggishness, indigestion?
No. But I cannot have indigestion since I have not eaten.
Ah. Malnutrition. You should try to eat something that will build strength and return your vitality. Lots of meat, butter, cheese, that should be a start.
What about his eyes and his skin? They're so odd.
Quite so, quite so. I'm sure my grandmother would have called our friend here a demon or spirit or some kind of monster. But current scientific methodology allows us to dismiss such ridiculous superstitions and concentrate on scientific reality.
Then what do you believe I am?
You are an ice man.
Ice man?
Yes. You probably come from a race of people who lived in the snow and ice of the Vellorian mountains. Your skin and eye colouration are a result of prolonged exposure to harsh winter conditions.
Then I am not ill?
Aside from your memory loss, you do not seem to have any symptoms of any illness that I am familiar with. No. You are an ice man. Now, get something to eat and a good night's rest, and I will come back tomorrow to see if your memory has begun to return.
Thank you.
Hello, Gia.
Hello.
What did Talur say about him? Is he sick?
Not exactly. She said he's lost his memory, but seems to be fine otherwise. Talur thinks he's from a race that lives in the mountains.
I am an ice man.
We'll have to call you something besides Ice man until your memory returns. What was the word on the container?
Radioactive.
Mister Radioactive?
I don't like that name. Let's call him Jayden.
What do you think of that?
Jayden. That is acceptable.
Right now, we need to clean him up and get him something decent to wear. Run upstairs and get some of my old clothes for him.
Yes, Father.
I wonder if Skoran can tell us something about this metal of yours.
You, Ice man, where'd you find this?
I do not know.
I told you, he's lost his memory and we're calling him Jayden for now.
Jayden, huh? The metal is slightly warm.
All the fragments are like that.
It's obviously been tempered and milled. The lustrous quality of the metal is so pure. This wasn't made in any forge I've ever seen. Will you sell them?
You want them?
The metal's malleable enough to make some jewellry.
They belong to Jayden. Do you want to sell them? You're going to need money.
You may be right. But I do not wish to sell all the fragments. They may provide a clue to my identity.
I'll give you twenty doraks for half the lot.
Agreed.
My leg! My leg! Get it off! Get it off!
We need a lever.
It'll be all right. Don't struggle. It will only
Jayden, put it down.
I believe the support structure on the anvil collapsed because some of the wood had rotted. Did I do something wrong, Garvin?
No, just unexpected.
It's perfectly understandable. Your people probably all have great strength. It will allow them to fight off the ferocious creatures that live in the Vellorian Mountains.
You have told me no one from the village has ever been to the Vellorian Mountains. How can you be certain there are ferocious creatures there?
It's a well known fact.
But no one has actually seen one?
Well, not to my knowledge, but
Father, are you all right?
I've been tired since this afternoon. I'm sure it's nothing.
You feel slightly warm. Some fresh air and a brisk walk will do you good.
That sounds like a good idea. I'll be back soon.
You didn't like it?
I neither liked it nor disliked it. I simply had no appetite.
Father's cooking isn't as good as mother's. He tries, though.
Where is your mother?
She died about a year ago. Father says she went to a beautiful place where everything is peaceful and everyone loves each other, and no one ever gets sick. Do you think there's really a place like that?
Yes. I do.
We just lost contact with everything above deck twenty one, including the Bridge.
There is something wrong with one of the antimatter containment units. The magnetic field is starting to fluctuate.
Switch to auxiliary control.
Auxiliary control is not online. We are starting to lose containment on antimatter storage unit three.
All right. Switch the EM power inverter to the lateral. No, wait. Use the neodyne relay.
Commander, the neodyne relay isn't holding. Containment failure in ten seconds.
Computer, emergency procedure. Eject antimatter storage unit three. Authorisation, Troi omega omega three one.
Unable to comply. All power to ejection systems has been terminated and cannot be restored.
Commander, the unit's beginning to o
Congratulations. You just destroyed the Enterprise.
Thank you for the encouragement.
Don't feel bad. You passed everything else. Diplomatic law, first contact procedures, Bridge operations. The Engineering qualification's one of the toughest parts of the test.
So what did I do wrong?
I'm afraid I can't tell you that.
Why not? What kind of a test is this?
It's the kind of a test that you'll have to take again if you want to be a Bridge Officer. Only next time, the problem won't be so easy, so I suggest you study up on your emergency procedures.
Well how do I know what to study if you won't tell me what I did wrong?
I don't know. I'm afraid I can't tell you that either.
Rock, fire, sky, and water are the basic elements of the universe. They can be found in every object, every person, every animal, everything. The rock in this wood can be felt by its weight and by its hardness. If we expose the wood to flame, we can encourage the fire within the wood to show itself. We can also see smoke, which is a part of the sky. The water in wood is difficult to see. Sometimes the elements are buried deep within the objects, but the four elements are always there.  Yes, Jayden?
I do not believe that is correct.
Oh?
I believe you are reasoning by analogy, classifying objects and phenomena according to superficial observation rather than empirical evidence. Wood, for example, does not contain fire simply because it is combustible, nor does it contain rock simply because it is heavy. Wood, like any complex organic form, is composed of thousands of different chemical compounds, none of which is fire.
That will be enough for now, Jayden. As I told you earlier, our friend Jayden here has lost much of his memory, so I wouldn't put too much faith in any of his ideas. Now that will be all for today. I will see you tomorrow. Be sure to practice your spelling and arithmetic tonight.
Are you all right?
Yes. But I do not agree with Talur's assessment. Although I do have gaps in my memory, I know that fire is not an element.
That is not what you promised me!
You're getting old, Garvin. I offered you fifteen for the metal and I've given it to you. No more.
We agreed on twenty.
Garvin is correct. You agreed on twenty.
Stay out of this, Ice man. Your memory is not very reliable.
Father! Father, what's wrong?
I don't know I feel very weak suddenly.
You have got a fever. We should get him home.
What's wrong with him?
I suspect he  I don't know. I've never encountered anything like this before. These lesions look like burn marks. The fluids of his body have overheated. That would explain the fever and the burning skin. Keep him cool, let plenty of fresh air into the house, and I want you to give him these herbs. That will bring his fluidic temperature down and allow this to pass.
I understand.
With an increased focal length and an achromatic objective lens, this instrument will have a higher effective magnification.
I will come back tomorrow and check on you.
Thank you.
Garvin, with your permission, I would like to begin my own investigation regarding the cause of your illness.
Go ahead.
Gia, I would like you to accompany me to the village. I will need some supplies.
What are you going to do with all this?
I will use these materials to make the laboratory equipment I need to research your father's illness.
Do you think you can help him?
I do not know. First I must isolate the cause of the illness.
There he is! It's his fault! None of us were sick before he came to the village!
True.
Am I to understand that Garvin's illness has spread?
That's right. And you're the cause.
That's not true!
Gia, I think we should leave.
That's it. Leave. Get out of here. Go back where you came from!
Jayden what are you doing?
I am studying skin samples from Gia and Garvin in an attempt to isolate the cause of the illness.
Gia?
Yes. She is also beginning to show signs of the illness.
What is that?
It is a magnifying device based on your hand-held instrument. I have refined the design to increase the magnification level.
May I?
Of course.
How strong is the magnification?
Objects appear approximately five hundred times their normal size. As you can see, the cellular damage is quite extensive. However, based on interstitial transparency and membrane integrity, I do not believe it is an infection or any other form of communicable disease.
I see.
At the moment, I am looking for a common event or experience that Gia, Garvin and Skoran might have shared that could have a causal relationship to their illness.
Well they've all lived here in the village for many years. I'm sure they have many common experiences.
Yes, but since the illness struck all three in a relatively short period of time, it is reasonable to assume the experience is recent and unusual.
Actually, Jayden, encountering you has been the most unusual experience that they've all shared recently.
I am aware of that. Excuse me. I am also open to the possibility that I may in some way be the causal factor. However, since you have had a great deal of contact with me and you show no signs of the sickness, I tend to discount myself as a likely candidate.
Still, it has to be more than just a coincidence that shortly after you arrived, people started to become ill.
I agree.
Jayden I tried to give father his broth, but he won't eat.
You have a fever. You should be in bed.
No, I'm all right. Father needs me.
Talur is correct. You should rest. I will attend to your father. Gia, when did you begin wearing that pendant?
Two days ago. Father bought it from Skoran. Why?
May I see it? This is one of the metal fragments I sold to Skoran.
The secondary plasma vent has a triple redundant bypass. Which means that the primary access junction is routed through
Come in. Would be routed through the port transducer matrix. Come to give me more encouragement?
No. I'm actually here to tell you that I've decided to cancel the rest of your test.
What?
I'm cancelling the test.
May I ask why?
You've taken the Engineering qualification three times. You're no closer to passing.
Well, then I'll take it four times, or fourteen times, or however many times are necessary for me to get it right.
Deanna, this is nothing personal. Not everyone is cut out to be a Bridge Officer. I don't think this is for you.
Why? Because I'm not the most technically-minded person on the ship? I may have trouble telling the difference between a plasma conduit and a phase inducer, but there's more to being a bridge officer than memorising technical manuals.
That's right, there is. You could spend the next month memorising all the technical manuals in the computer, I still don't think you'd pass the test.
Tell me one thing. Is there a solution? Or is this simply a test of my ability to handle a no-win situation?
There is a solution.
Then give me time to find it.
I can't. As much as I care about you, my first duty is to the ship. I cannot let any Bridge Officer serve who's not qualified. I'm sorry.
My first duty is to the ship. The ship!
Computer, load Bridge Officer's test, Engineering qualification section one.
Computer ready.
Run programme.
The control system for the primary containment field is not functioning.
Something's severed the ODN conduit between here and the antimatter storage deck.
Geordi, could you repair the ODN conduit if you went into the crawlspace?
Sir, that crawlway is in a warp-plasma shaft. He would never survive the radiation.
I know that. Geordi, could you repair the conduit?
Yeah, I think I could.
Then do it. That's an order.
End simulation. Something told me you wouldn't let this go. Congratulations. You passed.
That's what this was all about, wasn't it? To see if I'd order someone to their death.
That's right.
I knew that was part of being in command and I thought I'd prepared for it, but when the moment came I hesitated. Maybe you were right. Maybe I'm not cut out for this.
You did exactly what you had to do. You considered all your options, you tried every alternative, and then you made the hard choice. Come on, let's get out of here, Commander.
I have coated this piece of cloth with the liquid which is used in lamps. As you can see, the cloth becomes luminescent when it is exposed to an energy source. This pendant also appears to be an energy source.
But where is this pattern of light coming from?
I believe a stream of particles is emanating from the metallic pendant and hitting the cloth.
I don't see any particles coming from the pendant.
You will see there are. I can even block them.
It would appear that this container was constructed of a material which absorbs or blocks the particles coming from the metal.
It's a trick.
No. It is empirical data. I believe the fragments were originally placed in this container to protect people from accidental exposure. The word radioactive may be a warning about the dangerous nature of the metal.
All right. Let's say for the moment that you're right, that there are invisible particles coming from the metal. What should we do?
I will continue my experiment. I would like you to gather all the pieces of metal in the village and place them in this container.
All right. But when I return, I want a more thorough explanation of all this. And I want to examine your data, in detail.
Of course.
There you are. You're the cause of this, Ice man.
If you are referring to the illness, you are partially correct. However, it is more complex than that. The metal fragment which
What, what are you?
I do not know.
I saw it with my own eyes. He's not a person. He's some kind of creature.
It's not true, Father.
We must find him and stop him before he kills us all.
I don't. Not Jayden. He wouldn't try to hurt us.
Come on.
Let him rest for now. You should rest as well. Exerting yourself will only make you sicker. I'll be back.
Gia.
Jayden? Everyone's looking for you. Skoran said you're some kind of creature.
I do not know what I am. But I am not like you.
I know. You're an Ice man. We talked about that.
No. I am not.
Jayden, why are you wearing that hood?
I do not wish to frighten you.
I won't be afraid. Take it off. Please, I have to see.
I understand your reaction. But I do not wish to harm you. You or Garvin or anyone else. I only wish to help, to find a cure for the illness. I was very close. I must to continue my work, but it will take time. How long until Skoran and the others return?
I don't know. They're looking for you now.
Then I must hurry.
Gia, I believe I have found the answer.
You think you found a cure?
I believe so. I tested this medicine on skin samples from your father. They showed improvement, so I administered this to him. He is now recovering.
What kind of medicine is it?
A compound I made which will neutralise the particles that are making you ill. Swallow this. I must administer this to everyone in the village, but I do not think they will trust me after what happened to Skoran.
I could tell them.
I am afraid they will not believe you either. Gia, is the well in the town square the only source of water for this village?
Well?
This is very important. Are there any other sources of fresh water near the village?
No. The nearest river is two days away.
Then I will put this compound into the well water. It may be diluted, but it should still have enough potency to work.
Compound
There he is! You see? It's just as I said.
I only wish to help.
This is how you've helped us, by bringing this plague? Tried to kill us all? Well, you won't succeed. I won't let you!
Excuse me. We're looking for a friend of ours. He might have wandered into your village a few days ago.
You'd remember him. He would have appeared very strange. Pale skin, gold eyes.
He was your friend?
Yes. Do you know him?
Where is he?
I don't understand.
We didn't know his real name, so we called him Jayden.
You're saying he's dead?
They killed him because they were afraid of him, but he saved all of us from the sickness.
The sickness?
There were these pieces of metal. They made everyone sick. But Jayden put something in the water and now everyone's better.
What happened to these pieces of metal?
We buried them in the forest. What was his real name?
Data.
Data. He was my friend, too.
It's Data all right. He's buried about two metres down. He's been deactivated so I can't tell how bad the damage is.
We could beam him and the probe fragments right onto the ship. No one would know.
Positronic net online. Subprocessor relays in place and neuroelectrical systems enabled.
Data, are you all right?
I do not know. I am surprised to find myself here. I thought I was on Barkon Four.
What's the last thing you remember?
I had located the crashed Federation probe and collected the radioactive fragments. I was attempting to download the sensor logs from the probe's onboard computer. There was a power surge. I believe the surge overloaded my positronic matrix. After that, I have no memory until this moment.  It appears I had an interesting time.
We don't know much about what happened either. Apparently you saved an entire village from radiation poisoning.
And you were a very special friend to a little girl.
Well, if you'll excuse me, I have the Bridge this watch.
Counsellor, have you been promoted in my absence?
That's right. Which means from now on you can call me sir.
Yes, sir.
This morning she was fifteen minutes late. That's the third time this week. Jean-Luc, you don't have the slightest idea what I'm talking about, do you.
No. I'm really sorry. I don't.
I've been telling you about Nurse Ogawa and Ensign Markson for the last fifteen minutes.
You have? I'm really sorry.
Are you worried about this mission with the Kes?
Not worried exactly. This notion of admitting half of their planet to the Federation while leaving the other half out.
First of all, the Kes are not half the planet, they're nearly three quarters of it. And the Prytt are not being left out. They themselves simply don't want to have contact with anyone from the outside. not the Federation or anyone else.
Every member of the Federation entered as a unified world, and that unity said something about them. That they had resolved certain social and political differences and they were now ready to become part a larger community.
By all indications, the Kes are a very unified, very progressive people.
But the Prytt are not. They are reclusive to the point of xenophobia.
Well, think about Earth. What if one of the old nation states, say Australia, had decided not to join the World Government in twenty one fifty? Would that have disqualified us as a Federation member?
That analogy is not exactly
Riker to Captain.
Go ahead, Number One.
We've received word from Ambassador Mauric. He's ready to see you and Doctor Crusher.
Inform him we're on our way. Thank you for breakfast.
Wait until tomorrow. I have something very special planned. It's a Vulcan dish. That's all I'll say.
Captain. Doctor. I have the coordinates of Ambassador Mauric's chambers.
Let's not keep them waiting, Mister Worf.
Enterprise to Kes Security Relay Station One. We're ready to commence transport.
Acknowledged, Enterprise. We have lowered our defense shield.
Confirmed.
Energise.
This is Security Relay Station One. We are ready to receive your Captain and Medical Officer.
This is the Enterprise. We have completed the transport sequence. You should have them.
Negative, Enterprise. They are not here.
Beverly. Beverly.
What happened?
I don't know.
The last thing I remember we were beginning to transport.
I would assume we must be on Kesprytt. We're in some kind of prison cell. The question is, why? I can't imagine that Ambassador Mauric would have any reason to detain us.
Jean-Luc.
What is it?
Let me see.
What?
It looks like an implant. It seems to be connected directly to the brainstem.
Some kind of coercive device?
Whatever it is I doubt it's designed for our health.
What is going on here?
If you tell us why you've taken us hostage, we might be able to
You are not hostages. You are prisoners.
Prisoners on whose authority?
You are being held under the authority of the Prytt Security Ministry. The charges are conspiring with the enemy.
Enemy? You mean the Kes.
We're not fools. We are aware of the Federation attempt to establish a military alliance with the Kes. It will not be tolerated.
Your information is incorrect. We have no plans to enter into any
There is no point in trying to mislead us, Captain. The devices which have been implanted in your cerebral cortexes will soon be calibrated to your psi-wave pattern. At that time, we will be able to get all the information we need.
And then you'll discover that we're telling the truth.
We shall see.
There is nothing wrong with the transporter. I have run a complete diagnostic of all the targeting components.
Then what happened to the Captain and Doctor Crusher?
Commander. The Transporter sensor log shows an unusual concentration of antigraviton particles in the emitter coil.
A concentration of antigraviton particles suggests a tractor beam. It might have deflected the transporter beam to a different set of coordinates.
Is there a way to locate those coordinates?
The tractor beam originated somewhere in the Prytt Alliance.
Why does the Prytt want Captain Picard and Doctor Crusher?
I don't know. And it's not going to be easy to find out. The Prytt have consistently refused all outside contact. We're going to have to work through the Kes. Contact Ambassador Mauric. Tell him I want a meeting right now.
Aye, sir.
What?
What?
You're staring at me.
I was just thinking about how to get out of here.
There may be a structural flaw that would allow us to escape.
Right.
Beverly, the important thing during any confinement is to think positively and not give up hope. There is a way out of every box, there is a solution to every puzzle. It's just a matter of finding it.
Damn.
Well, at least this means we won't starve to death.
It means they plan on keeping us here for a while.
I'm beginning to think negatively, Jean-Luc.
My tricorder!
Does it work?
Yes. Except something's been added to the main directory.
It's a map.
An escape route. That guard must be working for the Kes.
Possibly. Or it could be part of a very carefully laid trap.
If you ask me, I'd like to take my chances out there.
Agreed. Is there a way to open the cell door?
Yes, the code's been entered.
Commander, on behalf of my government, I would like to take this opportunity to present my profound apologies regarding this unfortunate incident.
That's very kind, Ambassador. But I don't think anyone here holds you or the Kes government responsible for what's happened.
Our primary concern is not to assign blame, but to recover our missing officers.
I agree. We are prepared to insert a hostage rescue team into the Prytt capital city on three hours notice.
Ambassador, we have not even attempted a diplomatic effort yet. I would rather not use force until we've exhausted all other options.
I don't believe there is any diplomatic option, Commander. We have no formal relations with the Prytt. No ambassadors. There's simply no way to contact them.
Surely you must have some means of communication in case of a planetary emergency.
We have never had need of such a system.
We can determine their communications frequencies and establish a link.
Allow me to be blunt. The Prytt are a fanatical, xenophobic people, with little regard for civilised discourse. Even if you do establish communications link with them, it will be a complete waste of time.
How long has it been since your last diplomatic contact?
Almost a century.
Then it's possible they may have changed over the years.
We have had other less formal contacts with the Prytt. Contacts we cannot discuss. But I can assure you, they have changed very little.
With all due respect, Ambassador, I think I should try to communicate with the Prytt before I sanction the use of force.
Of course, Commander. In the meantime, I will continue making preparations for a rescue attempt.
Agreed.
I do have one request. We believe that the Prytt obtained their information about the transport of your captain and doctor through a breach in our communications network. If I could set up a base of operations here on the Enterprise, I'd feel much more secure.
Mister Worf will help you.
Thank you, Lieutenant.
You first.
Is there a problem, Ambassador?
Probably not. Simply securing the area.
I can assure you there is no need.
I'm sure you're right.  Yes, this will do very nicely.
As Security Chief of the Enterprise, I would be glad to assist you in any way possible.
There's no need. We'll take care of everything. Thank you, Lieutenant.
There must be a lava flow or a underground hot spring somewhere near here.
It's a lava flow. It's about thirty metres below us. It says we should go this way. I smell gas.
This whole chamber is filled with pockets of a methanogenic compound.
Can we get through it?
I think so.
What did you say?
I didn't say anything. There might be a fairly regular pattern to these eruptions. We should be able to navigate out way through them if we're careful.
Say when.
Now.
The eruptions have stopped.
The gas is building up!
I have scanned the entire Prytt communications system. This appears to be the primary access module for the central government.
Can you determine which of the comm. links is connected to the Prime Minister's office?
I believe so, sir. However, the Prytt have no link designed for extraterritorial communication. Our hail may come as a quite surprise to them.
Well, they're going to have to adjust. Open a channel.
This is Prime Minister Horath's headquarters. How can I be of service?
This is Commander William T. Riker, Federation starship Enterprise. I know this may seem an unusual way
The Enterprise? You mean the ship in orbit?
That's right.
Why are you on this comm. link?
We're having trouble contacting your government directly. We had to start somewhere. If you would let me talk to your
Did you get authorisation for this communication from the Security Ministry?
As I said, we're having trouble contacting you
I cannot participate in an unauthorised communication. This transmission is terminated.
Not very friendly, are they?
No, sir.
Sir, we are being hailed. It is the Prytt Security Council.
Well, it looks like we got someone's attention. On screen.
Enterprise, this is Security Minister Lorin. You will immediately cease all attempts at communication with our people.
Minister, we've been attempting to contact someone in your government. It appears that you have detained two of our officers. We would like to discuss the situation.
There is nothing to discuss. If you do not terminate these transmissions, we will be forced to take aggressive action against your ship.
Their weapon systems pose no threat to the Enterprise.
Just the same, let's keep the shields up for the time being.
Aye, sir.
Is there a problem, Commander?
Our efforts with the Prytt just ran into a wall.
I'm sorry. But perhaps this will brighten your spirits. We have freed your Captain and doctor.
What?
They were being held in prison just outside the Prytt capital. One of our operatives was able to arrange their escape.
Where are they now?
Well, they should be en route to the Kes border. Our operative provided them with a detailed map and instructions on where to go.
How will you get them across the border?
At the moment, that information is confidential, but trust us, we do have a plan.
Ambassador, I'm afraid I must insist that you provide us with more information.
I understand your concern, of course, but I would feel more comfortable discussing these operational details in a less public environment.
Certainly. We can step into the Ready room.
I would prefer the quarters you provided me. They're safer.
All right.
There's no way out of here.
Maybe we took a wrong turn.
So am I.
What?
I'm thirsty too.
I didn't say anything about being thirsty.
I heard you. You said, I'm very thirsty.
I was thinking about it, but I didn't say anything.
You were thinking it?
The transceivers. Lorin said that they would align themselves to our psi-wave patterns.
The implants must be transmitting our thoughts. What am I thinking?
I don't know.
I can't hear your thoughts, either. Maybe it was a fluke.
Well, right now we have more immediate concerns. Does your map show us a way out of here?
Yes, we need to go up.
There's a ledge about thirty metres up. That should lead to another tunnel that connects up to the surface.
Right.
I heard that. They were not words exactly. A sudden sense of fear. A sense of fear of heights.
So much for that being a fluke.
It was a strange sensation. Suddenly having these thoughts appear in my mind.
If you sensed a fear of heights, you sensed pretty accurately.
Come on, you've done this before. It's just like on a holodeck. One step at a time, just climbing steadily and slowly.
Right.
I see you've done some redecorating.
Just a few pieces of equipment necessary for security reasons. You understand?
Certainly.
He is all right.
How do you plan to get our people out of Prytt territory?
You must realise that everything I'm about to say cannot leave this room. For some time, we have had certain friends among the Prytt. Citizens who realise that the long struggle between our two peoples can only end when the Prytt government is made to see reason.
You've recruited a few Prytt spies.
That's a crude, but accurate term. These friends will be waiting for your Captain and Doctor when they reach the village of Ohn Kor near the Kes border. The map we provided your officers will take them to a tavern there.
Forgive me, Ambassador, but is it wise to send two human fugitives in Starfleet uniforms into a Prytt village?
The danger is minimal. Our operatives control almost the whole village. Once contact has been made with Captain Picard and Doctor Crusher, our friends will escort them across the border into Kes.
I would still feel better if they could rendezvous with your operatives in a less public place.
Commander, I assure you we know what we're doing. We've had a great deal of experience dealing with the Prytt. We'd hardly risk the safety of your people. After all, we still hope you will recommend our entrance into the Federation.
One of us is hungry.
That would be me.
Do you mind thinking of something else. You're making me hungry.
What do you want me to think about?
Something other than a large bowl of vegetable soup.
My grandmother used to make it, with peas, carrots and
Beverly!
I'm sorry.
I am not being unreasonable.
I didn't say that you were. I may have thought it, but there's a difference.
You're right. We can't react to every random thought that crosses the other person's mind. Isn't astonishing, though, how much clutter there is in a consciousness. Odd memories coming to the surface. Bits of half-remembered songs.
Stray day dreams, scattered minutiae. I wonder how true telepaths sift through it all. How can they really get to what someone's thinking if the minds keeps churning all this flotsam to the surface? That is not funny.
I just wanted to see if you were still listening.
I think our link is getting stronger.
Maybe if we put some distance between us, that might weaken it. Not that I'm growing tired of hearing your most intimate thoughts.
Certainly not.
Jean-Luc.
What happened?
I was suddenly overcome with a wave of nausea.
Me, too.
There's nothing wrong with either of us. Maybe the air is toxic.
The same thing. But when you moved back toward me it got better. Well, it seems as if we're stuck with each other.
What is it?
I'm not sure whether we should go over this hill or that one. The topography on this map is a little vague.
Let me see. This way.
You don't really know, do you?
What?
I mean, you're acting like you know exactly which way to go, but you're only guessing. Do you do this all the time?
No, but there are times when it is necessary for a captain to give the appearance of confidence.
I'm sorry. I'm sorry. I just couldn't resist.
I'm beginning to realise that you seem to always have some acerbic remark on the tip of your tongue.
Well at least I've trained myself not to say it anymore. When I was a little girl, my mouth was always landing me in trouble with my parents, my teachers.
Your friends. There was someone called Tom Norris?
That's right. I had one date with him which I brought to an abrupt halt with the words, is that a beard or
Is your face dirty?
There's something more. You're laughing, but actually you're embarrassed by that incident.
Yes. I thought I was being cute but I really hurt him. That was a long time ago. I learned a valuable lesson.
This sharing of thoughts and feelings is quite compelling.
Very. We'd better get going.
I don't think so, either. Maybe we can find another way to reach the village.
No. It's several kilometres to find another way around that ridge. The border is just two kilometres east of here. There's a forcefield protecting it, but we can find some way to deal with that when we get there. Come on.
All right.
Is something wrong?
Have a seat. Captain Picard and Doctor Crusher didn't show up at the designated rendezvous point.
Do you know what happened to them?
No. We have no idea what happened to them. We find it strange that your officers should follow the escape plan so precisely and then fail to make the crucial rendezvous with our operatives.
It is possible they have been recaptured.
Our sources would have informed us instantly if that had happened. Of course, if they weren't captured, if they simply made a different rendezvous, we might not ever know about it.
A different rendezvous? I'm not sure I know what you mean.
Of course not. How could you know if your Captain and Doctor were meeting secretly with the Prytt? Meeting in order to set up a military alliance with the Federation.
What?
It was a clever scheme. First, you pretend to lose your officers during transport, then you ask us for help and get us to expose several of our undercover operatives in the process. But what you didn't expect was for us to get your people out of prison so quickly. They needed more time. They needed more time to plot the destruction of the Kes with their new Prytt friends.
This is ridiculous. You're beginning to see conspiracies everywhere. We were invited here by the Kes. Why would we ally ourselves with the Prytt?
Indeed, why?
You can believe what you like. We're going to find our people with or without your help.
Then I believe it's time for us to be leaving the Enterprise.
Fine. Make sure you take all this junk with you.
No luck?
I'm beginning to think there's not a single thing on this planet we can eat.
Well, by this time tomorrow we could be back on the Enterprise and you can plant yourself in front of a replicator with a knife and fork.
Remember that Vulcan dish I promised you for breakfast? I was just. You hate having breakfast with me.
That's not true.
Yes, it is. When I said breakfast, I heard you say, I hate that.
That's not quite what I meant.
Well, then what did you mean?
It's just that I don't like
What I've been choosing for breakfast recently.
You see, I think that breakfast should be a simple meal and recently you've been ordering these elaborate things.
Coffee and croissants, that's all you really want, isn't it? Coffee and croissants. Well why didn't you just say so?
I didn't think it was important. You don't like those elaborate meals either.
No, I usually prefer something simple myself but I thought you might enjoy more variety. Well, I guess it's Coffee and croissants for both of us from now on.
I love firelight.
There's something about the flame, the smell of the smoke. It's always seemed to me to be intoxicating, somehow.
I remember when Jack and I took Wesley on his first camping trip to Balfour Lake. Wesley kept throwing manta leaves in the fire, watching them pop. Jack kept telling him. What? Jean-Luc, I heard you. Don't push it away. When I said Jack and I, I felt this sudden wave of something. I didn't know you felt that way.
Didn't you?
I guess I always knew that there was an attraction between us right from the start, but I never knew how strongly you felt. Why didn't you ever tell me you were in love with me?
You were married to my best friend. At first I thought it was harmless infatuation. Something hormonal rather than emotional.
Then when the months went by and the three of us began spending more time together.
I realised that it was something else, and it wasn't right. But although I would never act on it, I couldn't help the way I felt.
And when Jack died you felt guilty.
I felt guilty before he died> Having feelings like that for my best friend's wife. And then later, after the accident, I promised myself that I would never tell you know how I felt. It would be like betraying my friend
That's why you didn't want me on the Enterprise seven years ago.
I didn't know how I would react. And then, little by little, I realised that I didn't have those feelings any more. Twenty years is, after all, a long time.
And now we're friends.
Yes, friends.
Well, we still have a lot of ground to cover tomorrow. We should get some sleep.
Right.
Ambassador, thank you for coming.
Commander.
We're going to clear up this misunderstanding once and for all. Hail Minister Lorin, please.
Aye, sir.
Enterprise, I have warned you about these unauthorised communications.
Yes, I know, but I think it's about time we all sat down together and tried to work this out. I have Ambassador Mauric here
That is your misfortune. We have nothing to say to either of you.
Commander, you're working with the Prytt. Putting on this little show for my benefit does neither of us any good.
We'll see. Mister Worf.
I believe there's someone waiting for us in the Observation Lounge.
I should have known that anyone willing to deal with the Kes would be capable of such an outrage.
I'm sorry to resort to such drastic measures, Minister, but you left me little choice.
Don't pretend the two of you are enemies. It's too late for charades.
If that is an attempt to hide your military alliance with the Federation, you needn't bother. I already know far more than you can imagine.
Let's all just sit down and try to talk about what's happened to Captain Picard and Doctor Crusher.
I will not sit at a table with him.
No more than I would sit with her.
All right then, we'll stand. The important thing is that we start talking.
I am not authorised to talk with a Kes official.
All right then, you talk to me. Where are my officers?
As if you don't already know.
Let's go.
I'm all right.
We are already aware of your plan to use Federation technology to build new attack satellites. You will find that we are prepared for them.
That is an interesting but pointless lie. I'd rather discuss your own plans to use Federation aid to stage a takeover of Kolrod Island.
We have been over this before. Kolrod clearly belongs to the Prytt who originally
That's it! I can see that diplomacy is not going to get us anywhere today, and I do not have time for to negotiate. So let's put all of our cards on the table. You're concerned the Kes are going to be admitted to the Federation.
Correct.
As First Officer of the Enterprise I think I can promise you that's not going to happen. The Kes will be denied membership.
You have no authority to make that decision. Despite whatever games you played with the Prytt when you arrived, we still plan to take our petition directly to the Federation Council. They'll listen
They will also listen to the reports of the Captain of the Enterprise and his First Officer. And I can tell you right now the First Officer's report will go something like this. Kesprytt, a deeply troubled world with social, political, and military problems they have yet to resolve. The Kes, while a friendly and democratic people, are driven by suspicion, deviousness, and paranoia. It is the opinion of this officer they are not ready for membership. Now, the matter of our missing officers.
They are still charged with spying, Commander. I have heard nothing here which would alter that.
Then maybe you should consider this. If anything happens to them, Starfleet is going to want a full investigation, which means more starships will be coming to Kesprytt and those ships are going to want answers which puts your country under a very large and very uncomfortable microscope. Remember how unhappy you were when we contacted just one of your people without authorisation? Well, just think of what it'll be like. Ten starships asking questions, contacting hundreds of your people. Massive sensor sweeps. They may even start sending down away teams. All because you wouldn't help me find my missing officers.
I think I can use the tricorder to set up a multiphase pulse. That should weaken the field enough to let us through.
No, no. The modulation frequency is in the upper harmonic range.
Right.
They're coming.
I'm working as fast as I can.
Minister, we have the human female. The male is standing in Kes territory.
Very well. Transmit their coordinates to the Enterprise transporter room.
Understood.
Thank you, Minister. Now, if you'll excuse me.
Mauric is determined to take his protest to the Federation Council, but I don't think he'll get very far.
I tend to agree, Number One.
Did I miss something?
Of course. Of course. You're absolutely right.
That was wonderful.
My pleasure.
Don't get me wrong, Jean-Luc, but I'm glad we're not joined at the hip anymore.
So, were you getting tired of my company?
Just tired of bumping into you every thirty seconds. I was beginning to feel as if you were part of my uniform.
To freedom.
Freedom. Penny for your thoughts?
I was just thinking that as distracting as it was, I was beginning to get used to hearing your thoughts and I find that I miss it.
So do I. It was very intimate. You know, last night I couldn't sleep.
Oh?
I was awake for several hours. And thanks to the implants, I got to hear some very interesting dreams of yours.
A man can't be held responsible for what his mind does while he's asleep.
What about when he's awake?
So now that we've had this unique experience, what do we do?
What do you mean?
You know exactly what I mean.
No, I don't. The implant's been removed, remember?
Now that we know how each of us feels, perhaps we should not be afraid to explore those feelings.
Or perhaps we should be afraid. I think I should be going now.
Goodnight.
Goodnight.
I get no further response from the vessel.
Maintain an open channel.
Doctor Crusher and her assistants are waiting in Transporter room three.
Sir, may I remind you that during the Galen border conflict, it was a common tactic of the Talarians was to abandon their observation craft, rig them to self destruct
And issue a general distress call. Yes, Mister Data, I know.
That particular guerrilla manoeuvre resulted in two hundred and nineteen fatalities over a three day period.
Is there any way to detect their self-destruct device?
Negative, sir. The Talarians employ a subspace proximity detonator. It is not detectable by our scans.
Or the away team's tricorders. Right.
Captain, the Talarian warship the Q'Maire is responding to the distress call.
Position?
Halfway through the Woden sector.
It'll take them hours to get here, sir, even at maximum warp.
Counsellor?
There is life on board, but it's fading.
Number One, assemble the rest of your away team. Prepare for immediate rescue operations.
Yes, sir.
Ancillary power is failing.
They're nothing more than children.
I am Commander Riker of the Federation Starship Enterprise. We will evacuate you and give you medical care. You will not be harmed.
Enterprise, prepping five Talarian males for transport directly to Sickbay. Trauma team, stand by to receive injured. We have radiation burns and possible respiratory distress.
Transport locked in and ready, Doctor.
Stand by for my orders.
Captain, this appears to be a basic training ship. Five boys, all teens, all wearing uniforms.
Proceed with the evacuation, Number One.
No other life signs aboard, sir.
Commander, quickly.
What is it?
This boy. He's human.
Captain's log, supplemental. We have completed emergency evacuation of four Talarians and one human. How this young man found himself in the company of these aliens remains a mystery.
It's Jono, right? Is that what I heard them call you? I'm Doctor Crusher. I'm just examining you for radiation injuries. It won't hurt. I have a son not much older than you. Perhaps you'd like to meet him. Well, Jono, you seem to have escaped radiation damage. Pretty lucky.
Doctor Crusher.
Now how did this happen?
What is it?
They're terrified.
They all just started up.
Please may I have your attention. Please may I have your attention! Stop that immediately!  Well, that's better. Now, what's your name, young man?
He won't talk, Captain. We haven't been able to get through to him.
Captain>  I am Jono. Take me home to my Captain. Take me home to Endar!
He managed to escape radiation trauma but the scan shows something else.
What?
Two previously fractured ribs, a broken arm, and a low grade concussion. There might be neurological impairment. I'd like to examine him further. Jean-Luc, the Talarians have been known to be ruthless to their enemies. I think there's a real possibility they may have brutalised the child.
Isn't it possible the injuries were caused prior to his captivity?
Not likely. He's been with them a long time. Long enough to assimilate their cultural traits, and calcium trace patterns indicate the injuries took place during the past seven years.
But if they have abused the boy, why would he so devoutly wish to return to them?
It's not uncommon. It was identified centuries ago as the Stockholm syndrome.
Jono, what is it? Jono! I just suggested he take off his gloves. Suddenly he lost control.
Security, we need some assistance down here in Sickbay.
Jono!
She won't leave me alone! She keeps trying to dissect me!
She was trying to help you.!
I don't want her help! I should be back with my brothers! Send us back to Captain Endar!
Jono, I want you to stop this immediately!
Yes, Captain.
Good. That's better. Now, if we're to accomplish anything
Data to Picard.
Go ahead.
We have received a subspace communiqu from Starfleet Command regarding the young human, sir.
Very well. Doctor, Counsellor.
Lieutenant Worf, escort this young man to quarters. He is to be confined there until further notice.
Yes, Doctor.
Why are you here, Klingon, with them? Did they capture you too?
They are not my captors. They are my comrades.
Why do you take orders from a female?
Doctor Crusher. She is my superior officer.
Among my people, a female can never outrank a man.
You are human, and among humans, females can achieve anything the males can.
I am no more human than you are. I am Talarian.
You are confused.
Stop that!
I will make the B'Nar, the mourning, until I am back with my brothers!
By matching DNA gene types, Starfleet was able to identify the boy as Jeremiah Rossa.
Rossa?
As in Admiral Rossa?
She is his grandmother, Captain. He was born fourteen years ago on the Federation colony, Galen Four. His parents, Connor and Moira Rossa, were killed three years, nine months later when their colony was overrun by Talarian forces.
I remember. There were no survivors.
The boy was listed as missing, presumed dead.
I heard another Rossa was killed in action at the Krasner outpost.
Tragedy seems to follow that family. The Admiral lost both her sons.
And now she'll have something to celebrate.
Captain, if Jeremiah is returned to his family in his present condition, it would be a wrenching experience for everyone. Especially for him. He needs to re-discover his identity, make some connection with his roots.
I agree. Do what you can to accomplish that, Counsellor.
I don't think I can do anything, Captain.
Why not?
Troi's right. It's very clear that the boy does not respond well to women.
The Talarians are a rigidly patriarchical society, sir.
Jeremiah needs to build a relationship with a man, a father figure with whom he can explore his origins. And I think it should be you, Captain.
Oh, no, Counsellor! Oh, no, Counsellor, I don't think so. He needs someone who is trained in these things.
But you are the only person with whom he has shown any connection. If he is to find his humanity then you are the only one who can help him. It's up to you, Captain.
Jono! Jono, why do you make that noise?
It is the custom of my people when we are in distress.
Is it not also the custom of your people to listen to the wishes of their Captain?
Yes.
Then, as Captain of the starship Enterprise, I ask you not to make that sound.
Yes, sir.
Good. Well, now that's cleared up, let's, er, let's, er, let's get acquainted, shall we? What do you think of your room? I know it's a little sterile. But if there's anything you'd like? Pictures, perhaps, or games.
This is a cage. I am still your captive.
Oh, no, not at all. I thought you'd be comfortable here.
Are you going to return me to my Captain?
We will rendezvous with the warship Q'Maire at oh seven forty hours. We will transfer the Talarians to Captain Endar.
Including me?
We'll discuss your situation with Captain Endar.
I don't like this place.
We could find some other quarters.
I've always lived with my Captain.
Ah. Yes, well, that wouldn't work here.
Well, I'm sure you'll see there's nothing here to appeal to a young person.
Put that down, please.
It's Klingon.
Yes. Would you put it back where you got it.
Well. Here we are, eh, Jono?
I notice you haven't taken off your gloves.
Not here.
Why not?
So that I don't have to touch an alien.
Jono, your Captain, Endar, has he ever hurt you? Inflicted pain?
Pain is not a consideration.
Then he has?
I did not say that. Don't you understand? Pain is not what matters. Passing the tests is everything.
Is that what they are? Tests of pain?
You understand nothing.
It's true, I don't fully understand Talarians. But you are not Talarian.
I will not listen to this. I will not listen to your lies.
Come.
You wanted to see me, Captain?
Yes, Counsellor. Please, come in, sit down.
You're probably not aware of this, but I have never been particularly comfortable around children.
Really?
For some reason, they just don't seem to respond to me.
I see.
Frankly, I think my time would be best served carrying out the duties and responsibilities of a Starfleet Captain.
Seldom have I heard an explanation so well-rehearsed.
Look, Counsellor, I just feel that I'm not the right person for this job.
Strange, isn't it? You'll travel light years, dodge asteroid storms, brave hostile aliens, and yet when asked to assume a parental role, you cringe. Why do you suppose that is?
I'm not cringing. I'm just acknowledging my limitations.
When you were a child, did you have any friends? Other children you played with?
I don't think that has anything to do with anything. Well, perhaps it was because. This is foolish.
What were you going to say?
it's just that ever since I was a child I've always known exactly what I wanted to do. Be a member of Starfleet. Nothing else mattered to me. Virtually my entire youth was spent in the pursuit of that goal. In fact, I probably skipped my childhood altogether.
You know, Captain, almost no one is born being a good parent. Most people just have to muddle through and do the best that they can.
Are you saying that's what I'm going to have to do?
Yes. And you might be surprised at just how good you can be.
Computer, turn off that noise! Computer, what was that?
The Alba Ra, a contemporary Talarian musical form.
Jono? Jono, where are you?
You turned off my music.
Yes, I certainly did, and I expect it to stay turned off. Would you come down from there? I see you've made yourself at home.
I cannot rest on your beds. They hurt my back.
Would you come here. There's something I want to show you.
Those are Connor and Moira Rossa. They are your parents. The baby is you. Jeremiah Rossa.
My name is Jono.
Well, you were born Jeremiah on Galen Four. The colony was destroyed later, during a border skirmish.
You see? You knew how to laugh once. Do you remember any of this, Jono? Your parents, your home?
I know that Endar rescued me. He told me so.
Jono, your parents were killed by Talarians.
It was war. Death is part of war.
Captain?
Yes, what is it, Number One?
We've established visual contact with the warship Q'Maire.
Endar!
Hey, hey! You stay put. I'm on my way, Number One.
Get to cover!
I can't leave you!
Take Jeremiah. Take him to the forest. I'll hold them off.
No! No! Come with us! Jeremiah!
Momma!
Status, Mister Data?
Q'Maire at station, holding steady at bearing zero one three, mark zero one five. Distance five oh six kilometres.
Are its weapons systems active?
Negative, sir.
Captain Endar requests an open channel, sir.
On screen.
I am Captain Endar of the warship Q'Maire. To whom am I speaking?
Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Federation Starship Enterprise. We have rescued four crew members from your observation craft. They have received medical attention. The are ready for transport.
Your actions are duly noted. We will forward coordinates for immediate transport.
You're welcome, I'm sure.
One moment, Captain. We've also discovered a human among your crew.
Jono.
Actually, his name is Jeremiah, Jeremiah Rossa.
What is his condition? Is he injured?
He was not wounded in the mishap, but as a representative of the Federation, I require an explanation. Why has this child been held in your custody for so many years?
No explanation is warranted, Captain. He is my son.
Captain's log, supplemental. Captain Endar's claim that Jeremiah Rossa is his son is clearly unacceptable. However, to avoid escalating tensions, I have invited the Talarian leader to come aboard the Enterprise so that we may address the issue face to face.
Yes, I was in charge of the force that repelled the trespassers on Galen Four. I must say your Federation troops fought tenaciously.
Among them Connor and Moira Rossa.
I suppose. After the battle, I found this squalling child huddled by the body of a young woman, his mother presumably. There was almost no one left alive on Galen Four. Was I to leave him screaming by his mother's body?
You should have notified the Federation authorities. To conceal him was a clear violation of our agreement.
I took him in accordance with my peoples' traditions.
What tradition is it that empowered you to capture a helpless child?
I lost my son at the hands of humans during the conflict over Castal One. Talarian custom allows me to claim the son of a slain enemy.
Does that custom extend also to brutalising this surrogate son?
What are you talking about?
Our medical officer discovered evidence of injuries so severe, they might be considered torture.
Nonsense. I've never harmed Jono.
Then explain the fractured ribs, concussion, the broken arm.
Broken arm? Youth. Have you ever been a father, Picard? Have you ever had a son desperately try to win your approval, your respect? Jono broke his ribs riding on a t'stayan. Six hooves. A very powerful beast. The arm, in a contest with other youths. He endured the pain and won the competition. One day, he will be a great warrior.
Doesn't he deserve to become more than that? His true heritage is human, Endar.
A heritage long since forgotten.
While on board, you are welcome to supervise the return of your crew, but I cannot allow Jeremiah Rossa to be returned to your custody. His true family are waiting for him on Earth.
Then under no circumstances will I allow your ship to leave our territory.
I have already reported our position and the nature of this violation to Starfleet.
And I've already called for reserved forces into the sector.
Are you saying that you're willing to go to war over this boy?
Would you not for your only son?
We have been at peace for many years. Let us not rush headlong into war.
Then help me to avoid it. If you will allow me to see Jono, it will be clear to you I have been a good father. He has grown up happy in my keeping.
So you think it would be unwise to let Endar see Jono?
I think it's dangerous. Abusers can have subtle but powerful influence over their victims.
You see, I'm not convinced the boy has been abused, Doctor. I've talked with the father, and if I am any judge of character, I would say that he deeply cares for the boy's welfare.
I sense awakening memories in the boy. This is a very fragile time for Jono. If we send away the man he calls father without even letting them see each other, how will we ever gain his trust?
Yes. There is something else to keep in mind. We are deep in Talarian territory. A semblance of diplomacy is called for. I'm going to agree to the meeting.
All I ask is that the visit be supervised. Don't let them be alone together.
Agreed.
Endar.
Jono, my son.
Have they treated you well?
Yes, Captain. Except
Except what?
I was forbidden to make the B'Nar.
That's all right. I know you've mourned in your heart. Well, Jono what do you think of these humans?
They look like me.
They want to keep you, you know.
Yes, I know.
You've reached the age of decision. What is your choice? Do you want to stay?
No, of course not.
Then you shall not. I'm returning to the Q'Maire. I will give the humans with a choice. If they do not make the one we know is right, it may lead to war. You may die.
I am ready to die.
Captain, sensors indicate two warships approaching from the opposite direction along the border.
Mister Data, what's their offensive potential?
Talarian warships are limited to neutral particle weapons, high energy X-ray lasers and merculite rockets. No match for the Enterprise, Captain.
The last thing I want is to be forced into destroying one of their ships.
They won't back off. They've been willing to fight to the death in past encounters.
The lines are being drawn. All this for a chosen son.
Captain, is it worth it, to go to war over a child?
You might not ask that, Lieutenant, if it was your child.
There must be a way to avoid this.
If we can just reach Jono, help him make some connections with his origins, he may choose to come with us.
You really think Endar would go along with that?
If Endar respects Talarian custom, he may have to. According to their tradition, a male child of fourteen has reached the age of decision. He then undergoes a ceremony of initiation, after which he has the freedom to make his own choices.
Endar's entire claim on Jono is based on Talarian custom he'd have a hard time backing away from it now.
Captain, there is a subspace communication from Starfleet Command.
On screen.
Sir, the message is for Jeremiah Rossa.
Have the boy brought to my Ready Room.
Jeremiah? my name is Connaught Rossa. I am your father's mother. I wish we could talk in person, but that will have to wait. When I heard the miracle that you were alive, I wanted to reach out to you as soon as possible. I find myself wondering what you look like. All I can do is imagine your father at your age. You come from a family that would make you proud. Many of them have given their lives to bring peace to the galaxy. You are the last of the Rossas. I was so very thankful when you were given back to us to carry on the line. Your grandfather and I will greet you with all the love in our hearts. Have a safe journey home, Jeremiah.
She wears a Starfleet uniform.
Yes.
What is her rank?
She is an Admiral.
She outranks you?
Yes.
If I were home now, I would go to the brae, and run along the river run as fast as I could!
Jono.
I can't do any of the things that calm me here. You won't let me have my music, you won't let me make the B'Nar! I feel if I stay still much longer I will die!
Jono, let me show you what I do when I get those feelings. Come on.
Now, you can serve from within either of these two sections by bouncing the ball and hitting it into that top centre target. You have to return the ball before it bounces twice. Alright? Let's try it.
Not bad.
I win at all the games.
I can believe it.
Jono? You all right?
I'm fine.
Momma!
Jeremiah!
No! Momma!
It's all right. It's all right.
She was all red. I cried. She didn't answer me.
She used to sing to me. I don't remember the melody, just the sound of her voice. Before I remembered these things, I was strong. And now
It's part of being human, Jono. But, as deeply as you can feel hurt, you can also feel joy.
I do not think so. I think I will always feel like this.
How was the racquetball?
Oh, he gave me quite a game for his first time out.
Yes, Captain. I'm looking forward to next time.
I'm sure you are. Sit down. What would you like?
What is that?
This is called a banana split. It's quite possibly one of the greatest things in the universe. Here, try some.
That is called a spoon.
Forgive me.
I fail to understand why this is amusing.
Access your data banks under humour, subheading slapstick.
Comedy stressing farce and horseplay. Ah. This, no doubt, is a variation on pie in the face?
Now do you see why it's funny?
No, sir, but I will take your word for it. It is very amusing.
Let's try this again. I'd like a fresh banana split, and another one for my friend here.
Right away.
Look at him. He's a different person.
Who would have thought we'd see him laugh out loud like that?
Just half an hour ago he was crying like a baby.
Two bleeders, single plane penetration. I need the autosuture here.
Yes, Doctor.
Looks like the blade hit the sternum and was deflected. It could have been a lot worse.
Then it wasn't a dream.
I'm afraid not. No vital organs pierced, no major arteries.
Where is the boy now?
Worf has him in security. Hold still.
I want to see him. Here. Now.
He'll wait until I'm finished.
Talarian warships converging. Range, five hundred kilometres.
On screen. Any communication, Lieutenant Worf?
No, sir. We have an open channel.
Commander, the warships' closing velocities are slowing. Staggered approach vectors bearing zero, one hundred twenty, and two hundred forty degrees.
Riker to La Forge.
La Forge here, sir.
The Talarians are moving
Into attack posture. Classic triangular envelopment.
I've tapped the impulse engines for additional power to shields.
We're ready, Commander.
Commander, the Captain of the Q'Maire requests communication.
Here we go. On screen.
Captain Picard, have you made your decision?
This is Commander Riker. What are your intentions, Captain Endar?
Where is Captain Picard?
He has been injured. I am in command now.
Very well. Please prepare my son for immediate transport.
I'm afraid that won't be possible. Last night, Jono attacked Captain Picard and tried to murder him. We're holding him in custody.
If he had been returned to me with the others, this would never have happened. I hold you responsible for this incident.
He will have to come with us now, Endar. It is up to Starfleet to decide the consequences.
I do not accept that decision. I repeat, you will prepare my son for immediate transport. If he is not aboard the Q'Maire in five minutes, you will suffer the consequences.
Red alert.
Talarian vessels routing power to forward rockets.
Ready all weapons, Mister Worf.
Jono, why did you do it?
That does not matter.
Yes, I think it does. It matters to me.
What matters is that I have attacked a Captain. I am ready to be put to death.
You think you're going to be killed?
To attack a superior is the worst offence. I will die at your hands.
Jono, you're not going to die at my hands or anyone else's.
But I have committed a terrible crime.
What I want to know is why? You seemed so happy just a few hours ago.
I was. Then I thought about my father. I felt I had betrayed him. I'd be throwing away all that he's given me, all that I'd learned from him. My home, running along the river, playing in the games, sharing victory with my brothers. All the things that are part of my life. As I grew closer and closer to you, I knew that meant leaving more and more of that life behind. Forgive me, Captain, but I could not allow myself to do that.
The Q'Maire is requesting communication on a secure channel, Commander.
On screen.
Commander Riker, you have failed to transport my son aboard the Q'Maire.
Our intentions have not changed, Endar. We're returning him to Starfleet.
I regret your stubbornness. Much will be lost.
One moment, Captain. Captain Endar, last night Jono attacked me with a dagger.
Which he could not have done had he been returned to me with the others!
There was a crime committed on board this ship, but it was not Jono's. It was mine. When we found Jono, it seemed so clear what had to be done. We knew that if only we could persuade him to make the decision to stay, then you would most likely let him. So with the best of intentions, we tried to convince him, and in so doing, we thoroughly failed to listen to his feelings, to his needs. That was the crime, and it has taken a huge toll on a strong and very noble young man. And it must be rectified. He will return home. To the only home he's ever known. And to the father that he loves. To you, Endar.
Thank you, Captain.
Please transmit coordinates for immediate transport.
Goodbye, Jono.
Goodbye, Captain. Thank you.
So why were you rolling around in Cypirion cactus?
You know Rebecca Smith?
The new Tactical officer?
We took a walk in the Arboretum. We sat down, we got comfortable, things got a little romantic, and then I rolled over.
Blurred vision, dizziness, palpitations, a stinging sensation in the lower spine. It's Terrelian Death Syndrome, isn't it.
I thought we agreed you'd come to me before checking Starfleet Medical Database.
Yes, well, this time I'm glad I did. Maybe we can stop the cellular decay before it's too late.
Reg, you don't have Terrelian Death Syndrome.
You, you're sure?
I'm sure.
Then maybe it is Symbalene blood burn.
No, no. I don't see anything wrong with you at all. Wait a minute, there is a slight imbalance in your K three cell count.
My K threes? Oh, no.
Barclay, I'm sure it's nothing. Look, I'll run a microcellular scan. We'll see. This'll take a couple of minutes.
How's my smallest patient doing?
I believe she is doing well. Her appetite has increased by seven percent, and she is starting to engage in prenatal behaviour.
Oh, she's getting close. You'll have a fresh litter of hungry kittens before the week is over. Let me just run an amniotic scan to make sure everything's fine and then I'll
Doctor! My capillaries are shrinking!
Excuse me. Alyssa, can you take care of Spot for a minute? Start a preliminary amniotic scan.
Yes, Doctor.
My intravascular pressure, it's going right through the roof.
You're right, it is elevated. You've also got heightened electrophoretic activity.
Electrophoretic activity? Is it serious?
Well, based on this, I'd say you've got seventy, maybe eighty years.
Eighty? Eighty years?
Yes, Reg. What you've got a mild case of Urodelan Flu. It's nothing serious. Most humans have a natural immunity to it, but the T-cell in your DNA that would normally fight off the infection is dormant.
So you mean I have bad genes?
You have one dormant gene out of a hundred thousand, and I can activate that gene with a synthetic T-cell let the body attack the infection naturally. You should feel better in a couple of days.
Thank you, Doctor. I feel much better.
Good. Now, stay away from Medical Database.  And you stay out of the Arboretum.
Everything looks fine, Data. Do you want to know the sex of the kittens?
I have noticed that many humans prefer not to know in order to experience the surprise during birth. I believe I will preserve the mystery until then.
I know what you mean. I don't want to know either.
Alyssa?
Spot's not the only one who's going to be a mother.
Oh, Alyssa, that's wonderful! How did Andrew take the news?
He was a little shocked, but he's getting over it.
I have spent the past nine weeks as an expectant parent. I would be happy to share my insights with your husband. If my experience is any indication, he will need all the help he can get.
Captain's log, stardate 47653.2. We're performing field tests of our new tactical systems and weapon upgrades. Mister Worf is supervising the exercises.
The next test will involve the new photon torpedoes. The explosive yield has been increased by eleven percent and I have enhanced the targeting system for increased accuracy.
Sounds fascinating, Mister Worf. Please proceed.
Setting targeting coordinates zero zero five mark three one seven, spread pattern delta nine four. Torpedoes armed and loaded, sir.
Fire when ready.
Worf?
One of the torpedoes has veered off course. It appears to be a malfunction in the guidance system.
Abort and destroy.
The torpedo is not responding. Subspace detonator will not engage.
Lock on phasers.
The torpedo is out of range.
Even for your newly improved phasers?
Maintain a sensor lock on the torpedo, Mister Worf. We'll have to go after it.
That would be inadvisable, sir. The asteroid field is unusually dense. The Enterprise is too large to safely navigate through it.
Then I'll take a shuttlecraft and retrieve it. Mister Data, you're with me.
Captain, the shuttle pilot who's on duty is Lieutenant Hayes.
I happen to be a reasonably qualified pilot, Number One. Besides, these tests hardly require the Captain's personal attention.
Understood. Enjoy yourself.
Mister Worf, I think that you should consider analysing your new guidance system.
Captain, I will need a few minutes to attend to a personal matter.
Me?
It is possible that it will take several days for Captain Picard and me to complete our mission. I would prefer to have a human present to supervise the birthing process.
Well, I'd be honoured.
I have noticed that you are the only other member of the crew whom Spot seems to like.
Really? That's hard to believe. You're such a sweet little kitty.
She is to you. However, there have been several injuries to other members of the crew who have attempted to care for her.
So, has she picked a place?
A place?
Cats usually like to pick a specific location to give birth. It's usually dark and secluded, and I believe this is it.
I'm curious, sir. Who's the father?
I am not certain. Spot has escaped from my quarters on several occasions and there are twelve male felines on board. I intend to run a full DNA analysis on the kittens once they
Picard to Data. Report to Shuttlebay two.
On my way, sir. Goodbye, Spot. I believe you are in good hands.
You have nothing to worry about, sir.
Problem?
I have performed thirteen diagnostics of the weapons array, and I can find nothing wrong with the guidance system.
I'll have Geordi run a diagnostic of the torpedo bay itself. Maybe he can find something.
Must you to stand so close to me?
Lieutenant, are you all right?
Yes, I am fine.
No, you're not. You've been working for six hours straight. You're tired. Take a break.
But
That's an order, Lieutenant.
Thanks for waiting.
Do not approach me unannounced, especially when I'm eating.
Worf we were supposed to have lunch together, remember?
I was hungry.
Well, I'm hungry too. Excuse me.
Yes?
Can I have an order of Ongilin caviar. Make that a double order.
Certainly.
Caviar? For lunch?
I'm in the mood for something salty. Besides, it's no stranger than what you're eating.  Have you noticed how dry the air is on the ship? I wonder if the environmental controls are set properly.
You're excused.
Is something wrong?
It has been a difficult day. The torpedo guidance system failed. It was my fault.
You always say that.
It was my fault! I designed that guidance system.
Worf, calm down. I think you're under more stress than you'd like to admit. Maybe you should get some rest.
Perhaps you are right. If you will excuse me.
I didn't mean right now.
We removed the torpedo bay's primary guidance module and found a power fluctuation in the forward sensor cluster. Now we think it may be a radial imbalance in the phase discriminator. Now what we want to do next is run a level four diagnostic, but we're going to have to shut down auxiliary power to nineteen decks and
Wait a minute. Slow down. I lost you back there. Which sensor clusters?
The forward. It's, it's a power fluctuation in the converter nodes. It's a minor adjustment. It's minor.
It's all right in here in on diagram, Commander.
I'll look this over later. Go ahead. You run your diagnostic. I'll inform the other departments about the power systems.
I'll check that.
He's full of energy today.
I can't get him to slow down. He's been working like that since last night,
Looks like a plasma conduit cut out in junction seventeen. I'll go look at it.
Wait a minute, Reg, I'll go with you. Keep you posted.
Computer, increase ambient temperature by two degrees Centigrade and increase relative humidity by ten percent.
Computer, reset environmental controls to standard.
Worf, it's freezing in here.
You have already raised the temperature three times. It is too hot.
Live with it. Computer, execute my original command.
I need a bath. You have the Bridge.
Here we are. Looks like a conduit ruptured. No problem, I'll just bypass it.
Reg, wait a second here. Take a look at these corroded edges here. It looks like something has dissolved the bulkhead and eaten right through the conduit. There are high levels of cholic acid here. Enzymatic agents. You know, I wouldn't be surprised if that solvent was organic.
Maybe we should run a biospectral analysis on the solvent. Take a closer look.
That's a very good idea, but first we should take a break.
You go ahead, sir. I'll take care of it.
Commander, we received a communication from Starfleet. They wanted to know when they could expect your performance analysis of the new weapon systems.
The weapon systems?
Yes, sir. The ones we've been testing for the past few days?
That's right.
What should I tell them, sir?
Tell them, tell them we haven't finished yet.
What are you doing here?
I had to be near you.
Computer, increase temperature by five degrees.
Get out of that water now.
Leave me alone!
Can I have a glass of water? It's so cold in here.
Your temperature has dropped almost eight degrees. I want to run a hypothalamic series right away.
Doctor, we've had three other crewmembers complaining about the temperature levels. Some feel like they have fevers, others are freezing like Counsellor Troi.
Call Doctor Selar and Doctor Hacopian. It looks like we've got some sort of viral infection going on around here. I want to check on Lieutenant Worf.
Worf, have you had any unusual symptoms lately? Headaches, nausea, dizziness? Worf? Worf, do you hear me? I going to run a full bioscan. I want you to lie down.  Okay, we can do this sitting up. What is this?  Worf, how long have you had this on your neck? It looks like it's full of some bioacidic compound, almost like a venom sac. Worf, open your mouth.
Get a hypospray.
Right away.
I managed to get her into stasis before the venom paralysed her. She's going to need reconstructive surgery, but I think she'll be all right.
Sir, we've analysed the venom and compared it to the acidic compound found in junction seventeen and on decks ten and twelve. They all have the same enzymatic composition.
Are you saying that Worf is spraying this
Venom.
Venom all over the ship?
I'd say so.
Sixty crewmen have begun exhibiting strange behavioural changes. Memory loss, fatigue, headaches. I think one thing is clear. There's some sort of disease aboard the Enterprise and it's spreading.
I'm having trouble concentrating myself. It's like my mind keeps wandering. I can't
Commander, I've got seven security teams out hunting for Worf, but for some reason sensors are having a difficult time locking onto him. I've called for a level two security alert. Do you think we should go to a Level One?
I don't know. What do you think?
I think we should.
Okay. Sounds good. Then you'll take care of that security thing?
Yes, sir. I will.
Okay, I'll notify Starfleet. I'll let them know what's happening. You have your orders.  Dismissed.
Computer, send a subspace message to Starfleet command. Security channel authorisation.
Alpha four seven authorisation required to activate security channel.
Computer.
Awaiting authorisation.
Captain's log, supplemental. Commander Data and I have recovered the stray torpedo after a three day search. We are enroute back to the Enterprise.
Captain, the ship is not at the pre-arranged coordinates.
Have they been delayed?
I do not know. I am unable to raise them on any communication channel.
Scan the vicinity. See if you can find them.
I found it, sir, two light years away.
Set a course.
The Enterprise appears to be adrift. I am reading power fluctuations on all decks.
Life signs?
There are life signs. However, sensor readings are highly distorted. I am unable to identify specific lifeforms.
Adjust the axial stabilisers to match the attitude and rotation rate of the Enterprise, I'm going to dock the shuttle manually.
Main power is offline. All systems are in standby or emergency mode. There is no response from any manned station.
Any sign of the crew?
I cannot access internal sensors from here. We will have to go to the Bridge.
That sounds like animals.
Yes, sir. I am able to discern over three hundred different vocalisations.
Look at this.
It is composed of reptilian DNA. I believe it is an epidermal layer that has been cast off during moulting.
But it seems to be humanoid.
Yes, sir. I cannot explain it. There are no species aboard the Enterprise that shed their skin in this fashion.
Sir.
These are Commander Troi's quarters. Can you tell if she's inside?
No, sir.
Data, I want to have a look in here. Stand ready.
The environmental settings in these quarters have been altered. Data, over here.
Deanna.
What's happened to her?
Her DNA is in a state of ribocyatic flux. Her genetic codes are being re-sequenced and her cells are mutating as a result. At a fundamental level, sir, she is no longer human.
What is she?
Her respiratory tissue has become capable of metabolising both water and air, and her eyes have developed nictitating membranes. I believe she is amphibian, sir.
She has been injured.
Yes, sir. There's Klingon DNA in the wound. It is saliva.
Are you saying she's been bitten?
It would appear so.
I will need to run a full biospectral analysis.
First we've got to get the ship under control. Let's go to the Bridge.
His upper spinal column has been broken in three places.
It looks like he's been attacked by some sort of animal.
Yes, sir.
Has his DNA been changed as well?
Yes, sir. However, it was in its initial stages when he died. Captain, I am picking up one thousand and eleven individual life forms within the ship. All exhibit a similar genetic flux to the one we observed in Counsellor Troi.
So the entire ship has been affected.
Most of the lifeforms are scattered throughout the ship. However, there are several large concentrations in the arboretum and the aquatic lab.
I've regained attitude control for the ship, but main power is still offline. It looks as though the entire power transfer grid has been destroyed.
Will?
Captain. His cranial plates have thickened by twenty percent. His brain is much smaller, sir. I do not believe he can comprehend our language.
Perhaps we can find a way to communicate. Will, can you understand what it is that
He looks almost proto-human.
Yes, sir. His DNA would seem to confirm that observation. Captain, I believe the crew is de-evolving.
This tranquilliser should keep him unconscious for another seven hours. What have you found out?
I have analysed Commander Riker's DNA structure. A synthetic T-cell has invaded his genetic codes. This T-cell has begun to activate his latent introns.
Introns?
They are genetic codes which are normally dormant. They are evolutionary holdovers, sequences of DNA that provided key behavioural and physical characteristics millions of years ago, but are no longer necessary. For instance, Counsellor Troi's gill slits and other amphibious characteristics were derived from introns which still contain amphibious codes.
So these introns are causing her DNA to re-combine in an earlier configuration?
That is correct. In her case, the DNA has created an amphibious lifeform which became extinct over fifty million years ago.
And Commander Riker's introns are changing him into what appears to be one of the earlier hominids.
Yes, sir. I would say Australopithecine. Each of these stages is another link in the evolutionary chain which stretches back to the origins of all lifeforms on Earth. Because introns can include genetic material from many different species over millions of years of evolution, it is possible that a wide variety of transformations is occurring among the crew.
What about those crewmembers who are not from Earth?
All humanoid life has a similar genetic pattern. The virus should work on non-human crewmembers in the same way. They are each de-evolving to earlier forms of life on their homeworlds. I feel I must inform you, sir, you have also been infected by the intron virus.
How long before I begin to change?
According to my calculations, within the next twelve hours, you will begin to exhibit the first signs of your eventual transformation.
And what will that be
I believe you will also de-evolve into some form of early primate. Possibly similar to a lemur, or a pygmy marmoset.
Well, before I begin swinging through the ship looking for breakfast, we'd better find some answers. How do we reverse the process?
I am uncertain. We will need to run several microcellular scans. However, the ship's main computer has been damaged. Captain, the computer in my quarters has an independent processing and memory storage unit. It should not be affected. I suggest we start from there.
Agreed.
It would appear that Spot has had her kittens.
They sound hungry.
Yes. I am curious as to why Spot is not caring for them.
It would seem the intron virus is not limited to humanoid lifeforms.
No, sir.
What is it?
These kittens were born less than twenty four hours. It would appear that Spot's transformation took place at approximately the same time.
So Spot was giving birth to the kittens at the same time that she was changing into a reptilian lifeform.
I believe so. For some reason, the intron virus was not passed on to the kittens. I do not know why.
If I remember my biology, there are several natural immune systems that come into play in the mother's womb to protect the foetus from viral infections.
That is true. Placental barrier, maternal antibodies and amniotic fluids all serve as a filtration system.
Maybe we could have inhibited the intron virus by using the natural antibodies in Spot's amniotic fluid.
It would take further research, but I believe to be effective on humanoid crewmembers, humanoid antibodies would be necessary.
Then we should locate a pregnant humanoid.
Nurse Ogawa has recently became pregnant.
Where is she?
I have traced her comm. badge signal to deck seventeen, section twenty one alpha.
The Arboretum.
One of the warp plasma vents has failed. Main Engineering has been abandoned. There is no one there to fix the problem.
I can repair the damaged plasma vent from here.
I'm going to check the status of the warp core.
Data!
What was that?
I believe it was Lieutenant Barclay. He appeared to be partially transformed into an arachnid.
A spider?
Yes, sir. Are you all right, Captain?
I have these intense feelings of fear and panic. I feel as if I were being watched. I can't explain it.
You may be experiencing the initial stages of your transformation. Early primates were often prey to larger carnivores. As a result, their instincts probably included a heightened sense of awareness.
In that case, my instincts tell me that we'd better hurry.
Captain, I have analysed Nurse Ogawa's embryo. It has been unaffected by the virus. I believe I can use her amniotic fluid as a template for a retrovirus. It would neutralise the synthetic T-cell, and re-establish the original genetic patterns of each host.
How soon can you do that?
It will not take long to isolate the appropriate genetic material. I will need to get the Sickbay computer back on
What was that?
It is large. Approximately two hundred kilograms. It is heavily armored with an exoskeleton. Life signs appear to be Klingon.
Worf.
Set your phaser to heavy stun.
We cannot be certain a stun setting will have any effect on him. A higher setting may kill him.
Listen to that. He sounds very angry, really, really aggressive. What do you think he wants? Do you think he's responding to some predatory instinct? Do you think he see us as prey?
There are crewmembers in the corridors and other sections of the ship. It would be much easier for him to capture and consume one of them, than to attempt to break through a door.
Then what does he want? Predators use vocalisations to frighten other predators and to mark territory, and to commence mating process. A mating process. Counsellor Troi was bitten by a Klingon but not in a place that might be life-threatening. Nowhere near a major artery or organ. Data, look at this. Look at this injury. This wound was never intended to give her any kind of serious harm.
Captain, what are you suggesting?
Is it possible that Worf could see Counsellor Troi as his mate?
If that is true, he must be trying to reach her now.
Well, we can't just leave. We have to stay here and protect her. And we have to keep on working on the retrovirus. If we could distract him, if we could lure him away from her.
The mating instinct is quite strong in Klingon biology. I am not certain what would be an effective lure.
Klingons have got a very powerful sense of smell. If we could duplicate Deanna's pheromones and then convince him she's no longer in Sickbay, that she'd gone into some other part of the ship.
I am extracting a blood sample from one of her sebaceous glands, where the pheromones are produced. I believe I can activate the pheromones with a bioactivant solution.
Can you amplify the pheromones? They need to be much more powerful than Deanna's actual scent.
I believe this will produce the desired effect. I will use it to draw Worf to a another part of the ship.
No, no, no. You must go on working on the retrovirus. I'll go.
Captain, that is extremely unwise. Worf may be much faster than
No time. No time to argue.
Deck seventeen. Deck seventeen!
Computer, display progress of genetic re-sequencing.
Genetic re-sequencing in progress. DNA to seventy percent normal.
Computer, increase nucleotide substitution by thirty two percent.
Data to Captain Picard.
Go ahead, Data.
The retro virus is working, sir.
I can release it into the ship's atmosphere in a gaseous state.
However it will take some time to take effect.
Acknowledged.
Are you all right, sir?
Yes, I'm
Fine, Mister Data. Proceed.  Well, Mister Worf, let's hope that when you wake up, you're a new man.
Captain's log, supplemental. Commander Data has succeeded in returning the crew to normal. Doctor Crusher has determined that the synthetic T-cell she used to cure Mister Barclay's Urodelan flu initiated the intron virus which swept through the ship.
So, this is my fault?
No. In a way it's mine. I didn't realise it at the time, but there's an anomaly in your genetic chemistry that caused the synthetic T-cell to mutate. Instead of activating one dormant gene, it started activating all of them, including your introns.
And that's what er, and that's what caused me to devolve?
You and every other member of the crew. The T-cell became airborne and started to spread like a virus. You know, Reg, this is a completely new disease, and it's traditional to classify a new disease with the name of the first diagnosed patient.
Oh! You mean you want to name the disease after me?
That's right. How about Barclay's Protomorphosis Syndrome?
Barclay's Protomorphosis. It has a nice ring to it. Thank you, Doctor.
He transformed into a spider and now he has a disease named after him.
I think I'd better clear my calendar for the next few weeks.
Data to Enterprise.
Go ahead, Mister Data.
This will be the last trip, sir.
The remaining cases of hytritium are now being loaded.
Acknowledged. Mister Worf, advise Beta Agni Two that our departure is imminent.
Aye, Captain.
At warp six, we should be there in just over sixteen hours.
Loading is complete. I am proceeding with departure. Enterprise shuttlebay two, prepare for docking, level one precautions for incoming material remain in effect.
If you'll just acknowledge this last load, Commander>
Twenty six point eight kilos of tripolymer composites. Eleven point eight kilos of molybdenum-cobalt alloy. One point three kilos Bioplast sheeting.
Shuttle twelve containment field reads nominal. Now leaving the Jovis.
On viewer.
Containment field stable. Gravitational fluctuations within acceptable parameters. Flight pattern
Data.
Captain's log, supplemental. As the result of a yet unexplained shuttle explosion, Lieutenant Commander Data has been lost.
Why didn't the containment field hold?
Unknown, Commander.
Hail the Jovis. I want to speak with Kivas Fajo.
Sir, Mister Fajo is hailing us.
On viewer.
Captain Picard, what happened?
It's unclear. We're running a full analysis.
We detected no malfunctions before the explosion. Everything seemed to be running as smoothly as the other flights. Were you able to save the pilot?
No.
I'm sorry.
Mister Fajo, I would like to analyse your sensor readings of the explosion.
Compared to the Enterprise's, our sensors are rather primitive. I doubt they contain any information that your sensors overlooked.
Perhaps, but I don't want to leave any avenue unexplored.
I understand. We'll transmit the information.
Link established. Receiving.
Can we be of any further assistance?
How much hytritium did we manage to bring on board?
Eighty one kilos.
That will barely allow us to complete our mission, Captain, but it leaves us no margin for error.
Mister Fajo, I realise we have acquired your complete supply of hytritium. Do you know where we could obtain some more?
That may be difficult. The only source I know is in the Sigma Erani system.
Three weeks away, sir.
And I can't guarantee they'll have any. For obvious reasons, no one wants to keep it around. In fact, even I may stop selling it. It's just too dangerous.
I guess we're fortunate you had any at all, sir.
Captain, transfer of information complete.
Mister Fajo, thank you for your help.
Mister Crusher, set a course for the Beta Agni Two system, warp six.
Aye, sir.
The Grissom is near the Sigma Erani system. I'll alert them to stand by in case we need more hytritium.
Thank you, Number One.
Course laid in, sir.
Engage.
What am I doing here?
Wondrous. The detail. The balance. Was I not right, Varria? What a remarkable piece of work.
Why have I been brought here?
The voice simulation. it's perfection. The inflections, the timing.
It took great effort. Effort. to bring you here. I was sure he'd be worth it. I was right.
I've been delivered here against my wishes. I would like to know the reason.
Certainly. You have been brought here for my enjoyment and my appreciation.
Am I to infer that you intend to keep me captive?
Captive? Captive? That's such an inappropriate description. My dear android. May I call you Data?
It is my name.
Data. You will be catered to, fawned over, cared for as you never have been before. Your every wish will be fulfilled
I wish to leave.
Almost every wish.
This is unacceptable, sir. I have no desire to remain here and even if I did, my Starfleet duties would not allow it.
It's so single minded, isn't it?
Very persistent.
But it's very polite, which is a very nice touch. I decline to allow you to go.
Then I am forced to attempt escape.
Ten androids just like you might be able to force that thing open. But then again, there aren't any more just like you, are there? It's keyed to galvanic skin responses and DNA patterns. Sorry.
Then you will have to open it for me.
Oh. Really, I wouldn't do that again if I were you. This is a proximity-actuated field. It impedes positron flow. It's very bad for the brainpaths in the long term.
I fail to understand the value you place on my presence.
Well, just look around the room. There are items her gathered from half the galaxy. Right here. This is the very first Basotile ever created.  Sorry.  It's very, very ancient. Hundreds of years old. It's priceless.
Come. This vase is made by Mark, the late Mark Off-Zel from Sirrie Four.  Dali. This is the only known Roger Maris trading card from Earth circa 1962. The smell? Bubblegum. I've preserved the scent. What? A Lapling.
I thought they were extinct.
Extinct? Good. That is what is generally believed. She is the last surviving member of her species. They're very defenseless creatures, really. Everything that you see in the room here, everything. One of its kind. Unique. All original. Just as you are. There.  That is your place of honour. Sit, sit. Sit! You think perhaps it might be uncomfortable? But then again, you don't give a thought to comfort, do you.  When Palor Toff learns of that, he'll swallow his tongue with envy. I can't wait to see his face. You are the crown jewel of my collection. You're a treasure beyond comparison.
Yes, go ahead.
I think you should be flattered.
I am not, sir. Most intelligent lifeforms find involuntary confinement offensive and inequitable. Moreover, you have violated Federation law
I know, I know. What I've done is evil, selfish, immoral, unprincipled, illegal. Well, I've learned to live with it.
The Andorians wish to make a bid on the shipment of Tellurian spices you offered.
They've had four days to decide! Why do they have to decide right! Sorry.
I must emphasize, Mister Fajo, that I consider this captivity a hostile act on your part.
You'll get used to it.
I can't believe he's gone.
I always thought he'd outlive us, by centuries.
He'd been working on this for months. He never felt it was quite finished.
You know what a critic Data was, especially about his own work.
That was a gift from the Captain.
And he should have it back.
Those should go to Commander Riker.
Data always fell for Riker's bluffs.
These are some of Starfleet's highest honours.
Not bad for a walking pile of circuitry and memory cells.
You know, I keep going over and over the accident in my mind, trying to figure out what went wrong. I can see Data in the shuttle, almost like I'm sitting there next to him going through the departure sequence. What the hell happened? Why didn't I see it coming? What am I missing?
Kivas wishes you to wear this set of clothes, and to sit in your chair.
I have no reason to accede to Mister Fajo's wishes.
He will give you reasons if you force him to.
Mister Fajo is deluding himself if he believes he can keep me here. The Enterprise is certain to find me.
They're not even looking for you. They think you're destroyed. Your shuttle blew up. A hytritium explosion.
They will scan the debris and discover I was not aboard.
They'll find exactly what they thought they'd find. Traces of your component elements. We put them aboard the shuttle in just the right proportions.
Clearly, Mister Fajo has no moral difficulty with my imprisonment here.
Mister Fajo has no moral difficulties at all.
Do you?
Clever, android. Is it part of your programme to seek out vulnerabilities in your enemies?
Yes. Are you my enemy?
I obey Fajo. And so does everyone on this ship.
Why?
You are a curious thing, aren't you?
Do you object to the question?
Kivas finds a way to get what he wants from his people. His rewards for loyalty are lavish. His punishments for disloyalty are equally lavish. You won't find anyone here on this ship to help you escape. Face it, android. He has you.
It appears he has us both.
The reason I can't find anything is that there's nothing there to find. I've run this analysis dozens of times over and there's just no indication of any malfunction.
No possible explanation at all?
Yeah, there's one, but I don't believe it. Pilot error.
I know it's hard to accept, but even the best
Captain, it's not only hard to accept, with Data it's impossible. I mean, I can't even begin to calculate the odds. If Data were here, we could ask him.
What are you suggesting, Lieutenant?
I don't know, sir. It just doesn't make sense, and I like things to make sense, that's all.
Geordi, maybe if you get a little rest and came at this thing fresh.
A little rest isn't going to change the computer analysis, Commander.
I'm sure you have done a complete investigation, and if you wish to continue it, of course you have my support. But we shall be reaching the Beta Agni system shortly, and I expect you to be rested.
I understand, sir.
Dismissed. Geordi, I understand how much we want, even need, to explain an accident like this. Sometimes there just aren't any explanations.
For an android with no feelings, he sure managed to evoke them in others.
We must select an officer to replace Data at Ops. Recommendations?
Worf would be my first choice, sir.
Mine as well. Make it so.
He was a man, taken for all in all. I shall not look upon his like again.
You are still wearing that uniform. Why?
I am a Starfleet officer.
You are not in Starfleet any longer. It's time you adjusted your programme to accept reality.
Even if I chose to do so, it is doubtful that my programming could be sufficiently altered to accede to your wishes.
Oh?
I have been designed with a fundamental respect for life in all its forms and a strong inhibition against causing harm to living beings.
What a marvellous contradiction. A military pacifist. Tell me, whose dreadful decision was it to enlist you in Starfleet to begin with?
My skills seemed appropriate
Data, Data, Data. Big mistake. A grievous error. You belong in Starfleet about as much as I belong in a verbal contract. Tell me, have you killed yet?
No, but I am programmed with the ability to use deadly force in the cause of defense.
Shame on you. Shame on you. How neatly you rationalise your capabilities. How can you just casually accept your role in murder?
I would not participate in murder. Perhaps you misunderstand.
Can't you see how much better it will be for you right here? The intellectual rewards alone. Our personal exploration of the galaxy. I am at war with no one. I am your liberator.
You are a fine debater, sir. It is a pity you have used your verbal gifts for mere hucksterism and the advancement of your own greed.
Perhaps. Perhaps you would not judge me so harshly if you knew of my desperate youth, wasted, wasted on the streets of Zimballia.
Your past does not excuse unethical or immoral behaviour, sir.
Well, it doesn't matter. It isn't true anyway. My father was quite wealthy, actually. He was a thief. Data, why don't you put on these lovely new clothes and sit on the chair.
I must decline.
You are going to be much more of a challenge than I had first thought.  Finoplak, one hundred denkirs.  Now, Data, in the meantime, here is something for your logic circuits to analyse.
Oh, don't worry. The solvent won't harm your, your skin. But in seconds it will completely dissolve that uniform. Personally, I'd be delighted to see you go around naked. I assume you have no modesty. But, then, I guess that decency is the rule of your Starfleet training. In any case, Data, why don't you make a decision about which alternative you dislike the least. Make a decision by dinnertime tonight. I have invited a guest to meet you, and I expect you to be as entertaining with him as you have been with me.
Proceeding with departure. Enterprise shuttlebay two, prepare for docking. Level one precautions remain in effect.
I did miss something.
See you later.  Your first watch at Ops?
I have served at the position before.
I've been concerned about you.
About me? Why?
Because I know how I'd feel if I was asked to replace Data at his station.
Bridge. Promotion due to the death of a crewmate is commonplace on Klingon ships.
I know, but this isn't a Klingon ship and Data was your friend. And it's the second time you've replaced a crewmate who's died.
I honour Data's memory, as I did Lieutenant Yar's, by attempting to perform their duties as well as they did.
In true Klingon fashion.
I appreciate your concern.
Computer, now replay shuttle audio transmission time index zero four two three. This is Data's second trip.
Proceeding with departure. Enterprise shuttlebay two, prepare for docking. Level one precautions remain in effect. Shuttle has cleared the Jovis cargo bay.
Sounds just like the first trip.
Exactly the same. That's protocol. And that's Data. Following protocol to the letter. Okay, computer, now replay shuttle audio transmission, time index zero four three nine. Third and final trip.
Loading is complete. I am proceeding with departure. Enterprise shuttlebay two, prepare for docking. Level one precautions remain in effect.
That's it. That's the last communication.
He didn't report the shuttle clearing the cargo bay of the Jovis.
Of course, there really wasn't any reason for him to make voice contact. He knew we'd be monitoring his position. Any other pilot might not bother, but Data? not following standard procedures?
What do you think it means?
I'm not sure, Wes. I suppose he could've been too busy. Maybe he saw something was wrong.
Without communicating it? That doesn't sound like Data either.
Which means maybe something was wrong with him. But there's no other indication of that. Nothing he said or did during the entire mission. None. I sure wish I could talk to the last people who saw him alive.
I've added a Veltan sex idol to my collection.
I've got four of them.
What? With the pearls intact?
Please. Pearls were added by the Ferengi agents to increase the value.
What is that? Something new? And you didn't tell me.
Mister Data, I'm delighted to see that you dressed for the occasion. Say hello to my very good friend, Palor Toff.
Data, say hello. No need to be shy.
It's a mannequin of some sort.
This is not a mannequin. This is Data. This is formerly Lieutenant Commander Data of the Federation Starfleet. The only sentient android in existence.
It doesn't seem particularly sentient right now.
That's because it's playing a stupid little game with us.
Well, someone has certainly played a game on you, Fajo.
I don't find this amusing. I demand that you behave normally. Behave normally! I know you can hear me!
He falls well.
I apologize for this.
Do not be upset, my friend. I'm having a delightful visit. Come along, Varria. You're much more fun to play with than Fajo's new toy.
You'll regret this.
Now entering the Beta Agni system, sir.
Take us to half impulse, Mister Crusher.
La Forge to bridge.
Go ahead, Commander.
Captain.
A class two probe has been loaded with the hytritium compound and is ready to launch.
Now approaching Beta Agni Two, sir.
Mister Crusher, put us into close orbit. Mister Data, scan. My apologies, Mister Worf. Scan the colony's subsurface water.
Scanning. Tricyanate contamination confirmed. Levels approaching forty two parts per million.
Area affected?
Thirty square kilometres.
Any indication of the source?
Highest concentration eight kilometres west of the colony.
Adjust target coordinates.
Aye, sir.
La Forge to bridge.
According to these figures, the eighty one kilos
Of hytritium should be enough to neutralise the contamination.
Now approaching target coordinates.
Launch probe.
Probe on target. Hytritium entering water table. Disbursement slightly faster than expected. Sir, something unusual.
Specify.
I'm getting concentrated tricyanate readings of seventy grams per cubic centimetre at the source coordinates. Much higher than would normally occur.
Computer, report on geologic instability on Beta Agni Two.
No significant geological activity has been recorded on Beta Agni Two since the settlement of the Federation colony.
Number One, perhaps you'd better take an away team down and have a closer look.
Yes, sir. Doctor Crusher, join me in Transporter room three.
On my way.
Mister Worf?
I would very much like our relationship to change.
You may expect me to use every means at my disposal to resist your wishes.
Why can't you just comply? Why do you argue all the time? Couldn't you just go sit on the chair? Come on. Go on, sit on the chair.
I do not intend to sit in the chair.
You will. You may believe it right now, but you will.
Have you ever seen one of these, Data?
It is a disruptor.
Well, no. It's a prototype for a Varon-T disruptor.
The Varon-T disruptor is banned in the Federation.
Oh, yes. They only manufactured five of them. I own four. I sleep with one under my pillow at night, and I sleep very well knowing it's there too. Do you know why?
It is a most lethal weapon.
It's not just lethal. It's vicious. It tears a body apart, inside out, and very slowly too by your phaser standards. It's tortuous. A very, very painful death. I've always wanted to try this.
It is doubtful you will destroy me since you assign so much value to possessing me.
That goes without saying. Please come in.
Varria, how long have we been together, my dear?
Fourteen years.
Fourteen wonderful years they were too. She was barely an adult when I found her. She was idealistic, naive, full of dreams. And I made those dreams come true, too, didn't I? I'm going to miss you.
Fajo.
The contamination's been neutralised. The water's clean.
Curious. The process of neutralisation should have taken several hours. Naturally occurring tricyanate does not respond this quickly.
Are you saying it's not naturally occurring?
There are no natural trace elements present in these tricyanate crystals.
If it's artificial, then we're talking about sabotage.
With tricyanate? That's hard to believe. It's slow to assimilate, difficult to replicate, and hard to transport. There are a lot easier ways to poison a water supply. More effective ways too.
Can you think of any reason a saboteur would choose tricyanate?
It might pass for a natural disaster. And since there's only one way to treat it, with hytritium, maybe somebody figured we couldn't locate it. It is hard to find.
Then it really was lucky, wasn't it, that we were able to find hytritium when we did. And just enough hytritium for this crisis?
Fajo was in the right place at the right time just when we needed him most.
You're suggesting he created the problem just to solve it?
Possibly.
What, to make a profit from his sale of hytritium?
It doesn't add up. The cost of producing tricyanate is very expensive. He wouldn't make a profit on it. Quite the contrary.
Then, why would he do it?
What could he want?
Computer, biographical file on trader Kivas Fajo.
Accessing file Kivas Fajo. A Zibalian trader of the Stacius trade guild, educated on Iraaten Five. A noted collector of rare and valuable objects including the Rejac Crystal, the Starry Night by Van Gogh, the Lawmim Galactopedia, the Moliam Andi tapestries
Computer, that is sufficient.
A rare and valuable object?
What if Data wasn't on that shuttle?
Mister Crusher.
Aye, sir.
Set course for the site of the shuttlepod explosion. Warp eight.
Aye, sir.
The Jovis has a maximum speed of warp three. He's had twenty three hours so we can define a perimeter of point one oh two light years as his possible distance.
Fajo doesn't know that we're onto him, so he probably isn't taxing his engines at top speed.
He could have made it to the Nel Bato system, or maybe even the Giles Belt.
He's a trader. He doesn't attract customers by being hard to find.
We could put out a coded level two query to all Federation outposts within the perimeter.
Make it so.
If I help you escape, will you take me with you? He's sleeping, and there isn't much time.
The consequences if we are caught
I know the consequences. Fourteen years. You learn a few things. There's an escape pod in the aft cargo bay.
Captain, affirmative response from station Lya Four.
Fajo spent more than half a day in orbit. Departed just over seven hours ago.
Mister Crusher, new coordinates. Lay in a course for Lya Four.
Coordinates already laid in, sir.
Perhaps I should attempt to communicate with the Enterprise.
You can't. Fajo has communications access restricted to the bridge. Once we're out, the shuttlepod will emit an emergency beacon. We'll just have to hope somebody responds before Fajo is able to destroy us.
I am trained in evasive manoeuvres.
We'll need a few. Let's get going. As soon as I start the escape sequence, an alarm will sound. We won't have much time.
It's your fault. You knew the price for disobedience. And so did she. Well, there's always another Varria.
You won't hurt me. Fundamental respect for all living beings. That is what you said. I'm a living being, therefore you can't harm me.
You will surrender yourself to the authorities.
Or what? You'll fire? Empty threat and we both know it. Why don't you accept your fate? You will return to your chair and you will sit there. You will entertain me and you will entertain my guests. And if you do not, I will simply kill somebody else. Him, perhaps. It doesn't matter. Their blood will be on your hands too, just like poor Varria's. Your only alternative, Data, is to fire. Murder me. That's all you have to do. Go ahead. Fire. If only you could feel rage over Varria's death. If only you could feel the need for revenge, then maybe you could fire. But you're just an android. You can't feel anything, can you? It's just another interesting intellectual puzzle for you. Another of life's curiosities.
I cannot permit this to continue.
Wait. Your programme won't allow you to fire. You cannot fire. No.
O'BRIEN:I'm reading a weapon in transit with Commander Data. It seems to have discharged, sir.
Discharged?
O'BRIEN:I'm deactivating it.
Welcome back, Mister Data. Are you all right?
Yes, Commander. Please arrange to take Kivas Fajo into custody on charges of murder, kidnapping, theft.
The arrangements have already been made.
A Varon-T disruptor. It belongs to Fajo.
Mister O'Brien says the weapon was in a state of discharge.
Perhaps something occurred during transport, Commander.
Oh, have you come to see me to repent? Is this your final satisfaction? Want to see me beg for mercy? You're not going to get any of that from me.
I expected nothing.
Our roles are reversed, aren't they, Data? You're the collector now. Me, I'm in a cage.
So it seems.
Just don't count me out too quickly. I had you in my collection once. I can have you there again.
Unlikely, sir. Your collection has been confiscated. All of your stolen possessions are being returned to their rightful owners. You have lost everything you value.
It must give you great pleasure.
No, sir, it does not. I do not feel pleasure. I am only an android.
Riker says the planet's life forms are almost identical to us.
He's very enthusiastic.
Captain? Sorry, Troi.
The Doctor has something very important to tell you, Captain.
You've been talking about it for days. Shore leave for the crew.
Establishing that colony has been exhausting for the entire crew, Captain. We're not a supply vessel. Settling all those people has been a strain on everyone. I'm tired myself.
Is it as good as your report suggests, Number One?
As per report, sir. Class M, Earth-like, beautiful. It will startle you.
It sounds wonderful for the children. The holodecks are marvellous, of course, but there's nothing like open spaces and fresh air.
I've listed my report on their customs and laws, sir. Fairly simple, common sense things.
They're wild in some ways, actually puritanical in others. Neat as pins, ultra-lawful, and make love at the drop of a hat.
Any hat.
But the happiest report has its negatives. Let's start with them, Number One.
There are none, sir. Not that any of us can find.
But there is a problem here, sir.
It's the faulty reading I reported, sir.
I'm reading something off the starboard bow, but there is nothing there.
Sensor technicians are working on it, sir. They've identified it as a glitch in the system.
I take it you find no glitch at all in this planet, however?
No, sir.
If you approve shore leave, sir, we could start with a small group.
Of course. Wesley? If we go down, I'd like you to join the away team to evaluate this world as a place for young people to relax.
Yes, sir.
If our scans and observations confirm the report, of course I'll approve it. Let's hope it is not too good to be true.
Captain's log, supplemental. We are in orbit of a planet designated Rubicun Three, the home of a life form who call themselves the Edo. Our away team, including Wesley Crusher, has beamed down to make arrangements concerning some well-deserved recreation.
Careful, sir.
No, it's all right, Lieutenant. Those are the Edo we met before. They certainly are fit.
They certainly are.
Health and happiness.
A pleasant day to you.
You did return as promised.
Rivan, Liator. Also from our vessel, Troi.
Slowly, slowly. I must also welcome this lovely one.
Nice to see you again.
My pleasure.
Counsellor?
Healthy sensuality, sir. I feel mainly friendship, and  happiness.
And I welcome this huge one. Oh, yes.
Nice planet.
Yeah.
But you are a young one. I do not know your custom regarding love.
Er. I guess, whatever you usually do.
There are others who would like to visit here, if you would give us a limit on the numbers.
Whatever pleases you. We can discuss it at the Council Chambers.
Shall we go there now or remain in play?
Play?
At love. Unless you don't enjoy that.  Perhaps you do?
And you?  Yes, I can see that you do.
Maybe I should just go on ahead.
Oh, this is unfair to him. We'll go to the Council Chambers. You'll find young people your age there.
Well, I can't make any promises.
You don't have to. Our rules are simple. No one does anything uncomfortable to them.
Come! Our people will want to know you.
Rivan, perhaps they can't run.
Can't run? Sure we can run. Right, Commander?
That's the custom here, running. Lead the way.
When in Rome, eh?
When in where, sir?
Good health to you!
Happiness to you! It's like an Eden here.
Good health! I thought you might be out of breath.
We may surprise you in a lot of ways.
Children, we've brought you a new friend!
Well, hello. Join us.
Yes, please.
And now it's time for you to meet some new friends.
Everyone! We've brought the visitors!
Please enjoy what we have!
I've traced it through our sensor channel, sir It is not a glitch or any other form of error or malfunction.
Confirmed by my readings, Captain. It's a shadow something.
Exactly. As if it were neither in or out of our dimension.
What is, Commander?
Whatever is sitting out there without triggering our alarm relays, sir.
Centre main viewer on that area. I see nothing, Commander.
Enterprise to object off our starboard bow. Request that you identify yourself.
Shields and deflectors up full, sir. Main phaser banks ready.
Hailing frequencies. Any reply?
It was something unintelligible, Captain. Now running it through language and logic circuits.
Geordi.
Sir.
Have a real look.
Aye, sir.
Sir, my sensors read it. Well, it's half there. It does look as if it were partly transparent.
Data, what the hell is it?
Lieutenant La Forge to Captain.
Go ahead, LaForge. What can you make out?
This is something I've never seen before, sir. After complete spectral analysis, well it's as if it's not really there.
I don't understand it.
I've got some information on its first transmission, sir. It translates as stand by.
Sir, I see show something coming out of that ship.
Verified, sir. Something very small.
Intruder alert, sir. I don't show a location.
The away team signal's been cut off, Captain. We've lost contact with our people.
Intruder relays do show something.
Why has everything become a something, or a whatever?
State the purpose.  State the purpose of what you have done.
I'm Captain Picard, commanding this Federation starship.
State the purpose of your visit here.
We have sent down what we call an away team to make peaceful contact here.
Do you plan to leave life forms here?
No. We are merely visiting here.
But you did more at the world you just left. Why have you left your own life forms there?
The colony we just planted, sir.
We found that world uninhabited. The life forms we left there had, had sought the challenge. At least, that is the basic reason. Had sought the challenge of creating a new lifestyle, a new society there. Life on our world is driven to protect itself by seeding itself as widely as possible.
Do not interfere with my children below.
Captain, I do not understand how, but it is asking me if I was constructed for information exchange.
If there is any way of finding out whatever is out there, Data.
Watch! I bet you can't do this!
Watch this.
I want to do something too. With you.
Er. What?
It's something you can teach me. Will you?
Er. Well, actually, there are some games I don't quite know yet
It's playing ball. Will you teach me?
Oh, sure! If you have a bat for the ball, I can show you my favourite. A bat? A stick or branch, about this thick, this long.
We can get it in the gardens. Come on.
This will please you. Join us.
Thanks. Another time.
Joy and happiness.
It certainly is. The good life, Worf.
I am not concerned with pleasure, Commander. I am a warrior.
Even Klingons need love now and then.
For what we consider love, sir, I would need a Klingon woman.
What about plain old basic sex? You must have some need for that.
Of course, but with the females available to me, sir, Earth females, I must restrain myself too much. They are quite fragile, sir.
Worf, if anyone else had said that, I'd suspect he was bragging.
Bragging, sir?
I think I'll pass on that. I'd better check in. Enterprise, come in. Captain, do you read me? Let's. This may be nothing, but let's move all our people together.
Including Wesley, the boy? He's outside.
Is there a problem?
We've lost contact with our ship.
It's nothing these people have done. I'm certain of that. Their minds are so open.
Help me locate Wes. He's wandered off.
That is extraordinary.
Can I take a moment of your time, Lieutenant?
Yes, Worf, but you've got to hear this. Are you telling me that there's no crime here whatsoever? No one breaks any laws?
Once they did. Long, long ago there was much disorder. But not now.
But I seen no sign of police. Those who enforce laws.
Oh, we have very few. They are called Mediators. And they are needed only in one place each day.
The punishment zone. An area that's selected for a period of time.
It's a completely random selection?
No one but our Mediators know what place or for how long. We're very proud of the wisdom of our ancestors. No person ever knows where or when a zone will be.
And so no one risks death.
Death?
by breaking any law.
Wait. Explain this.
Only one punishment for any crime.
Anyone who commits any crime in the punishment zone dies?
The law is the law. Our peace is built on that.
Even a small thing? Such as ignoring the rule, keep off the grass?
Then no one breaks that rule. Who wants to risk execution? And there's always a white wall or fence to remind anyone of a forbidden area like that.
And just who tells visitors about these rules?
We'd better find Wesley.
You're very clever at this.
At home we play a lot of it. Here, toss the ball ahead of me.
No, Wes!
No! It's forbidden to disturb new plants!
Couldn't you see the fence? It's for new plants. Don't ever go past a white marker.
It's okay. I'm fine.
Oh, no! Oh, please, no!
MEDIATOR 2:Speak the truth. We are mediators.
I said I was fine.
He doesn't know. He's from another place.
MEDIATOR 2:How very sad. But this zone has been selected.
But he doesn't understand.
It's always sad. Now doubly so.
I was chasing a ball and I fell into that. I'm really sorry!
You admit you did that? Freely?
I'm with Starfleet. We don't lie.
It won't happen again. We apologise.
We're sorry, too. But that changes nothing.
Careful, Commander. They've got some strange laws here.
I thought you reviewed their laws.
But they listed nothing about punishment.
One moment, please. Is there a witness to this transgression?
But it was my fault. I threw the ball past him.
We have a visible transgression, ample witnesses, and an admission of guilt. And though it deeply pains us to do it, we must.
Are you prepared for punishment?
Punishment? If you mean what the others were talking about.
What punishment? Name it!
Death, of course. Don't make it difficult for the boy.
Drop it. Drop it now!
It's a kind of syringe.
What is this? You said death. Is this poison?
But of course it is. Completely painless. The boy would have felt nothing. But look at him now. You've frightened him.
He was going to kill me?
MEDIATOR 2:And if this Zone were still in effect, you would all deserve death.
It was announced you came as friends. Is this how friends act?
Enterprise from away team, come in. Are you receiving us, Enterprise?
Condition?
No sign of consciousness, but the balance of the readings are quite normal for him.
I believe this is some form of information exchange with whatever is over there. At least, I hope it is.
Any communication from the away team?
Something is blocking communication both
Security. Urgent. Repeating. Enterprise from away team.
This is the Enterprise, Lieutenant. We're receiving you now.
This is an urgent call for Captain Picard.
We may need your presence here, Captain. We have serious trouble with a member of our away team and an unusual law they have here.
Captain to Riker, stand by. Signs of consciousness?
Not yet. Could be minutes or hours. It's unclear what's happened to him.
Take him to Sickbay. Let me know the instant he's awake. Anything new on that that thing out there?
Negative, sir.
Captain to First Officer. I'm beaming down.
Would you care to comment privately how you read any of this?
Unnecessary, sir. These people are honest, almost to a fault. And they have great pride in their ways.
You're the Captain. We're ready. This way, please.
Welcome to our world, Captain.
Thank you.
We regret that our system of justice is troubling you.
The boy, Wesley Crusher, where is he, please?
In accord with the Prime Directive, I've allowed them to hold him pending the outcome of this.
He is safe and unharmed. We promise that. Captain Picard, I do not know how you Earth people conduct law and justice, even if you respect such things.
We do.
Good, so do we. Our precepts have been handed down from long ago. The tranquillity you see in our lives has been made possible by our laws.
We are a people of law. They do sometimes bring us sadness, but we have learned to adjust to that. Perhaps your laws work as well.
They haven't always, but now they do.
Do you execute criminals?
No, not any longer.
But you did once?
Unfortunately, yes. But since then
But when you did, was it believed necessary to do so?
Some people felt that it was necessary. But we have learned to detect the seeds of criminal behaviour Capital punishment, in our world, is no longer considered a justifiable deterrent.
So, we are not yet as advanced as they are. And since you are advanced in other ways too, I suggest you use your superior powers to rescue the Wesley boy. We will record him as a convicted criminal out of our reach, an advanced person who luckily escaped the barbarism of this backward little world.
Unfortunately, we have a law known as the Prime Directive.
Riker has explained it to us.
Is the boy in any danger from you at this moment?
Until sundown?
Because you are strangers, we are delaying enforcement of the law. But we must act by sundown.
Then I have another question. While orbiting, while circling high above your world, as we do, we have encountered a strange object. A vessel perhaps. Have you any idea what it is? It's not entirely real. At least, it's not completely solid.
Do you mean God?
God?
God is said to be somewhere up there, protecting us.
Exactly, exactly how would you describe God?
As you just did. As existing both here and in another place also.
But when God wants to show its power, it can make itself felt most fully.
Captain, come in please.
Picard here.
CMO Crusher, sir.
Commander Data has just regained consciousness.
What condition? Can he talk?
He's insisting on it, sir. Urgently.
Wesley.
Stand by. Picard out. I want to speak to her personally about her son. So you promise that Wesley Crusher is safe until sundown?
You have our word.
Then, will one of you return with me to our vessel?
Of course. I'll go as a hostage for the boy's safety.
No, no, no. That's not it. I want you to identify something for me, if you can. Captain to Transporter Room. Three to beam up.
I'm frightened.
There's no reason to be.
Transporter Room, energise.
But this is a city. A great city.
Captain, I've just seen the away team report about Wesley.
In a moment, Doctor.
In a moment?
Exactly. In a moment. You were about to say?
Since you have all this power, why be concerned about our laws? You could take the boy from us.
It's not that simple. From the starboard lounge, you can see whatever is outside this vessel.
Do you mean my world? You said we'd be high above it.
And something else that's circling your world. It's very important to us, and perhaps to you, to know what it is.
I'm sorry, Rivan, but this was necessary. Do you know what that is?
Can you tell us what it is?
Is it God?  Now, it's very important you answer something. How do you recognise what it is?
Nothing will harm you, I promise. Just tell us how you recognise it.
It has appeared before.
Can you speak to it? Does it speak to you?
Captain!
Return my child.
Return?
It's coming toward us.
Picard to Transporter Room, come in.
Yes, do that. But hurry!
It's still coming toward us.
Transporter Chief to Captain.
One to beam down to away team location. Hurry! Engage! Transporter Room. Urgent! Engage!
It seems the Edo's god is very protective of its children.
I had no choice but to learn about that thing from her. I'm sorry I had to. She was so frightened.
It's understandable, sir. Sharing an orbit with God is no small experience.
Let's go see your patient, Doctor.
What do you intend to do about my son?
He's being held safely until sundown.
When he faces execution! Although he's committed no crime, certainly none that any sane and reasonable person would
You saw what that thing was about to do.
I apologise, sir, but this is very difficult for me. If he were your son, you'd be as frightened
But I am.
Data is in Sickbay here. You'll find him able to talk to you.
He's checking out fine, Doctor.
Thank you. Finish it later, please.
I was an excellent choice for them, Captain. They were able to communicate with me quite. I was about to say quite easily, but there was nothing easy about it. Fortunately, they stopped short of overloading my circuitry.
You're saying they. It is a vessel of some sort.
Definitely not a single entity if that's what you mean, sir, although they know the Edo worship them as a god thing.
They know?
They recognise that this is quite expected and harmless at the present Edo stage of evolution.
What sort of vessel?
It is perhaps not what we would understand as a vessel, sir. The dimensions this one occupies allows them to be, well, to be in several places at once. But they consider this entire star cluster to be theirs. It was probably unwise of us to attempt to place a human colony in this area. Of course, there are three thousand four other planets in this star cluster in which we could have colonised. The largest and closest
Data, don't babble.
Babble, sir? I'm not aware that I ever babble, sir. It may be that from time to time I have considerable information to communicate, and you may question the way I organise it.
Please, organise it into brief answers to my questions. We have very little time. Do they accept our presence at this planet?
Undecided, sir.
Data, please, feel free to volunteer any important information.
I volunteer that they are now observing us, sir.
To judge what kind of life forms we are?
No, it is more curiosity, sir. I doubt that they expect us to abide by their value systems.
Do they know of our Prime Directive?
They know everything I know, sir.
And, if we were to violate the Prime Directive, how
That's not a fair question.
How would they react?
It would be a case of judging us by our own rules, sir. If we violate our own Prime Directive, they might consider us to be deceitful and untrustworthy. You do recall they cautioned us not to interfere with their children below. What has happened?
The Edo want to execute my son. I will not allow that to happen, Jean-Luc.
Most interesting, sir. The emotion of motherhood, compared to all others felt by
Shut up!
You were right, sir. I do tend to babble.
Captain's log, stardate 41255.9. Whatever the object or vessel in orbit with us, it hangs there like a nemesis. It is one thing to communicate with something mysterious, but it is quite another to be silently observed by it. I am concerned whether it understands the same concept of reason that we do?
You sent for me, sir?
Let's have more talk, Data.
Yes, sir.
Sit down.
What level of communication, sir?
Any. My apologies for saying that you babbled.
But I do, sir.
You also see things in a way we do not, but as they truly are. I need help, my friend. I cannot permit that boy or any member of this vessel be sacrificed. The Prime Directive never intended that.
The problem, sir, is there.  Although they've learned of the Prime Directive from my mind, how will they evaluate it? How do they reason? What are their values? Remember their warning to us, sir.
Exactly. How do I explain my refusing to obey their laws down there. Not permitting the Crusher boy to be executed. And by so doing do I endanger this vessel and more than a thousand other lives?
Would you choose one life over one thousand, sir?
I refuse to let arithmetic decide questions like that. Did you learn anything about the relationship between that and the Edo? Why are they so certain it's a god?
Any sufficiently advanced life form would appear to others to be that, sir. But when they were probing my thoughts, Captain, I could feel that whatever they are now, they once existed in this dimension, just as we do. Perhaps in the same kind of flesh and blood form. Since then, however, they have evolved considerably. Their present existence in multi-dimensions no doubt has advantages we do not understand.
Then in some earlier flesh and blood form they might have shared our kind of values.
We know the Edo share them, sir.
Why would such an advanced thing feel obliged to protect the Edo?
Perhaps the Edo are a child race by comparison. Possibly a race which those life forms have planted here. Much as we plant human colonies on Class-M planets.
Having fulfilled my professional obligations regarding Commander Data
You now request permission to beam down to the planet. Permission granted. You can accompany me while I try and resolve this. And you should know that whatever the cost, I will not allow them to execute your son.
Thank you, sir.
Data, take command.
Aye, sir.
It's almost time. I want the boy brought here now.
I'll go along with you.
Of course.
Captain Picard. I saw you share the sky with God. You must be Gods.
No, no, we're not gods.
Mother. I guess you know a lot has happened here.
I know.
Captain Picard, are you going to let them kill me?
No. But I must find some way to prevent it that you understand.
How can we let this happen, Liator? They threaten everything we respect. Our law, our peace, our tranquillity and order.
MEDIATOR 2:You are powerful, but do not do this to us, we beg you. At least study what we were without law. Hurtful to each other, savage, thieving.
I understand. Perhaps your system of law and punishment is better than any system we once had. But we do now have a law I must obey. And part of it says I must protect my people from harm.
We did not ask you to come here.
Which has to do with another law that we must obey.
We are all sworn not to interfere with other lives in the galaxy. If I save this boy, I break that law.
And you should be executed if you do so!
I may suffer almost as much. Starfleet takes the Prime Directive very seriously.
MEDIATOR 2:No, it is God who will punish you.
That thought has crossed our minds. Your god up there may insist that we obey our non-interference directive.
Sir, does this mean if you save me the entire crew could die?
You're not involved in this decision, boy.
I'm sorry, sir, but it seems like I am.
Picard to Transporter room. Lock into this signal. Stand by for six to beam up. Wesley, Lieutenant.
Our laws have been violated. What of justice?
What of justice to Wesley? Does he deserve to die?
I'm truly sorry, Liator, but I must have justice for my people too. Transporter room, energise.
Transporter room, come in.
We can't energise the beam, sir. Everything checks out but we're getting no results.
God has prevented your escape.
Then your god is unfair. My son had no warning that his act was criminal.
MEDIATOR 2:We cannot allow ignorance of the law to become a defence.
I don't know how to communicate this, or even if it is possible, but the question of justice has concerned me greatly of lately. And I say to any creature who may be listening, there can be no justice so long as laws are absolute. Even life itself is an exercise in exceptions.
When has justice ever been as simple as a rulebook?
It seems the Edo Lord agrees with you, Number One.
Main viewer on.
Hailing frequencies.
Open, sir.
To the object in orbit with us. We will remove the human colonists from the adjoining solar system if you signal us to do so. Please tell us.
Captain.
Is that a signal?
I suppose, I suppose it must be. I was hoping for more.
More of what, sir? I'm glad it's gone.
Agreed, sir. Short and sweet. God-like efficiency.
I was hoping we'd learn more about it. But since we can't, take us out of here, Number One.
Gladly, sir.
Mister Kolrami. Captain Jean-Luc Picard. Welcome aboard.
Captain. I bring greetings from those at Starfleet Command.
Would you care to be shown to your quarters?
I require little rest, Captain. I prefer that we commence with our mission.
Despite their reputations, this Zakdorn does not appear to be a very formidable warrior
In the game of military brinksmanship, individual physical prowess is less important than the perception of a species as a whole. For over nine millennia, potential foes have regarded the Zakdorns as having the greatest innately strategic minds in the galaxy.
So no one is willing to test that perception in combat.
Exactly.
Then the reputation means nothing.
The Braslota System. In orbit around the second planet is the eighty-year old Starcruiser, Hathaway. He is still your first choice?
Commander Riker will captain the Hathaway.
You will have forty eight hours to ready your vessel before the Enterprise attacks.
And we'll experience actual battle conditions?
Correct. Engineering will disconnect the Enterprise's weapons and link the system with the modified laser-pulse beam. All hits will be recorded electronically. If the computer registers damage, it will act accordingly, shutting down the affected areas for the appropriate repair time. Additional questions? Captain Picard, it is my understanding that you initially resisted Starfleet's request for this simulation.
Yes.
May I know why?
Starfleet is not a military organisation. Its purpose is exploration.
Then why am I here?
With the Borg threat, I decided that my officers and I needed to hone our tactical skills. In a crisis situation, it is prudent to have several options.
I prefer brains over brawn as well. I think it's a waste of effort to test our combat skills. It's a minor province in the make-up of a starship captain.
Your objection is noted. Let us hope your distaste for the exercise will not affect your strategic abilities.
Mister Kolrami, when I agree to do something. I do it. Do you care to surrender now, Captain?
Well, Number One, you are allowed a complement of forty, so select whom you will, save of course Mister Data, who will serve as my first officer during your absence.
I had envisioned you defining the crew.
On my ship, the leader of an away team has total control of the mission. If you want to judge leadership, why not start at the beginning?
Very well, Captain.
My, what a charmer.
Doctor.
Captain, he needs an attitude adjustment.
The Zakdornian culture is replete with self-assuredness and confidence. Seldom is it undeserved. For example, Kolrami is a third level grand master at the game of Strategema.
Another millimetre. That's it. A little more. There. That's excellent.
Lieutenant?
Yes, Commander.
You've heard of the simulation aboard the Hathaway?
Yes, sir, and the best of luck to you. I've researched the old Avidyne engines. They're archaic by our standards, very touchy.
Anticipating the worst, do you think they can be whipped into shape in forty eight hours?
I've already taken the liberty of putting together a few necessities.
Enter!
Am I disturbing you?
Just finished.
You know of the simulation. What do you think?
Waste of time.
It's just designed to be an exercise.
Useless. If there is nothing to lose, no sacrifice, then there is nothing to gain.
You mean besides pride. Well, in this case it doesn't matter. I probably haven't got a chance.
There is always a chance.
Slim. The Hathaway's most sophisticated weapon system, even in a computer mock-up, can't hope to defeat the Enterprise.
Well, still
You're out-manned, you're out-gunned, you're out-equipped. What else have you got?
Guile.
Join me.
The honour is to serve.
Begin long-range scanning of all sectors within three light years of Braslota. How is your crew shaping up?
It's complete, but I would like to request an addition.
Anyone in particular?
With your permission, I would like Acting Ensign Crusher aboard for educational observation.
Thank you, Captain.
It appears we will have some time before reaching Braslota. I was wondering if you'd agree to play me in a game of Strategema.
Although I am intrigued by the audacity of your request, I can't fathom why you wish the encounter.
I enjoy a challenge.
Very well. An opponent of limited dimensions can often be quite diverting.
Thank you.
So you're going to beat him?
Nope.
Well, then it's going to be a close one.
No.
But you have got a chance?
Nah.
Are you going to bother to show up?
Sure, Kolrami is the best ever at Strategema. Just to get to play him is a privilege.
Other aside from your being privileged, is there anything else I can look forward to?
Nope.
This is going to be exciting.
Against an opponent of approximate skill, Strategema can last well over one thousand moves.
I wouldn't bet on us being here that long.
I have wagered heavily in the ship's pool that you will take him past the sixth plateau.
And if I don't?
I will be irritated.
Forever curious, this urge to compete.
It's a human response. That inborn craving to gauge your capabilities through conflict.
Doctor, there are other ways to challenge oneself.
Perhaps, but they all lack a certain thrill.
Data, humans sometimes find it helpful to have an outsider set the standard by which they're judged.
To avoid deceiving oneself.
Maybe you should challenge Kolrami to Strategema.
Why, Doctor?
Because when someone is that smug, you occasionally have to deflate them just a little.
Yeah, Data, I'd like to see your neural flex tear him down a peg.
To what end?
Computer. Actuation positions for Strategema. Ready? Begin.
Come on, Commander, come on now.
Will.
You can do it. You can get him. Come on, Commander. Come on, you got him, you got him, watch out. Here you go.
That's it?
I'm afraid so.
But but you only made twenty-three moves.
Yes. Congratulations. <
Commander Riker, there's your next challenge.
Away team assembled and ready to transport, Commander.
I may get over there and want to come right home.
Good luck, Number One. Captain.
The simulation will commence in forty eight hours.
There should be some emergency Bridge lighting here.
Not good.
Ah, you're wrong, Mister Worf. It's fantastic. And it's ours.  Mister Worf.
Sir, Lieutenant La Forge is a superior officer. The honour should be his.
Worf, this is a battle simulation. You're my Tactical Officer. I've discussed this with Geordi and we agreed. You need to be at my side.
Besides, Worf, if Engineering's anything like the Bridge, I'm going to have my hands full.
Attention, crew of the USS Hathaway. This is your Captain. Over the next two days, you might lose a lot of sleep, but with your skill and your stamina, we'll have this old lady ready to fly. I want hourly progress reports from all stations. Riker out.
Nice job, Geordi.
Now, what are the possibilities of warp drive?
Not good. There are only a few dilithium fragments left in the holding clamps. Even if we had crystals that were intact, there's no anti-matter to fuel the drive.
Any recommendations?
No, sir.
We haven't got a prayer.
Would you like to transfer back
To the Enterprise, Mister Crusher?
No, sir.
Wes, remember our purpose is to improvise,
It's the effort that counts.
Open.
I believe the rules are understood by all.
The weapons conversion, Lieutenant Burke?
Complete, Captain.
Signal received. Locked on.
She's really been stripped down, Captain.
The only offensive systems you'll need will be simulated by computer.
What's the Zakdornian word for mismatch?
Challenge. We do not whine about the inequities of life. And how you perform in a mismatch is precisely what is of interest to Starfleet. After all, when one is in the superior position, one is expected to win.
Screen off. You have the Bridge, Mister Data.
Aye, sir.
Lieutenant Commander Data, I am intrigued by your challenge. Doctor Pulaski informed me of your desire to play a game of Strategema.
But I expressed no such interest.
What Commander Data means is that he would never have asked you himself, but I know he's very interested in pitting his skill against yours.
Play against a machine. Why should I wish to?
I don't blame you. It's no fun going into a game when you know you're going to lose.
But I wouldn't lose. Now you're no doubt going to tell me that I have to prove it to you.
Come on, Data, you can't let that pass.
Indeed, I.  Cannot.
Then you will play for the honour of your ship.
The honour of the ship? It's your reputation that's on the line. <
With my knowledge of the Enterprise's security override, we may be able to convince the sensors that an enemy ship is approaching. Their instruments would lie to them.
If you can pull that off, Mister Worf, it might just give us the edge we're looking for.
But what about the viewscreen?
If I am successful, the computer will project a false image of the enemy ship on the main viewscreen.
So unless someone runs to a window and looks out
They're going to fall for it.
The lining's still smooth. We should to be able to do something with these dilithium fragments we scavenged.
Sure, the system is functional. But without antimatter, what difference does it make?
Geordi, I have to return to the Enterprise.
Wes, we've only got thirty two hours.
This is important.
And this isn't?
Attempt the routing bypass here. If it works, they will be surprised.
Where am I going to get the opticable?
Anywhere.
Captain? I left an experiment running back on the Enterprise. May I go back and shut it down?
It's that important?
It has to be monitored. And it is my final grade in plasma physics.
Message from the Hathaway, sir.
On screen.
Request permission for Ensign Crusher to reboard the Enterprise.
Why?
Apparently he was so anxious to be join the away team, he left a very critical experiment unattended.
Have you any objection?
He should be escorted, and have no contact with anything save his research.
Permission granted. Mister Burke, will you handle that?
Aye, sir.
I saw no sense in Riker choosing him anyway. Just a non-commissioned child.
I can't believe I forgot about this. It's a good lesson not to let excitement cloud your thinking.
Yeah.
It's very dull. I spent six weeks setting this up.
Lot of work.
Oh, no. This is ruined.
That's too bad. Look, is this going to take much longer?
I'm going to have to dispose of this safely It's very volatile. I'll beam it off the Enterprise and leave it particalised.
Fine, let's just do it.
I'll transfer the coordinates to the transporter room.
In the present context, what did she mean by bust him up?
In her own way, Doctor Pulaski was instructing you to take the shortest route to victory.
As opposed to what?
Ready? Begin.
I can't believe it. The computer beaten by flesh and blood.
You advanced quite far against such a worthy opponent.
Thoroughly enjoyable, Mister Data. I am at your disposal for a rematch.
Thank you, but what would be the point?
How can you lose? You're supposed to be infallible!
Obviously, I am not.
Ensign, where is Commander Data?
He has temporarily removed himself from bridge duty, sir.
Your crew is excellently trained, Captain. A tribute to your leadership. Although I doubt their extensive preparation will be needed.
Why is that?
I do not expect Captain Riker will present much of a challenge.
Mister Kolrami, may I speak with you in private?
I would like to know the root of your prejudice for my First Officer.
Captain, I
Mister Kolrami, you have been nothing but denigrating and abusive of Commander Riker since coming aboard this ship. Now I would like some explanation.
Having studied William Riker's file prior to this assignment, I have found him wanting.
In what regard?
His work record is exemplary, but, as you well know, a starship captain is not manufactured. He, or she, is born from inside. From the character of the individual. My interviews have revealed a man who displays circumstantially inappropriate joviality, belying the seriousness of his station.
Don't confuse style with intent. Only a fool would question Commander Riker's dedication to Starfleet and the men and women under his command. He is simply the finest officer with whom I have ever served.
We shall see if your faith is well founded.
The test is if a crew will follow where Commander Riker leads. His joviality is the means by which he creates that loyalty. And I will match his command style with your statistics any time.
Come in, please.
Data.
Counsellor. Is something wrong?
That was going to be my question.
With my repository of knowledge, I expected to perform better against a humanoid life form.
You know, some of our greatest advances have come from analysing failure. While it can be ego-bruising
But Counsellor, I do not have an ego.
Yes. Well, a loss can be disheartening.
But Counsellor, I do not have a
Data. You can handle defeat in two ways. You can lose confidence, or you can learn from your mistakes.
That is what troubles me. I made no mistakes. I have conducted a diagnostic check of all of my programs. I am cross-checking with the ship's computer.
Is that all necessary?
I believe so. I have proven to be vulnerable. At the present time, my deductions should be treated with scepticism.
That is why you haven't been on the Bridge.
Yes. The Captain would be ill advised to rely upon my judgement.
I think you're really over-reacting. I'm sure you're all right.
I, however, am not sure.
Easy now. Is that it?
Yeah.
Good. Good work. All right, Hand me the connector on that kit.
What is that?
My experiment from the Enterprise.
Wes?
It deals with high energy plasma reactions with anti-matter.
You went back to the Enterprise for that? Wes, you cheated.
No, sir. You told me to improvise.
The hard part's going to be calibrating the thermal curve necessary to start a controlled reaction.
Assuming you can, can you regulate the reaction?
There's just enough crystal to do it. We plan to channel the reaction through the chips.
Are we good?
You're better than good. Great. Brilliant. It's going to be fun. Carry on.
Come in, please.
All right, Data, enough of this.
Doctor?
How long are you going to sit sulking like Achilles in his tent?
I am conducting diagnostic
You may be able to sell Troi that story, but not me. You're smarting because you were beaten. Well, it happens.
No, Doctor, this is not ego. I am concerned about giving the Captain unsound advice.
I wish I had never manoeuvred you into playing that game. I'm sorry.
Why, Doctor? It is done, and perhaps just as well. This has indicated that I am damaged in some fashion. I must find the malfunction.
The simulation begins in one hour.
You'll have warp drive, Captain, though it may not be what you expected.
I think that deserves some kind of explanation.
We'll have warp one for about
Just under two seconds.
That's not long enough for an escape, but used as a surprise it may give a strategic advantage.
Sir, all of this is theoretical.
And if your theory fails to pay off?
Ever driven a Grenthemen Water Hopper?
Yes.
Ever popped the clutch?
You're saying we're going to stall the Hathaway?
And the Enterprise will waltz right over and pulverise us.
Let me try to understand. You're saying that Commander Data is suffering from a profound loss of confidence, and that you believe only I can restore the balance?
Yes, sir.
Both Deanna and I have tried, but we're not getting through to him.
Don't you think you both might be overreacting? Data is not capable of the emotions which you are assigning to him.
The effects are the same, whether they're caused by human emotions or android algorithms. Data's not on the Bridge, and I don't think Data's going to be on the Bridge until we find some way to address his problem.
I am less than an hour away from a battle simulation, and I have to hand-hold an android.
The burdens of command.
Come in, please.
Commander, I require your presence on the Bridge.
Captain, with all due respect, perhaps it would be better if you choose another to serve as your First Officer.
Data, you are my First Officer.
I have not been able to isolate the problem, sir. I might make a mistake.
Yes, you might. But that does not alter your duty to me and to this ship. Now, do you know how to formulate a premise?
Yes, sir.
Then formulate this one. How do I deal Riker and the Hathaway? I will await your answer on the Bridge. And, Commander, it is possible to commit no mistakes and still lose. That is not a weakness. That is life.
I believe I understand, sir.
And Data, will you leave your hesitation and self-doubt here in your quarters.
I have several examples of Commander Riker's battle technique. At the Academy, he calculated a sensory blind spot on a Tholian vessel and hid within it during a battle simulation. And as a lieutenant aboard the Potemkin, his solution to a crisis was to shut down all power, and hang over a planet's magnetic poles, thus confusing his opponent's sensors.
And from these specifics, what general conclusion can you extrapolate?
Only twenty-one percent of the time does he rely upon traditional tactics. So, the Captain must be prepared for unusual cunning. Counsellor, Commander Riker will assume we have made this analysis, and knowing that we know his methods, he will alter them. But, knowing that we know that he knows that we know, he might choose to return to his usual pattern.
Wait, wait. You're over-analysing, Data. One cannot deny human nature. What kind of a man is Commander Riker?
A fighter?
Yes.
The weaker his position, the more aggressive will be his posture.
And he won't give up.
Then despite whatever options he is given, he must be
The man that he is. Exactly.
Is that a failing in humans?
You'll have to decide that for yourself.
On screen. The hunt begins, Number One.
We're ready. Just remember, Enterprise. Captain Riker has never lost.
Begin now.
Screen off. Set course two two three mark three five seven. Full impulse power. Initiate Kumeh manoeuvre.
Kumeh manoeuvre? Why would they start out with such a recognisable ploy?
He's teasing. He wants us to reveal our tactics on his terms. Mister Worf?
Counter with Talupian manoeuvre on instrument sighting.
Agreed. Three quarters impulse, full on my command. Ensign Nagel, maximum shields. Mister Worf, prepare your little surprise.
Aye, sir.
Set course three one mark seven three. Present minimal aspect. Ready warp one, optimal spread on simulated torpedoes.
Captain. Romulan warship approaching fast from astern.
What the?
It came from nowhere, sir!
Bring us about, Ensign. Maximum shields.
Disengage modified beams.
Full weapon systems. Lock on. Open a hailing frequency.
I can't, sir. There's nothing there.
Warp three, evasive. Stand by. Disengage weapons and shields. Re-engage modified beam.
He's quite good.
He's the best.
Computer reports simulated damage to several aft decks, sir. Repair time, three point six days.
How did he do that?
Mister Worf must have overridden the sensor codes, played some holographic games. Mister Data, input a new code. Attack posture, circumvental attitude. Prepare beams for photon mode.
Bye, bye, Hathaway.
Computers report heavy damage to Enterprise.
They're moving off, sir. Why not go after them?
Because they're not through coming after us. Wesley, Geordi, prepare to warp jump.
There are no guarantees here, sir.
There never are, Lieutenant. I'm going to trust your expertise. Secure your stations. Stand by for my signal.
Ready photon torpedoes.
Captain, sensors picking up a Ferengi warship closing at warp five.
Did you input that new code?
Aye, sir.
Mister Worf, I didn't give you enough credit. Continue the simulation.
Divert all power to shields!
Sever modified beams.
Stay between the Ferengi and the Hathaway.
Engage phasers and target.
Fire when ready.
That's no ghost attacking the Enterprise. That's real.
We must assist, sir.
With what? We have no offensive weapons.
Where are my weapons?
Unavailable, sir! We cannot disengage the modified beams. The connections have been fused.
We must retreat!
Unacceptable!
The Ferengi have broken off their attack. Drop shields. Transport the away team aboard.
Transporter functions gone, sir.
Shields reduced to one fifth intensity.
Use their moment of indecision to escape!
I have forty crewmembers on board the Hathaway.
Who should be sacrificed to save a thousand! Acceptable tactical losses, considering the circumstances.
Not to me! Notify Starfleet. Priority. Hail the Ferengi on my command. Formulate alternatives.
As the Starfleet observer I am ordering you to withdraw!
I am the Captain of this vessel! Your order is nullified! Ferengi on main viewscreen.
I am Jean-Luc Picard, of the Federation Starship, USS Enterprise. Why have you attacked my vessel?
Why was your ship combative with another Federation vessel of lesser design? Why do you now protect your former target? What is its value to you?
Our probes indicate you were aware of our approach, yet took no action.
Your answers will dictate our response.
We have refrained from launching a counter-attack in the hope that this can be resolved this peacefully.
Our probes indicate that you are crippled, and the ship you protect has no weaponry, no light speed drive, and only a scarce crew.
This makes no sense to us. Unless it contains something very valuable.
I am Bractor, leader of the Ferengi attack vessel Kreechta. I shall have the secret of the other Federation ship. Surrender it to me, and I will allow your Enterprise to leave unharmed. You have ten of your minutes.
Sir, they're massing a surge of power. We're being scanned. They've locked on.
Data?
Our shields will not withstand another assault.
Then there are no options. Retreat or die.
Captain's log, supplemental. Due to a miscalculation on my part, Enterprise has been subjected a surprise attack by the Ferengi. I find myself with little time to decide the fate of forty of my crew stranded aboard the derelict Hathaway.
I am open to suggestions.
Captain, we are now capable of launching a limited number of photon torpedoes.
I've already given you my advice, Captain. The Hathaway is expendable.
Commander Riker is hailing, sir.
On screen. Number One, have you been monitoring communications?
And Kolrami's right. You've got to save the Enterprise.
That would leave you defenceless.
When Bractor closes in, we'll hit our warp drive and take our chances.
Your what?
We have a limited, two-second warp capability.
Impossible! That ship was rendered warp inactive.
I told you he was the best. I'd like to hear about this, Number One, later. Right now I have to work something out with Mister Data.
Premise. The Ferengi wish to capture the Hathaway believing it to be value. Therefore we must remove the ship from their field of interest.
And they will soon relocate it after a two second warp.
There is a way. Number One, can you hear this?
Yes, sir. We're all here.
Waiting for you to pull another rabbit out of your hat.
Mister Data
On the Captain's signal, we will fire four photon torpedoes directly at the Hathaway.
One millisecond after its detonation, the computer will trigger your warp jump.
I think I hate this plan. Data, we're not even sure our warp jump
Will work.
If the warp engines fail to function, the result could be unfortunate.
Very unfortunate.
We will be dead.
Captain Riker
I cannot order you to do this.
What the hell. Nobody said life was safe.
The advantage is, that it will appear from the Kreechta's perspective as though you were destroyed in the explosion.
That only deceive them for a few minutes. Their sensors will soon locate us.
We'll only need few minutes, Mister Worf, because you're going to prepare another surprise for them.
Then we're agreed.
On my mark, four minutes.
Remember, Geordi, if the implementation is off by a millisecond
The Hathaway will not survive.
Data, that's the one part of this plan that we're all absolutely sure about.
Are we ready, Number One?
Ready, Captain.
Ready, Captain.
Good luck to both of you. Bractor.
I will wait no longer, Picard.
You needn't. The answer is no. Your actions have been wholly criminal. You will not profit by them.
You are a fool.
How can you stop us?
You feel the Hathaway has value? We deny you your prize. Fire!
Destroy your own rather than suffer the ignominy of defeat and capture?
I did not think the Federation had such iron.
You had no claim to that vessel. It was ours to destroy.
As you are ours to destroy.
You can try.
Enterprise targeted, Leader. Leader, there is another Federation ship closing. A starship!
Maximum shields! We have been outmanoeuvred. Retreat!
Captain, our sensors show no Federation starship nearby.
Of course not, Mister Burke. That was Klingon guile.
You made it, Number One. Smooth ride?
Well, it certainly was different.
We'll lock on and pick you up.
With pleasure, Captain.
I must admit your Commander Riker acquitted himself quite admirably. And so, Captain, have you. My report to Starfleet will be most favourable.
Thank you. Initiate recovery procedures. Continue repairs. Plot a course for the nearest starbase.
Captain's log, supplemental. With the transporter repaired and my crew safely back aboard, we have officially ended our first Starfleet battle simulation.
Bah!
Why have you suspended the game?
Because this is not a rematch. You have made a mockery of me.
Data, you beat him!
No, sir. It is a stalemate.
No game of Strategema has ever gone this high.
What did you do?
I simply altered my premise for playing the game.
Explain.
Working under the assumption that Kolrami was attempting to win, it is reasonable to assume that he expected me to play for the same goal.
You didn't.
No. I was playing only for a standoff, a draw. While Kolrami was dedicated to winning, I was able to pass up obvious avenues of advancement and settle for a balance. Theoretically, I should be able to challenge him indefinitely.
Then you have beaten him.
It is a matter of perspective, Doctor. In the strictest sense, I did not win.
TROI + PULASKI:Data!
I busted him up.
Yes!
Dixon Hill around?
He's occupied at the present moment.
Tell him Gloria's here.
Can't do that. He doesn't want to be disturbed.
Tell him it's Gloria from Cleveland.
Doesn't matter if you're from the moon, hon. Mister Hill is incommuni, incommunica, ka
Incommunicado.
That's it. Sorry, hon.
Look, hon. Just tell him Gloria's here.
Look, when the boss doesn't want to be disturbed, the boss doesn't want to be disturbed. Don't take it personal, like.
I have an appointment with Mister Hill at two o'clock.
It's two ten.
So I had a little trouble getting into the dress. It took me a little while to figure out exactly what I was supposed to do with these.
Sorry, Dix. There's a lady here to see you, says her name is
Gloria
Gloria.
From Cleveland.
From Cleveland. Okay. He never heard of you.
He's never heard of me?
That's right.
Oh, wait, I think you don't understand. You see, this was all been set up in advance. You see, I'm supposed to be Gloria from Cleveland, and I was supposed to be on holodeck number four at two o'clock and you don't have any idea what I'm talking about, do you. Not to worry.
Hey, you can't go in there!
Get inside. Close the door. Who's the doll?
She's a, the doll's my cousin.
Yeah. Gloria. From Cleveland.
I'm sorry about this Gu, Gloria. I didn't actually mean you to get involved. She knows nothing about this, Johnny.
What does that mean? Oh, I see.
Yeah, right. What do I look like? A jamoke? You ain't nobody's cousin and you ain't here for a visit. What do you know about my money?
Your money?
The money he stole.
You stole his money?
Don't listen to him, Gloria. He's lying.
Johnny. Johnny. Talk to me, Johnny. I'm a great listener.
I'm finished with talking, sweetheart. Now, I'm going to get some action or else.
This is what you do for fun?
It's a mystery. Who was this man? Who killed him? Where's the money he was talking about? It's a mystery. Now, we have to go search for clues.
Ah, and that's fun?
That's fun. A forty eight Packard with white walls. Damn it, I couldn't get the license plate.
Captain Picard? Sorry, there's no Captain Picard here. You should try down at the docks. Ships come
It's all right, Madeline, I'll take it in here.
Yes, what is it?
Captain, Lieutenant Commander Data here. Please excuse the unusual interruption, but under the circumstances I thought that patching communications through the holodeck programme would be less obtrusive.
I appreciate your concern, Commander Data. What can I do for you?
Long range sensors detect a T-tauri type star within a pocket of the Ngame cloud.
Well, there's nothing unusual about that.
No, sir. However, the star's single planet falls within the M-class range. It is capable of supporting life.
That is unusual.
Highly, sir.
Well, thank you, Mister Data. Procedures require that we investigate. Recall the bridge crew and set in a course.
Aye, sir.
I'm sorry, Gloria, but there is a twenty-fourth century mystery I have to investigate. You are very welcome to carry on, if you like.
No, I've had enough fun for today.
Entering the T-tauri system, now, Captain.
Sensors indicate an energy fluctuation directly in our path. Source unknown.
Still picking up energy distortions, but fading. It seems to be gone.
A wormhole?
Very likely. Small and extremely unstable wormholes have been mapped near thirty nine T-tauri systems in the last one hundred years alone, sir.
Captain, I suggest we move to a safer location. It could reappear at any moment.
Agreed, Number One. Ensign, take us a course
Captain!
Captain?
Data.
Careful, Captain. The stun effect from the wormhole was relatively severe.
Apparently so. How long were we unconscious?
Approximately thirty seconds. I have scanned the entire ship and detected no life-threatening injuries among the crew.
You were not affected?
No, sir. My positronic system is immune to the effect. This is the third unstable wormhole I have passed through during my time with Starfleet. The first was aboard the USS Trieste
Thank you, Mister Data. Well, where the hell are we?
Point five four parsecs from our original position. Almost a day's travel in just thirty seconds?
Sir, I should re-align the ship's clock with Starbase four ten's subspace signal to adjust for the time distortion.
Proceed.
Yes, Captain.
Captain, this is Crusher in Sickbay.
Go ahead, Doctor.
I'm getting scattered reports
Of minor injuries. What's happened?
The Enterprise just jumped through a wormhole.
Apparently we were all unconscious for about thirty seconds.
Is everybody all right there?
There's little or no damage on the Bridge, Doctor.
Acknowledged. Crusher out.
Ship's status?
Reports coming in now. Nothing serious so far.
La Forge here, Captain. I've checked impulse engines and warp drives, sir. They appear to be unaffected.
Shields and weapons systems are fully functional.
Counsellor? Are you all right?
I think so. I'm feeling a bit unfocused. It'll pass.
Well, not too bad, all things considered.
We're lucky we didn't end up half way across the galaxy in the middle of next week.
That was never actually a possibility. The wormhole's small size and relatively short period would make this a local phenomenon.
There's still the anomalous M-class planet we were going to investigate. Do we go back?
The unpredictability of the wormhole would make an investigation a hazardous one. A probe launched from our current position would be more advisable.
Make it so.
Nothing broken, Chief, but the ligaments around the elbow have been twisted pretty severely. What on earth were you doing when you fell?
O'BRIEN:Hanging a plant for Keiko. It's part of her running project to give me a green thumb.
How's it working?
O'BRIEN:Everything I touch seems to turn brown and wither away.
Alyssa, would you get me? Oh, never mind, I'll get it. You, don't go away.
This isn't possible.
Alyssa?
Yes, Doctor?
Did you see anybody near the lab today?
No, I didn't.
You didn't by chance adjust the environments on the incubation containers?
I would never touch one of your experiments unless you asked me to, Doctor.
Of course not. I'm sorry, Alyssa. Thank you.
Probe approaching the T-tauri system, Captain.
Readings, Data?
Coming in now, sir. The probe is within visual range of the planet.
On screen.
Sensors indicate a hydrogen-helium composition with a frozen helium core.
Wait a minute. Didn't your readings indicate a class M planet before we passed through the wormhole, Data?
It is possible the sensors were affected by interference from the wormhole, Commander. It is clearly not a class M planet.
Mister Data, run a full diagnostic to make sure the wormhole didn't permanently damage the sensors.
Aye, sir.
Ensign, take us back on a course
Captain.
Problem, Number One?
It seems awfully strange that a malfunctioning sensor would give such a specific misreading of a planet. I would have thought that a time-space disturbance would have caused a lot more confusion than that.
It is conceivable that the sensors picked up the afterimage of an actual planet on the other side of the wormhole. We could survey the nearby stars for such a planet. It would require approximately six days, sir.
No, no, we don't have time for that. We've encountered a minor mystery, one that has been solved to my satisfaction. Number One, unless there's a major objection, then Ensign McKnight should put us back on course for Evadne Four.
No objection.
Ensign.
Aye, sir.
Come.
I have something of a minor mystery on my hands.
A minor mystery?. That seems to be a recurring phrase these days. Oh, Diomedian scarlet moss. I didn't know you were an enthnobotanist.
It's a hobby.
You've got a good crop here. As I recall, it's not easy to cultivate.
That's just it. I started these spores right before we were all knocked unconscious by the wormhole. You said we were unconscious for thirty seconds?
Correct.
Then why do these show a full day's growth?
Perhaps you've got some sort of fast growth strain.
Each of these incubators was set with spores from completely different sources in the Diomedian system. I have a dozen more in the lab. Perhaps something extraordinary happened to one of them, but not to all of them.
Doctor, we were not unconscious for a full day. Everything on board indicates that we were out for thirty seconds. The ship's chronometer, the computer, everything, Doctor, including Commander Data.
Jean-Luc, I'm telling you this is over twenty four hours of growth.
Captain's log, supplemental. Commander Data continues to maintain that we were unconscious for only thirty seconds, despite Doctor Crusher's evidence to the contrary.
Captain, I have a hypothesis. The twenty-second century physicist Pell Underhill conjectured that a major disruption in time continuity could be compensated for by trillions of counter reactions. That effect may have allowed Doctor Crusher's mosses to arrive at the other side of the worm hole with the unanticipated growth.
Underhill was talking about energy.
True. Nevertheless, it is possible that the phenomenon could occur in matter at much higher levels of organisation, given the proper conditions.
Thank you, Data. An intriguing hypothesis. Well, perhaps we've got a tempest in a test tube, after all.
Captain.
Data, I promised Mister Nelson that you would assist him with the sensor diagnostic. You'll find him hard at work on deck thirty six.
As you wish, Captain.
Do you believe him? I want a frank answer, Commander.
Not for a second. I'm amazed that he even proposed it.
What are you suggesting, Captain?
I'm not sure, Mister Worf. I have never known Data to tell a lie, and yet.
If we never went through that wormhole, then what happened to us during that day?
If we were out for a whole day, why didn't our beards grow?
Whatever it was it seems something Data doesn't want to tell us about.
It could be that whatever caused this situation also affected Data. And it could be that he's telling the truth and that this is all just a minor mystery.
We could always check the computer's chronometer, see if there's any evidence of tampering.
A transporter trace analysis might give us another indication of how much time has actually passed.
Doctor, Commander, make it so. Meanwhile, we will maintain our present course. If there is something wrong with Data, we don't want him to be aware of our suspicions.
Gentlemen, how goes the battle?
The long range and infra-red sensors apparently suffered ill effects as a result of the wormhole. We are presently checking neutrino and heavy particle detectors.
Great. I'll take over now, Data. The Captain wants you back on the Bridge. See you later in Ten Forward?
Nelson, I need your help with the computer.
Hello, Chief. How's the elbow?
O'BRIEN:Much better, thanks. This isn't a house call, is it?
No, it's not. Tell me, do you remember the last person to use the transporter before we went through the wormhole?
O'BRIEN:Let me check. Ensign Locklin. She's one of my technicians.
Tell her to report to Sickbay immediately.
Electrolyte concentration?
Twelve point five deviation from previous.
Interesting. Check the cellular membranes. I'm willing to bet the internal turgid pressure is off by almost the same amount.
Eleven three deviation from the norm.
Terrific. That's what I wanted to hear. Thank you, Ensign Locklin. That'll be all for now.
Crusher to Captain Picard.
What is it, Doctor?
I need to see you immediately.
I'm on my way to Engineering. Join me.
Physiologically, each of us is on a daily cycle. Our cells have developed rhythms based on a twenty-four hour period.
The internal clock.
Exactly, and I can measure that effect at the molecular level. I took a trace from the last person to use the transporter before the incident, and compared her cell function levels at that time to what they are right now. If we were unconscious for only thirty seconds, those cycles should be nearly synchronous.
And were they?
No. We were out for longer than thirty seconds, Captain. A lot longer.
I've got some good news, and some bad news. The good news is that we were right about the computer's chronometer. There's a security programme to prevent tampering, but it looks now like it was disabled and a new programme put in its place. Someone has reset the clock.
If that's the good news, what's the bad news?
That Data and I are the only ones aboard this ship capable of doing it.
It is a mystery, Captain.
That is an understatement, Data. Is it possible that someone or something could have affected you without your knowing?
I am unable to answer that question, sir.
Data, would you consent to being examined by Commander La Forge?
As you wish, Captain.
Will you escort Commander Data to Engineering?
I know the way, sir.
Captain's log, supplemental. It has become clear that everyone aboard the Enterprise has lost an entire day. As the mystery of what actually occurred during those missing hours continues to deepen, so do my doubts about Commander Data.
We'll start with the higher functions before we get down to basics. Okay. All right. Now, this won't hurt a bit.
Have you forgotten, Geordi, that my sensory inputs are not programmed to experience pain?
A figure of speech. Bedside manner. I'm just trying to make you feel comfortable.
I am perfectly comfortable.
Pattern recognition, syntactic algorithms, heuristic functions, all normal.
I have noticed, however, that you appear a bit uncomfortable yourself.
It just seems like you're not being completely honest with us. Data, I'm your friend. If there's something wrong, I want you to tell me. Maybe I can help.
I cannot tell you anything beyond what I have already stated.
Okay.
Excuse us, Counsellor. Captain, I finished examining Data.
And?
Nothing's wrong with the technology, that I can see. He's in perfect condition.
I was almost hoping that you'd find a problem.
He still could be malfunctioning beyond my ability to detect it.
This entire mystery started when our sensors detected that planet. First it was class-M, now it isn't.
But our sensors were malfunctioning. Our probe clearly established the planet could not support life.
Data launched that probe.
If he rigged it, could you prove it?
I could try.
What happened to us in that missing day? Surely there must be some clues. Each of us should try and think what we were doing just before we blacked out. Reenact it if you have to.
Counsellor?
Deanna, are you all right?
Just a moment. Yes. Yes, I'm fine.
What happened?
I suddenly became dizzy. I'd think I'd better go to my quarters.
Perhaps Sickbay would be a better idea.
No. No, really, I'm all right.
Will you see the Counsellor to her quarters?
Aye, sir.
Thank you for coming with me, Mister Worf.
You are certain you are well?
I just need some rest. Thanks.
Deanna! Security! Override the lock on Counsellor Troi's quarters! Now!
What's wrong?
The mirror. I came in here. I looked into the mirror. It wasn't me, Worf! It wasn't me! It was my face, but it wasn't me inside.
Is she all right?
I feel fine, now.
Signs of stress, adrenaline by-products higher than baseline. But that's a normal reaction after sudden fright. All brain functions check out okay.
What happened, Deanna?
It wasn't what I saw, it was more what I felt. I looked into the mirror, and it seemed a stranger was staring back at me from behind my own eyes. As if my face was a mask.
La Forge to Captain Picard.
Go ahead, Geordi.
I've found something, sir.
I'm on my way.
Lieutenant Worf.
Doctor.
Can I help you?
Perhaps not.
Worf, you came in here for something.
A warrior does not complain about physical discomfort, but the Captain ordered us to report anything out of the ordinary.
Are you in pain?  How did this happen?
Do you recognize this planet, Data?
Yes, sir. It is the planet our probe detected in the T-tauri system.
No it's not. Actually, it's Tethys three. I retrieved this image from the ship's library. Its geophysical figures have been slightly altered, but it's definitely Tethys three.
Strange, that an obscure planet several hundred light years from here should be picked up by the probe. Data, did you take this image from the ship's library and programme the probe to send it back to us?
I cannot verify that hypothesis.
But you don't deny it.
No, sir.
Mister La Forge, will you send another probe to the T-tauri system?
Yes, sir. I'm sorry, Data.
Counsellor Troi just had a very disturbing hallucination.
Is she all right, sir?
For the moment. Can you tell me if Deanna's incident is related in any way to this missing time period?
No, sir, I cannot.
Data, you're the key to this entire mystery and you've done nothing but block my every attempt to solve it. Why are you fighting me?
It is not by choice.
What do you mean by that?
I cannot say.
Would you rather endanger Deanna, a friend and a colleague, than tell me what is going on?!
Which would you place first, the welfare of a single individual or that of the entire crew?
Are you saying that by not cooperating, you are actually protecting us?
I am not saying that at all. I merely state a possible alternative explanation.
Then, Mister Data, I'm going to ask you again, and I order you to directly answer me. What really happened to us?
I cannot answer that.
What would you have me do, Data? How would you handle this if our positions were reversed?
I am apparently guilty of falsifying the Enterprise's records, of interfering with an investigation, of disobeying a direct order from my commanding officer. Your duty seems clear, sir.
Do you know what a court martial would mean? Your career in Starfleet would be finished.
I realise that, sir.
Do you also realise that you would most likely be stripped down to your wires to find out what the hell has gone wrong?
Yes, sir. I do.
This wrist has been broken. Broken and reset and treated with one of our subcutaneous bone fusion units.
During the missing day?
That's the only possibility.
Are you suggesting he was conscious?
I'm suggesting that maybe we all were. I certainly didn't repair a broken wrist while I was unconscious.
And our memories of that day?
Blocked, possibly erased.
By whom?
There are very few individuals on board who could have broken my wrist. Commander Data is one of those individuals.
I can't accept that explanation.
Well, he does possess the speed and the strength.
Granted, but I'm beginning to suspect that Commander Data is refusing to co-operate because he believes he is acting in the best interests of the Enterprise.
La Forge to Captain Picard.
Go ahead, Geordi.
Our probe is approaching the planet, sir.
Acknowledged. Maybe now we'll get some answers.
What do you have, Mister La Forge?
Visuals available now, Captain.
M-class. Nickel-iron core, nitrogen-oxygen atmosphere.
The same planet our sensors picked up before the so-called wormhole.
Affirmative.
No indication of any space-time distortion whatsoever. The probe should at least be detecting some residual effect, even if the wormhole is inactive.
That's because there is no a wormhole. There never was.
Sir?
It was a ruse, designed to throw us off the track. Look at the clues. Doctor Crusher's incubation experiment, the computer clock, the transporter trace. All indicate the existence of a missing day. Lieutenant Worf's broken wrist would seem to suggest that we were awake and aware for that day, possibly in a struggle for our lives.
The fact that we're still alive suggests we might have won.
Not necessarily, Doctor. Data's behaviour would seem to suggest we did not. Why else would he be willing to sacrifice his career rather than tell the truth?
If we didn't win and we didn't lose?
Then the only alternative would be a stalemate. Maybe a compromise might have been reached, a compromise that forced Data into this silence.
Maybe by uncovering all this, we run the risk of upsetting the stalemate. Maybe we should leave well enough alone.
Possibly, Number One, and I would be prepared to live with the mystery, but Data's role in this must be ascertained or he'll never be trusted with starship duty again. Ensign, take us back to the scene of the crime. The T-tauri system, warp two.
Within sensor range, Captain.
Drop to impulse, Ensign. Mister Worf, maximum shields. Ready all weapons.
Shields up. Photon torpedoes armed. Phasers standing by. Captain, an energy field has appeared between our position and the planet.
On screen.  Hold position. Let's see what it does.
The field has emitted an energy pulse. Approaching the Enterprise.
Too slow to be a photon torpedo.
It might be a probe.
Let's see what happens when it hits the shields.
Shields undamaged. The energy pulse has dispersed.
Counsellor Troi, what is it?
The plan has failed.
You have returned.
Your ship is again in our space.
I was unable to prevent it.
Nevertheless, you are here.
The Enterprise is not a threat to you. Give me more time. Our destruction would only
Data, Captain wanted me to bring you to the Bridge. Counsellor.
One moment, if you would.
Do nothing. It may yet be possible to salvage the situation.
Reporting as ordered, Captain.
Well, Data, as you can see, we're back where it all started.
We must leave immediately, sir.
Why?
Any further delay would put us all at grave risk.
Why? What is the source of that risk? The energy field?
I cannot say.
Data, you sound as if you're stuck in a feedback loop. You certainly can say. You have free will, you have a choice.
My silence is not by choice, sir.
Not by choice? Are you somehow being controlled by that force? Did Geordi miss something when he examined you?
Geordi's examination was exemplary.
Then why are you compelled to disobey my orders? How? During the missing day, were you contacted by Starfleet? Did they order you to conceal the truth from us?
I cannot answer that. We must leave, sir.
This ship isn't going anywhere. Not until I get an answer. Now who gave you that order?
You did, sir.
I ordered you to lie?
Captain, the energy field is approaching.
Maintain shields at full intensity.
No. We must vary shield shape and strength as rapidly as possible. Maximum shields will only speed the ship's takeover.
Contact imminent.
Do as Data says. At once.
Aye, sir. The field is shifting amplitude, trying to match the shields.
The energy field will eventually penetrate our shields. There is no way to counter the Paxans' technology. We can delay their takeover but we cannot prevent it.
The Paxans. Who are they?
You have invaded our system.
No, Worf.
You will only harm Counsellor Troi's body.
We are not invaders. We are explorers.
Your knowledge of us is unacceptable.
They are xenophobes, sir. Isolationists. The Paxans terraformed a protoplanet in this system in order to better conceal their whereabouts. The apparent wormhole we experienced is actually a trap designed to keep out invaders. The energy field stuns everyone on board the invading vessel and places them in a state of biochemical stasis.
That explains why our beards didn't grow.
The Paxans then take the ship out of their territory.
So the crew wakes up and thinks they've been through a wormhole, count their blessings and keep going.
Precisely.
What went wrong this time?
My positronic brain is a technology unknown to the Paxans.
Our stun field had no effect on him. He remained conscious while we tried to take over the ship.
When I realised the crew was incapacitated, I initiated emergency procedures
Computer, engage emergency plan zed zed alpha.
Automatic defense procedures initiated. Energy field strength increasing. Warning, shield penetration seventeen percent.
Computer, begin random fluctuation of shield frequency and modulation.
Executed.
With the Enterprise temporarily protected, I revived the crew.
Computer, release compound ADTH into the airflow system, five parts per million.
Acknowledged. Initiating compound release now.
Status, Data.
The energy field is attempting to match shield frequencies, sir.
Options, Mister Worf?
I do not recommend weapons at this range, Captain.
Can we go to warp?
Negative, sir. The field is also acting as a tractor beam.
Warning. Shields have been penetrated.
All systems are frozen, Captain.
The Paxans can manipulate energy structures on many levels. They took control of Counsellor Troi's body to communicate with us.
Captain!
No, stop, everyone. Who are you?
You are aware of our existence. Our attempt to place you in biochemical stasis has failed. We have no choice but to destroy this ship.
If you destroy this ship, then others will come in search of us. You may not be able to stop them all. Knowledge of your civilisation would be spread across half the galaxy.
No.
Allow us safe passage and I will protect your right to privacy to the best of my ability. We will never tell anyone of your existence.
There are over a thousand lifeforms on this vessel. How could you assure their silence?
This biochemical stasis, does it suppress synaptic functions?
It does.
Then you must have the capability of affecting memory. Can you erase the short-term memory of everyone on this ship, remove all knowledge of this event, allow us to proceed as if it had never happened?
It would take time. One of your days. He is immune to our influence.
Data, I'm going to give you a most unusual order. I'm not sure that you will be able to integrate it into your programme.
As a Starfleet officer, I am required to follow all of your orders, Captain.
Good, because our survival depends upon it. I am ordering you never to reveal what has happened here today. Not to Starfleet, not to myself. You will conceal your knowledge of the Paxans for as long as you exist. Do you fully understood, Data?
Completely, sir.
Satisfactory?
Agreed.
Good. Now, our task is to eliminate from the ship's records any information that might lead to knowledge of this incident. Let's get to work.
We proceeded to erase all evidence of our encounter with the Paxans. I reset the computer's chronometer and the crew was again stunned into unconsciousness, their short-term memories erased. When they were revived a day later, the computer adjustments made it appear that only thirty seconds had passed.
And here we are.
Here we are again.
Your plan has failed. This ship must be destroyed.
No. Wait. The plan failed because clues were left behind that suggested a mystery. And to many humans, a mystery is irresistible. It must be solved. The Doctor's incubation experiment, Worf's wrist, Troi's hallucinations. Little pieces of evidence that suggested even more clues. The clock, the transporter trace, Data's odd behaviour. If we eliminate the clues and begin again
Again?
Yes. Consider the first time a run-through, a rehearsal to shake out the flaws. The second time will succeed if we leave no clues.
You are a most unusual species. Worthy of a second chance. Proceed.
Deanna?
Welcome back. Counsellor. Geordi, Data, reconfigure the computer and the records. Number One, I want you to oversee the rest of the ship. And this time, let's get it right.
What happened, Data?
The effect from the wormhole was rather intense.
So it would seem.
Everyone but myself was rendered unconscious. My positronic system is immune to the effect.
How long were we out?
Thirty seconds, Sir.
Current position?
Point five four parsecs from our previous position. Bearing two eight five mark one four seven.
It could be worse.
Yes, sir. The wormhole appears to have been a local phenomenon.
Crusher to Bridge. What happened, Captain?
The Enterprise went through a wormhole, Doctor. It seems the entire crew was unconscious for approximately thirty seconds.
Is anyone on the Bridge hurt?
Apparently not.
I'll start checking the other decks. Crusher out.
Status reports?
Shields and weapons systems unaffected.
No damage in Engineering.
Counsellor?
There's a general feeling of disorientation on board, but nothing serious as far as I can tell.
Well, then. There's still that anomalous class-M planet we were going to investigate. Ensign, replot a course to take us back to
Sir, it is likely the anomalous readings were the result of the wormhole's effect. It was extremely unstable. I would recommend against returning. It might put the Enterprise at further risk.
We could launch a probe.
That would certainly be sufficient, sir.
Make it so. And put out a hazard advisory to Starfleet. Ensign, set a course to Evadne Four.
Aye, sir.
Engage.
Unidentified vessel approaching.
Sensor readings show it to be a small class-nine vessel, probably an interplanetary cargo ship.
One life sign aboard, sir. It appears to be humanoid.
I have its call sign now, sir.
Confirmed. Armed with lasers only.
Its cargo holds are empty. The readout shows its guidance system is malfunctioning. The pilot is attempting to hold course manually.
I recommend we set the Enterprise on an intercept course in case he needs emergency assistance.
Make it so, Mister Crusher.
We're in position now, Captain.
Open hailing frequencies.
Hailing frequencies open.
On viewer. This is the USS Enterprise. Captain Jean Luc Picard.
And this is the cargo carrier Erstwhile. Captain Okona at your service, sir. There's no need for your phasers, Captain. I'm harmless and not quite yet ready for mercy killing.
You were never considered a danger to us, Captain.
Oh, that's a shame. I can remember when I was at least considered a risk.
I'm the owner and operator of this craft and since we both know that you've already scanned it, you know I'm alone and empty, which is truly a rare occasion for a man of my charm and talent.
Mute main viewer. Counsellor?
His emotions suggest that he's mischievous, irreverent and somewhat brazen. The word that seems to best describe him is rogue.
Rogue? Ah. Cad, knave, rake, rascal, villain, wild element.
Yes, Data, but there is no malevolence or ill will.
Audio on. You have a burn-out in your guidance system, Captain.
Whoa. Since you're able to diagnose my problems, how about helping me fix them?
Captain, we could easily repair the type of system he uses.
We can accommodate you, Captain.
This is the First Officer, sir. If you prepare to shut down your engines, we can lock on the tractor and beam you over here.
Sir, recommend limited access to our ship.
Agreed.
Data, lock on the tractor beam. Transporter Chief, prepare to him beam aboard.
Ready on your command, sir.
Excuse me, Commander. Is that a woman's voice I hear?
Yes. Now please follow Commander Riker's instructions so our ship can get back to its normal routine.
Whatever you say, Captain.
Something funny?
Well, the unexpected is our normal routine. Hold it steady, Wesley. Ready to link up on my command
Aye, sir.
Easy. Easy. Engage. Captain Okona, shut down your engines.
Understood.
Transporter room, prepare for the beaming operation. We're on our way. Wesley, Data, let's go.
Your weapons, please.
A Klingon Security officer.
Yes.
No wars available, eh?
It's more of a piece of jewellry than a weapon. A remembrance.
Welcome aboard, Captain Okona. I'm Commander Riker. If you'll turn over the inoperative part to Commander Data, we can begin repairs.
I'd be most happy to do the work myself, Commander. I'm sort of the hands-on type.
I think you'd find the tools we use rather unusual, sir.
I can believe that. May I at least watch?
That can be arranged.
Good then. Commander, I leave this in your capable hands.
Sir, this is Commander Data. I'm just an acting ensign.
Well, acting ensigns have names, don't they?
Wesley. Wesley Crusher.
Nice to meet you Acting Ensign Wesley Wesley Crusher.  And thank you for beaming me here and enabling me to see a truly beautiful woman. You have the majestic carriage and loveliness that could surely be traced back to the noblest of families.
Well, I'm sure that you've said that to many ladies before, and it was no more true then than it is now.
But it's how I say it that's really important. The warmth, the attraction that I have for you. The attraction that we share.
Mister Okona seems to have excellent vision as well as a healthy libido.
It's eight oh six.
Captain Okona, if you follow Commander Data, you can get started right away.
Now, that's sex appeal.
Sexual attraction in this context is not a part of my programming. I am an android.
Well, then. Have you seen any good looking computers lately? That's a joke. It's funny.
Ah. Of course it is.
Will that do what the original did?
Sure will, and better. Let me show you. On your old one, the zelebium contacts that wore down and then fused. What I've done is replace them with tricellite.
Tricellite isn't available in this system. If I ever had to replace it.
Don't worry, you won't. Your ship will never outlast this part.
Because of the part or the way I fly my ship?
Well, this part, but the stress test did show that you tend to push your ship a little beyond its design capabilities.
Blame the pattern of my life, Lieutenant La Forge. Because it relegates me to cargo carrying rather than the grand explorations you enjoy, I'm forced to add a measure of flamboyancy and a zest to the doldrum of my existence.
Have you ever been cold?
No.
Warm, then?
No.
What about drunk? Ever do that?
From alcohol? That is not possible for me, sir.
Pity. What about love?
The act or the emotion?
They're both the same.
I believe that statement to be inaccurate, sir.
Maybe. Life is like loading twice your cargo weight onto your spacecraft. If it's canaries and you can keep half of them flying all the time, you're all right.
I doubt that statement is entirely accurate either, sir.
Accurate? That was a joke I just told you.
I do not understand.
You don't know what a joke is?
Of course I do. It is a witticism, a gag, a bon mot, a fluctuation of words concluding with a trick ending.
That's the dictionary meaning. I'm talking about humour, fun. Do you know what funny is?  Where is eight oh six?
Right over there, sir. Why?
You probably wouldn't understand that either.
Hello, there.
Status on the repair?
Working on it.
Commander, what do you think of Captain Okona?
Well, Okona is an interesting man, certainly. We've seen how he handles his ship. Apparently he knows how to handle people as well.
Then why does he work alone?
He's a man who lives his life by his own rules. He does what he does by choice. By his choice. Someday you'll make yours.
I already have.
So you agree with Okona that I am missing a very important human factor.
I never said that. I simply said that I've never seen you laugh.
I am capable of that function when it is expected of me.
Data, do you even know what a joke is?
Of course I do. It is a witticism, a gag, a bon mot, a fluctuation of
Stop. Look, it's just you and I here. We're talking, we're having an intimate conversation. Why? Because you're a 'droid and I'm a 'noid.
But why?
Because that's what I am.
Have I said something to offend you?
No.
Then why are you annoyed?
Because you're a 'droid and I'm a 'noid.
Humanoid.
Yes.
You told a joke.
Yes.
I am not laughing.
Yes.
Perhaps the joke was not funny.
No, the joke was funny. It's you, Data.
Are you sure?
Yes.
I agree. What do I do?
Well, under normal circumstances, I'd say seek a higher power. But in your case, probably a smarter computer is in order.
Computer, I wish to know more about humour. Why certain combinations of words and actions make humans laugh.
Source material on that subject is extensive. Please specify.
Animated presentation, humanoid. Interaction required.
Physical humour, cerebral, or general raconteur.
Of all performers available, who is considered funniest?
Twenty third century Stan Orega specialised in jokes about quantum mathematics.
No. Too esoteric. More generic.
Accessing.
That one. RW nine six three two one, twentieth century.
Programme installation complete. You may enter.
Thank you ladies and gentlemen. Thank you very much. You've been great. As a matter of fact I'd like to take you home with me. Unfortunately I took the last audience home and there's no more room. Boom, boom. But thank you, really. Thank you. Hey, and thank you for bringing me here. What's up?
Mister Comic, I wish to know what is funny.
Funny? I don't know. It's a matter of opinion, I guess. Tip O'Neill in a dress? Some people say words that end with a K are funny. A briefcase that looks like a fish. Personally I find that hysterical.
Tip O'Neill. Accessing. Twentieth century male, politician, overweight, wearing female clothing, carrying a valise that looks like a fish. So, the juxtaposition of gender and an amphibian briefcase is funny.
Well, I think whatever makes you laugh is funny.
Nothing makes me laugh. I wish to learn. COMIC How much time do we have here?
Unlimited.
We're going to need it. You, pal, are a tough room.
Tough room? A colloquialism meaning a severe, rigid, closed-minded audience. I understand. I will attempt to be an easy room. Show me what is funny.
All right, you're on. Jerry Lewis.
Mister Robot, would you like to come up?
I am an android.
Oh, I'm terribly sorry, Mister Android. Here, teeth. Put them in your mouth. Come up with me. Where'd he go?
Try, if you would. You go Ha!
That is considered to be funny?
Actually it brought the house down in Teaneck.
Ah, a word that ends in K. So, if you put funny teeth in your mouth and jump around like an idiot, that is considered funny.
I'm sorry, I didn't get your name.
Data.
Data, did you consider juggling, weird bird calls, stuff like that?
That does not apply. I simply want to know what is funny. I want to be able to involve myself in other people's laughter. I wish to join in.
I think that's nice. Let's put the physical stuff aside for a while, all right? We'll do some jokes. See, it's not my forte, but I think that would work good for you. If you would just have a seat and we'll try some jokes like. I dunno. We'll start with the classics. See, there's this travelling salesman. now. He's going down the road and his car breaks down, right?
Access faster.
Comes up on this farmhouse and
It's probably best when you do something like this. Need a cigar 'cos it's kind a prop kind of thing and you go like this and DATA Faster. Move to maximum speed.
A guy walks into the doctor's office The doctor tells him you need an operation. The guy says I want a second opinion. The doctor said, okay, you're ugly too. Ba-boom boom. Was that funny?
No.
Data, you spoiled the joke. It could have been your timing.
My timing is digital.  What?
That's funny.
Why?
It would take too long to explain. Tell me another joke.
A monk, a clone and a Ferengi decide to go bowling together.
Commander Data, report to the main Bridge immediately.
I will be back.
Bring new jokes.
We have an unidentified at twelve mark four. No response to our enquiries.
Extend hailing frequencies, all languages, all channels.
Extending.
Sensors show it to be an interplanetary vessel, sir. Class seven, crew complement twenty six.
Still no response. Captain, they are now locking lasers on us.
Lasers?
Yes, sir.
Lasers can't even penetrate our navigation shields. Don't they know that?
Regulations so call for a Yellow Alert.
A very old regulation. Well, make it so, Number One. And reduce speed. Drop main shields as well.
May I ask why, sir?
In case we decide to surrender to them, Number One.
Still no response to our hail, sir.
It is slowing and is holding its position, Captain.
Sir, we are now being hailed.
Viewer on.
Federation vessel, you have no rights in this solar system. I am Debin of planet Atlec, ordering you to heave to and prepare to be boarded.
Shades of Gulliver's Travels. He actually meant it.
But he is right. We are in their solar system. Open a channel.
Open, sir.
I am Captain Jean Luc Picard of the USS Enterprise. For what reason have you locked your weapons on us?
Enterprise, you are towing a spacecraft of a known criminal.
He was in need of emergency repair. It was our obligation to assist.
You have a man aboard by the name of Okona. I want him.
On what authority?
He is guilty of crimes committed on the planet Atlec. I expect him to be turned over to my authority immediately.
Mute.
What do you think, Counsellor?
He believes what he's saying. His anger is genuine.
Open. What crimes are you referring to?
Neither important nor necessary. I want Okona now!
Captain, we have another Class seven armed spacecraft approaching, from the opposite sector.
Another ship from Atlec?
Similar in specifications and capabilities, but a variation in markings and hailing language.
Debin, hold this position. Viewer off. Data, identify.
Sensors indicate it a security vessel from the planet Straleb.
Another glob fly.
Glob fly?
A Klingon fly, half the size of an Earth mosquito, with no sting and a buzzing sound like this.
Data. Viewer on. Hailing frequencies.
Open, sir
I am Secretary Kushell from the Legation of Unity of the planet Straleb.
I am Captain Picard.
We know who you are, Captain Picard. We have been monitoring your communications, and we know of the demands made by Debin of planet Atlec.
Then you're aware that we have no hostile interaction.
You only have to concede to one demand.
That word demand has a tone of finality.
It is a word I have chosen. We demand you turn Okona over to us immediately.
Mute.
Mister Okona to the Bridge immediately. Open. The same demand has been made by the Atlec legation.
I have no interest in their request, but we intend to back up our legal right to Okona.
I would rather not escalate this situation any further.
Our honour and prestige are at stake. We are prepared to take Okona by force and die in the doing of it if necessary.
I trust that that can be avoided. I will respond to your request shortly. Viewer off.
Captain Okona has not responded, sir. He's been reported in three different crew quarters.
Find him. Get him up here.
Yes, sir.
You will come with me to the main Bridge.
I'm sure it can wait a few minutes.
Now!
I'd like that. But I have my orders.
Some other time.  Remember what it took to drag me from your arms.
Am I going to meet Captain Picard?
Definitely.
Did I say something funny?
Captain Picard, this is Thadium Okona.
Mister Okona, you were welcomed aboard without any undue investigation. In turn it was assumed that you did not come under false pretenses. It now seems that you may have done.
Captain, if you mean my socialising with the members of the crew?
Mister Okona, you are free to socialise with the members of my crew. I'm talking about a man named Debin.
He's from Atlec. I've had dealings with some of his family.
Then perhaps you can explain why his craft is threatening to attack us unless I give him custody of you.
I can't.
Then tell me why Kushell of the planet Straleb is demanding the same thing?
He's here also?
And quite adamant. Mister Okona, what crimes are you accused of?
I am not a criminal.
Why do these men want you?
I can't say.
They're threatening to attack the Enterprise.
That would be crazy. They wouldn't stand a chance.
Right. Then you can offer no reason why they are set on this provocative course?
I can't think of one right now.
On viewer.
Which ship?
What? The first on. Captain Debin. Captain, let me ask you again. What are Okona's crimes?
That is not your concern.
It is if you wish me to release him to you.
All right, you want to know what he did? You want to know why I have chased him across this system? All right. Here, This is his crime.
He dishonoured my daughter. He took advantage of her, then he ran off and left her carrying his bastard child. He'll return, and he'll do the right thing or I'll hunt him to the ends of the galaxy.
Captain's log, supplemental. Some of the mystery surrounding this ancient morality play we've been dragged into has been revealed. One of Captain Okona's pursuers is an outraged father with a heartfelt, if arcane, sense of righteousness.
Your advice, Counsellor.
We are dealing with ancient codes involving procreation. While they may be meaningless to us, to Debin they represent his honour. He will fight, risking himself, his crew, his daughter and her unborn child.
You know, Captain, your Counsellor's right. He will fight.
The captain of the other ship is demanding to be heard.
I don't suppose you can give me any indication why this man wants you?
Let's put all this together. Lieutenant Worf, multiple image, full conference mode. Let them all see each other.
Yes, sir.
Here you are, Debin, trying to save this criminal.
My purpose is not your concern.
It is if it involves Okona.
Gentlemen, please, let's try and resolve this matter. Captain Kushell, what crime has Okona allegedly committed against you?
He is a thief. He stole the Jewel of Thesia. A national heritage.
A thing. An item. My case involves the victimisation of my daughter, and my honour. I'll have Okona now.
He is mine.
One at a time. Who accuses me of stealing?
I do. My son Benzan and I.
Father, please.
He used you to become my friend.
He used my daughter.
He used my son to plunder a national treasure.
Mute.
Terminate communications. Come with me.
Captain, you can't be afraid of those two or what they can do to your ship.
No, they could fire until their lasers ran dry and they wouldn't hurt the Enterprise. My predicament is what to do with you. OKONA I'm sorry. I'm sorry my ship broke down. I'm sorry you stopped to help. I'm sorry you're involved. But you're right. Whatever happens, however it goes, someone gets hurt. Hand me over to Kushell, and Debin goes to war.
And if I hand you over to Debin, then it's the same thing.
I wish I could. I wish I could make it easier.
I'm sure you do.
I'm not going to apologise for the way I am or how I live my life, but just for the record, I did not steal the Jewel of Thesia. I am not a criminal, Captain. And as to the other business, that's between me and Yanar, no one else.
In truth, I simply do not have authority in this matter. I'm not your judge, nor is it my duty to arbitrate. But you are in my custody, and that creates the dilemma.
How about this? Do what you said. Fix my guidance system and let me leave.
According to Starfleet regulations, that would be my only course of action. But their ships are faster than yours. I'm not doing you a favour.
Captain, with all due respect, that's not your concern. Besides, I can take care of myself.
You're quite a craftsman, Lieutenant La Forge. How soon?
What's the rush? I thought you liked it here.
I did. It stopped liking me. Time to disappear.
Where will you go?
What?
I said, where will you go?
A new place, if I make it.
Don't you ever stay anywhere?
Not for long.
I couldn't be like that.
Oh?
I mean, always being alone. Commander Riker says you choose to live the way you do and you like it.
Is that what he says?
Yeah. It would be difficult for me to be leaving all the time. I'd miss my friends, the people I love. I guess leaving's gotten easy for you.
I seem to have a way of using up a place.
I wasn't talking about a place.
I know. I know what you were talking about.
It's ready. You should be able to install this in roughly five minutes.
Like you said, Geordi, what's the rush? I have some friends around here. I think it's time to make a stand.
Mister Okona.
Captain, I've decided not to leave.
Oh.
Don't worry, I'm not staying either.
Just what are your plans, Mister Okona?
I've decided to surrender myself.
To which one?
There's really only one option.
Viewer on. Gentlemen, communicating like this is very distracting. I suggest that we beam you up to the Enterprise and we resolve this face to face.
Excellent.
Agreed.
Leave your weapons behind. Let's keep this civilised.
Number One, you have the Bridge. Counsellor Troi, would you accompany me to deck fourteen conference room. Worf, see to our guests.
Aye, sir.
They have no weapons.
This way.
Okona, you are without shame.
For once I agree with Debin. You are without shame. I trusted you. My son treated you like a brother. And then to steal from us. I want him now.
No, he's coming with me. Captain, my complaint was registered first.
Now please, please, be calm. Lieutenant, thank you.
Everyone is talking about me, and no one's talking to me. You all believe that I stole the jewel, and that it was I who fathered the child.
You dare call my daughter a liar?
And now I'm offered these two choices, and given these two options, condemnation as a thief or marriage to the beautiful Yanar. I will take the more pleasant sentence. I will take Yanar as my wife.
No! You can't!
My son is right. You can't escape that way.
That's not what I mean.
It's not up to you, or to Okona. I've been dishonoured. I will decide.
Wait. Since all of you believe Okona is the father of this child, then so be it. I'll marry you.
No! You can't.
Yes, I can.
Okona is still a thief.
No, he's not. Nothing has been stolen. The Jewel of Thesia has been taken into custody by its rightful heir. Me. I was to give it to Yanar as our pledge of marriage.
Marriage?
Yanar is carrying my child.
You said it was Okona's.
If I'd told you it was Benzan you would have gone to war with his father. So I let you believe it was Okona.
See how a man gets a reputation?
If I had told you I was giving the Jewel to Debin's daughter, you'd have disowned me.
Now we're hearing some truth.
So you let me chase Okona when you knew he was innocent.
Yes, because I didn't believe for one moment that you could catch him.
Well, said. He never would have.
And once Yanar accepted the Jewel the marriage would have been made.
Well, I never got it.
Then Okona does have the jewel.
I never had the chance to deliver it.
Anyway it's too late. I won't marry Benzan.
Then you'll marry Okona.
I won't marry anyone!
I have reinstated the same programme.
Along with some new jokes, I hope.
Programme complete. Enter when ready.
Comic, continue.
More freebies, huh? No cover, no minimum, just Comic, continue? Tell me, Data, what happened?
I told a joke.
And?
No one laughed.
No one? Nobody in the whole room?
I was the whole room.
She said I spoiled the joke.
Actually, killed would have been a better word.
You know, Data, I think I know what your problem is. You should always try out new material on an audience.
You know, he could be right. Perhaps an audience is what you need.
Computer. Programme an audience appropriate to this venue.
Yanar. You're angry at the embarrassment of all this, and maybe the timing and the approach is not the most romantic, but I know you love Benzan and I don't want to see you throw away that feeling just because your parents have been quarrelling for years and don't know how to behave properly. I've carried your messages back and forth for almost six months. I've smuggled each of you into the other's homeland. You feel for him the same way he feels for you.
I do love you. It is your child. Our child.
Marry me.
Yes.
We'll find a new planet to live on.
You'll live on Straleb.
No, no, no, no no. You'll live on Atlec.
I will not have this man raising my grandson.
The rest of this is an issue, gentlemen, to be settled between yourselves. Now if you will excuse us, we have business.
Thank you, Captain.
Your grandson?
My grandson.
Thank you. Thank you. Thanks for coming, folks. We got a great show for you tonight. I'm so excited this evening. Tonight I have for you the funny man of the stars, the android of antics, that Lieutenant Commander of mirth. Please give him a nice welcome, ladies and gentlemen, none other than. He's just the best. Data!
Good evening ladies and germs.  I come from a town so small, we had a fraction for a zip code.
You made a living doing this?
Yes, I did.
It was so small in fact we didn't have a godfather of crime, we had a nephew. I was so ugly as a child they hung a pork chop around my neck  so the dog would play with me.  And then there was the human cannonball who was hired and fired in the same night. Audience programme off. Discontinue Comic.
It was a holodeck audience. They were programmed to laugh at everything. Perhaps I should reprogram the audience to display a more accurate response.
Data, let me give you one. Being able to make people laugh, or being able to laugh, is not the end all and be all of being human.
No, but there is nothing more uniquely human.
Hold your speed, Captain Okona. Disengage.
Separated.
I'm under my own power now. Thank you, Enterprise. Thank you, Captain Picard.
Goodbye, Captain Okona.
Bye, Captain Okona. Say goodbye, Data.
Goodbye, Data.
Was that funny? Accessing. Ah. Burns and Allen, Roxy Theater, New York City, 1932. It still works. Then there was the one about the girl in the nudist colony that nothing looked good on?
We're ready to get underway, sir.
Take my Worf. Please.
Warp speed, sir?
Please.
I thought you might find this interesting, Mister Crusher. Few humans have ever seen an Antedean in the flesh.
Welcome. I'm Jean-Luc Picard, Captain of the Enterprise.
Are they alright, Captain?
Yes. This is their preferred way of space travel.
Their physical condition is good enough, considering the circumstances.
It is a self-induced catatonic state. Their way of dealing with the trauma of spaceflight.
Will we try to revive them?
No, not until we reach the Pacifica conference, three days from now. Doctor, have you prepared a Sickbay facility to accommodate our guests?
As soon as I can make some adjustments. Their physiology is unusual. You can store them for a few hours?
O'BRIEN:Sure. I'll have them kept out of the way here.
Mister Worf, provide security.
Aye, sir.
What's in that container?
Vermicula. It's their food. When they come out of stasis, they'll be very hungry.
They eat this?
In great quantities.
What a handsome race.
So what did you think of the Antedeans, Wesley?
They are rather strange-looking, Commander.
Judging a being by its physical appearance is the last major human prejudice, Wesley.
Your point is well taken, Mister Data. I'm sure that to the Antedeans, we are equally unattractive.
Captain, we are being hailed by a small transport vessel, just coming into range.
Oh, my God.
What's the problem?
What's she doing here?
On screen, Captain.
Starship Enterprise, come in.
We have you on our viewer, pilot.
Enterprise, I have a passenger. A VIP passenger who I'm ordered to
Oh, let me talk to them. I'm sure I'm more articulate than that.
Mother.
Captain, we are receiving Starfleet orders granting a Lwaxana
Lwaxana Troi, daughter of the Fifth House, Holder of the Sacred Chalice of Rixx, Heir to the Holy Rings of Betazed.
Full ambassadorial status, sir.
It looks like it's back into that dress uniform, sir.
And yours as well, Commander. She is listed as representing the Betazed government at the conference.
Mother, please, don't do this to me.
Do what to you, Little One? Oh, Jean-Luc. What naughty thoughts. But how wonderful you still think of me like that.
It's so like my mother to do the unexpected.
It will be pleasant to have her as a guest of the Enterprise again. Energise.
Legs! Where are the legs?
Where they belong, Mother, Right under you.
Oh, I hate that. I will never completely trust this device, Jean-Luc.
Captain Picard, Mother.
Aaagh!
Explain to her.
I'm sorry they startled you, Mrs. Troi. They're Antedean delegates. They're being stored here temporarily.
Delegates? Last time I saw something like that, it was being served on a plate. Darling. Well, well, well. And you, Jean-Luc, I wasn't aware you had such handsome legs. My valet is waiting. You may beam him aboard now.
You remember Mister Homn, of course.
It would be hard to forget Mister Homn.
I retain his services despite the outlandishly lustful thoughts he spews in my direction. You can put that down, Homn. We can't deny the Captain the honour of carrying my belongings.
I will not interfere with Homn's duties this time.
That's not what you're really thinking, Jean-Luc. You forget I'm a telepath.
Mrs.Troi, since this obviously significant to you, I'll  I'll carry it.
Just down this corridor.
He has nice legs too, Little One. Is he still yours?
Humans no longer own each other that way, Mother.
Really? That's a custom we may have to introduce again.
Thank you.
Glad to help.
Well, I trust you will be comfortable here. If you will excuse me.
I am be serving a Betazoid dinner of greeting tonight, Captain. It is an ambassadorial function.
It sounds delightful.
He's a fine man. Solid, reliable. He's a little on the stuffy side, but, all in all, he's not that bad.
I can't believe you, Mother. You sound like you're sizing up a commodity.
But that's exactly what men are, darling. Especially human men. Was your father ever unhappy with me?
No. He worshipped you. But I don't think I'll ever learn to see men the way you do.
You will as you mature, darling. And the men in your life are going to bless you for it. You're so beautiful.
And she actually complimented Captain Picard on his legs?
I would have thought a telepath would be more discreet, sir.
Exactly the opposite. She knows what's in your mind and she lets you know what's on hers.
Gentlemen. I think we must not lose sight of the fact that we're talking about someone who has been granted ambassadorial rank. Even though she may appear somewhat eccentric, Lwaxana Troi must be treated with the appropriate respect. Is that understood? Picard to Pulaski.
Yes, Captain.
When did you last time you look in on the Antedean guests?
Doing so right now, Captain.
Are they still catatonic?
Status of the beings is unchanged. Pulse, still steady. Respiration normal for them.
Understood. Keep me informed. Picard out. I'll be in my quarters. It will be a dress uniform dinner, gentlemen.
Sir?
To which dinner was the Captain referring, sir?
Nothing I've been invited to. Any of you? Very interesting!
Doctor? You're not attending the dinner with the rest of us this evening?
I've already eaten, but thanks, Captain.
I seem to be a little early. I'm sure the others will be here soon. The other officers? Commander Riker? Counsellor Troi?
Hello, Jean-Luc. So glad you could come.
A toast to Earthmen, who, despite their faults, have that unique ability to charm women of all races, in all corners of the galaxy.
Speaking on behalf of men of Earth, which is indeed an awesome responsibility, I thank you.
I know what you're thinking, Captain.
You do?
You're wondering whether I'm seeing any other man. On a serious basis.
Well, actually, I wasn't
I wouldn't worry about it, Jean-Luc. Competition seems to bring out the best in the human male.
The fact is, I wasn't expecting this setting. I had assumed that my senior Bridge officers would be attending.
You never assume anything where Lwaxana Troi is concerned. Betazoid women are full of surprises. Strange, I'm not really very hungry tonight. I wonder what's made me lose my appetite? Any ideas?
Of course, you're giving thanks for your food. I'd forgotten about that. I wonder how many other cultures have similar customs.
I don't know.
Well, let's find out. Commander Data?
Yes, Captain?
Mrs. Troi and I are having a very interesting discussion about various societies' ways of giving thanks. The Betazoid use of the chime, for instance.
The use of the chime is unique, but not at all dissimilar to the
Ooolans of Marejaretus Six, who use two large stones which are continuously struck during the meal. Those at the dinner must eat until the stones are broken.
Or the oligarchy on Atifs Four, which require a young
Data, this is fascinating. Don't you agree, Mrs. Troi? Commander, if your duties permit, why don't you join us for dessert? I'm sure that Mrs. Troi would much appreciate the pleasure of your company.
What?
Indeed, sir. I'm on my way. Data out.
How could you possibly think I would want to share our special time together with that, that, robot of yours?
Because of Data's wonderful after-dinner conversation. His anecdotes are the stuff of legends aboard this ship.
So, by using the square root of pi and multiplying it by nine to the third power, I was able to accurately calculate the distance between the Omicron system and the Crab Nebula.
Fascinating, Data, absolutely fascinating. I'm sure Mrs. Troi would love to hear the one about the anomalous chemical composition of brown dwarf stars.
Not really.
Yes, Captain. That is a particularly spellbinding subject. In most stars, the rare Earth element europium is enriched relative to samarium and gadolinium
Is that so?
It is. However,
Your mother seems quite an interesting woman, Deanna.
Perhaps I should tell you something about my mother's condition at this time.
Condition at this time?
It's something that occurs to Betazoid females as they enter mid-life. We call it the phase.
Mid-life? As in a human female's menopause?
Similar. It's only at mid-life that a Betazed female becomes, well, fully sexual, if you know what I mean.
Yes, I think I do. I also think that I saw the Captain on his way to her quarters.
I wonder if I shouldn't warn him?
No. As ship's Doctor I'd consider it excellent exercise for his reflexes and agility.
Doctor !
For staying ahead of your mother.
Yes. An animal is always at its best when hunted.
Or when hunting.
And at this point, the second co-orbital satellite avoids a collision with the first.
Deanna, darling. Thank the Four Deities you're here.
I hope I'm not interrupting.
No, I must, as a matter of fact, be getting back to the Bridge.
Captain. Perhaps I should remain and further entertain our guest.
No! I mean, I'm sure you're needed on the Bridge as well.
Well, thank you for a delicious meal. We must do this again sometime.
I know we will.
Well, Little One, the Captain is every bit as charming as your father was.
Data, you will never know just how much I owe you for that.
Indeed, Captain? I know many more interesting anecdotes, sir. For example,
Data.
Sir?
Later.
Yes, sir.
Why would you come aboard at a time like this?
I had no choice. I was going to Pacifica, you were going to Pacifica.
Don't be absurd, Mother. You knew what would happen.
What stage is it in?
I have it completely under control.
What stage is it in?
Well, far enough along for me to enjoy it, Little One.
Now I know why you wore that dress.
Don't be ridiculous. This simple little dress? Nothing provocative about it.
What are we going to do?
I'm going to do the only honourable thing there is to do. And I'd say your Captain has the inside track.
Mother, don't even think it.
Why not? He was thinking about it all through dinner.
I was what? I tell you, Deanna, for a telepath, your mother's accuracy leaves much to be desired.
Actually, her telepathic prowess is quite advanced. Except for now.
Except for now?
Don't misunderstand me, Counsellor. Your mother is a beautiful person,
My mother is beginning a physiological phase. It's one that all Betazoid women must deal with as they enter mid-life.
Yes, it's something Troi warned me about when we first started to see each other. A Betazoid woman, when she goes through this phase, quadruples her sex drive.
Or more.
Or more? You never told me that.
I didn't want to frighten you. She has opted for the only dignified option open to her.
Isolation?
She has decided to focus all of her sexual energy on one male, who will, of course, eventually become her husband. It seems, Captain, that you are the early favourite.
Congratulations, sir!
I'm not amused, Number One. There must be some way to convince her that it's quite impossible, without offending her.
You cannot apply human style logic to this, Captain. A Betazoid woman in the phase would be shocked and deeply resentful, should you spurn any such advances. She would take it personally.
Well, under the circumstances, I think it would be prudent if I were to make myself less available for the duration of this journey.
Agreed.
Setting, San Francisco California, United States Of America. The year, 1945 A.D. The office of Dixon Hill, Private Investigator.
Programme complete. You may enter when ready.
Hi, Dix.
Madeline. Good to see you again.
You're too much, Dix. You make it sound like you ain't seen me in a year. You got two calls. They're on your desk.
New cases?
Are you kidding? The last time we had a new case, Hitler and Stalin were bosom buddies. The landlord came by. He wants the geetas or he wants you out.
The geetas?
The moolah, Dix. The rent. And since we're on the subject, it's been a month since I seen anything. Now I know it's been tough, since you got out of the hospital, but I got responsibilities.
Then I suppose I had better get a case.
It wouldn't hurt.
Unavailable? Ship's business? You mean ship's business takes precedence over me?
I'm afraid so, Mother.
Oh, well, he was too old for me anyway. Homn, perhaps we should consider my alternate plan.
Alternate plan?
You worry too much, Little One. Your mother has the situation well in hand.
There's a gentleman here to see you, Mister Hill. And he doesn't look like a client.
Hill? The name is Slade Bender.
Excuse me.  What can I do for you, Mister Bender?
It's about Alva.
You'll have to be a little more precise.
Okay, you want to play stupid? That's jake with me. A week ago a man came in here. He wanted you to find his girlfriend. Name's Alva.
Did I find her?
You know, you're getting on my nerves. You found her, all right. Face down in the river.
I'm sorry to hear that.
Yeah, yeah, we're all broken up about it. Especially the boyfriend, who's been indicted for murder.
And what are you here to do? Ask for a refund?
Nah, I'm here to kill you!
Computer, freeze programme. Computer, this isn't what I wanted at all. It's much to violent. I'm here to relax, not to dodge bullets. Reconfigure.
Please define.
More ambience. Less substance.
Do you wish to leave the holodeck and re-enter, or continue from this point?
I will continue.
Programme complete. You may continue.
There's a gentleman here to see you, Mister Hill.
Thank you, Madeline.
You a private dick?
That's what it says on my door.
Is that supposed to be funny? 'Cos if it is, you gotta know that I ain't in the mood for funny. Now, I came here on serious business. There's a job I want you to do for me.
Computer, freeze programme. Clear. Computer, this still isn't right. One kind of violence is being substituted for another. Reconfigure.
You may continue.
Thank you.
You're through ducking me, Hill!
Computer, freeze programme! Variations on a theme. Computer, perhaps I am not clearly defining my intent.
The flexibility of the programme is limited to the parameters of the Dixon Hill novels.
Yes. Of course.
Even in this state, they possess a certain dignity, a graceful countenance.
If you say so, Lieutenant.
I see. Is this how you felt when you first saw me?
Well, maybe at first, a little. But now that I've seen more Klingons, I've come to think you're handsome for a Klingon. That didn't quite come out the way I meant, sir.
I still say they look better in sauce. When will the good Captain revive them?
Not until we reach Pacifica, ma'am.
You seem a fine boy. One day you'll grow up to be a big, strong man. But I'm afraid I cannot afford to wait for you to mature. Now that's more like it. Your thoughts, they're primal, savage. I like that in a man.
I am not a man.
Which is in your favour, men so often being irrational and egotistical. But unfortunately, I've grown accustomed to human companionship. Pity. You'd have made a fine choice. Well, who's next, Mister Homn?
Ah yes. Let's do it, I'm not getting any younger.
What was that all about?
So, Madeline, I'll see you later. Activate programme.
Leaving, Dix? You're not to Rex's bar, are you?
Rex's bar? Why do you ask?
It's one of the messages I left on your desk.
That sounds like an excellent idea. Would you care to join me?
Me? Have a drink with you?
Why not?
There ain't no why not about it. It's just that this is the first time you ever asked.
Is that a problem?
Not for me, but you'd better take this.
Why?
Because if we're going to Rex's bar, you're gonna need it.
Hey, Dix. What do you know and what do you say? See this?  Germany's getting ready to invade England.
Who's going to stop them?
Somebody'd better.
Just as long as it isn't us. The last thing America needs to do is fight in another world war.
Actually, the Second World War, although disastrous, did end with the United States taking its place as a dominant world power and cultural influence in the second half of the twentieth century. Additionally, that war was a catalyst of technological advancement. Developments in rocketry and fission resonate on into the twenty fourth century.
I don't know if I should pour you one, Dix. Sounds like you've got a snootful already.
What's this?
The usual.
Ah, now let me see. That would be Scotch, neat.
What else?
And for the lady?
Rye and ginger.
Money. I keep forgetting the need to carry money. I must remember not to let this happen again.
Right. I don't mind you being on the cuff, but you're up the sleeve halfway to my collar.
Is that why you wanted to see me, about my bar bill?
No, it's on account of Jimmy Cuzzo.
Jimmy Cuzzo. I know that name.
He's why I gave you the gun.
What was the name of that case he was involved in? The Parrot's Claw.
Jeez, Dix. Cuzzo's the guy who iced Marty O'Farron. They never would have nailed him if it hadn't been for you. Your testimony got him arraigned.
Yeah. Yours and mine.
So you brought me here because you didn't want to face him alone.
I don't want to face him at all. I'm hoping that seeing us together will slow him up long enough to get some things straight.
And if it doesn't?
Then you just have to kill him.
Bridge, this is Doctor Pulaski.
We've just completed the transfer. The Antedeans are now in Sickbay.
Acknowledged, Doctor.
Mother, what are you doing here? You can't just stroll on to the Bridge whenever you feel like it.
I didn't just stroll on, dear. I took the turbo tube, or whatever you call it. The Captain's not here?
He is busy elsewhere, ma'am.
I have other interests as well.
You're scheming something, Mother. Don't try to fool me, I can tell.
You're always so melodramatic, Little One. I'm not scheming, I'm deciding.
Mother, not him.
And why not him? He's adorable.
Pulaski to Bridge.
Riker here.
The Antedeans are coming around. They are currently in the early stages of post hibernation.
How long until they're fully conscious?
I'd guess it to be a matter of hours now.
Very well, I'll inform the Captain. If you'll excuse me, ma'am.
You're going to see the Captain? But I thought he was tied up on ship's business.
In a manner of speaking he is. I'm not going to be disturbing him, I'll just give him the message.
Excellent timing. Then you may also inform him about us.
Us?
You don't mind if I let our ship's crew know first, do you, William? Friends. Dear friends. You are all invited to a prestigious occasion on the planet Pacifica.
No.
There, on the shores of the Western Sea, in a traditional Betazoid ceremony, your Commander Riker and I will be joined in the union of matrimony.
Married?
Until death us do part.
Mrs. Troi, I don't know how to tell you this.
I know how you feel, dear. You're overwhelmed with excitement. Believe me, I understand. We'll talk about the details later. Right now, there are preparations to be made.
Why did you stop me? Someone needs to set her straight!
I think I'll leave that to the Captain.
Coward.
Commander. Are you planning on going into the holodeck?
I thought I might. Would you like to join me?
Could you postpone our departure for just five minutes, sir?
No problem.
You said you had responsibilities. What exactly did you mean?
You know about my mother's cousin, the girl from San Antonio I told you about?
Jimmy.
I'm as jumpy as Haircut Lapinski trying to land on a fraction.
Sorry to bother you, Captain.
Captain?
Call me Dix.
Sorry to bother you, Dix, but our two passengers have awakened.
Then it's time for me to go.
What about Jimmy Cuzzo? You can't leave Rex to face him alone.
I'll be back before Jimmy Cuzzo arrives. I guarantee it will be taken care of. Just relax.
Your friends've got time for one drink, haven't they, Dix?
Oh, yes, of course. One more round. These are my associates. This is Nails, from Chicago. And this is
Carlos.
From South America. This is Madeline, my secretary, and I want you to meet Rex. You know, I don't think I ever heard your last name?
Hm. Don't think I have one. Just Rex, that's all. So, fellas, tell me your troubles.
Well, troubles. We've got some, Captain. It seems that a certain woman, both wealthy and beautiful, now thinks that that she's going to marry me.
She's got looks and bucks? Sounds like you've got yourself a heck of a deal.
My fianc just has to see how I look in this. Come along, Homn.
Hello, computer? Is Commander Riker still on the Bridge?
Negative. Riker is currently in holodeck three.
Holodeck? Where is that?
Follow the comm. panel lights. They will lead you there.
Good God, what's that?
I'll bet that's the broad with the big bucks. Come on over here, darlin'. I got the best stool in the house saved for you.
So, this is where you've been hiding, Jean-Luc. I'm surprised you let this part of the ship get this dirty. Oh, relax, Commander. You've been making your true feelings quite clear. Obviously you feel unable to handle me.
Anyway, why would a beautiful high-class lady like yourself want to hook up with a mug like that? You're too good for him, if you ask me.
You are a very interesting person.
You're not so bad yourself. In fact, you're as much class as this joint's ever seen. Here. On the house. It's French. Almost.
This is the most remarkable man. I have never met anyone quite like him.
I don't suppose you have.
He's strong. I get no thoughts from him at all. Nothing. I've never known a man so able to keep his true feelings completely hidden.
That's because
No man has ever been such a mystery to me. I usually know their thoughts before they do.
But not with me, huh?
No. And I never realised how erotic that could be. Carry my beverage to that table. We have some things to discuss.
Should we tell her?
I think it would be only fair. But let's allow her the moment.
Food. Food. Food. Food. Food.
Worf, the vermicula.
Pulaski to Captain Picard.
Go ahead, Doctor.
Our passengers are on their feet.
Understood.
I'd better get to the Bridge.
What's their condition?
Hungry. Would you like to be shown to your rooms?
Are you coming, Mrs. Troi?
Not just yet. Tell William I'm sorry, but Rex and I are getting married.
Mrs. Troi, your government expects us to deliver you to the conference on time, and that's what I intend to do.
Pity. Duty calls, darling. But I'll be back for you later.
Mrs. Troi, there is something you ought to know about Rex.
Oh?
Imagine, allowing me to go on like that with that man, who doesn't even exist.
But you always say you like surprises, Mother.
Why are they still here?
We thought that since you're going to the same conference, you might like to beam down with the other delegates.
They're not delegates. Those two are assassins.
That is an outrage! Lies! We demand you transport at once!
Don't bother to deny it. Your minds are so unsophisticated I can read your thoughts in my sleep. Their robes are lined with ultritium, highly explosive, virtually undetectable by your transporter.
She is correct, sir. I am detecting large amounts of ultritium.
Well of course you are. They were planning on blowing up the entire conference.
Mister Worf, take them to level five. Disarm them. Hold them for questioning.
Aye, sir.
Ah well, I didn't find a mate, but I did save the conference, as well as your reputations. All in a day's work, I suppose.
Goodbye Mrs. Troi, and thank you. Energise, Chief O'Brien.
Jean-Luc. Shame on you for thinking such a thing.
Time, Mister Data?
We will arrive within transporter range in three minutes twenty one seconds.
I've finally established audio contact with the Romulan ship.
Main power failing. No way to stop the overload.
Enterprise to Romulan vessel. We are en route to your position.
Enterprise, what is your time of arrival? We are facing an imminent core breach.
Repeat your last transmission.
I'm sorry, Captain. They've stopped transmitting.
Picard to Riker.
Riker here.
Transport to the Romulan ship as soon as we're within range.
Aye, sir. No weapons. We don't want them to think they're under attack.
This is not a bright idea.
I beg your pardon, Ensign. I didn't quite catch that.
Nothing, sir.
All main thrusters are shut down. Your information is unreliable. The AH is inoperative. Give me a hand here.
We're from the Federation Starship Enterprise. We received your distress call.
The Enterprise?
That's right. Your message said you'd suffered a failure in your engine core.
Yes. We had a forced chamber explosion in the resonator coil.
It's a pretty strange set up, but it looks like the graviton field generator has been completely depolarised. There's no way to fix it. It'll have to be replaced.
Where are your replicators?
They are offline.
Who's in charge here?
The Captain is dead. I'm the science officer. Mirok.
We'd like to move the generator back to the Enterprise for replication.
All right.
Geordi, you and Ro.
La Forge to Brossmer. Two people and one piece of equipment to beam aboard.
Aye, sir.
What the hell? Engineering, I need more power to the primary energising coil. Brossmer to Commander Riker. I'm losing them I have to abort.
They should be returning to your coordinates, sir.
Chief, do you have them? They're not here.
No, sir.
Where are they?
I can't locate their patterns.
We've lost them, sir.
I've done all I can, sir. I'm afraid they're gone.
Mister Data, begin a level one diagnostic. All transporter systems offline until further notice. Could they have materialised somewhere else?
Negative, Captain. Sensors are unable to locate them anywhere within transporter range.
Counsellor?
Riker to Enterprise.
Go ahead, Number One.
Captain, we're still looking at a core breach unless we can fashion a new graviton generator.
I need replacement personnel, sir.
Mister Data, you may continue the diagnostic of the transporter systems at another time. Take a shuttlecraft and two more engineers down to the Romulan ship.
Aye, sir.
Mister McDowell, alert the main shuttlebay to have all available ships and pilots standing by in case we need them.
Aye, sir.
Ensign, lay in a course away from the Romulan vessel. Engage at warp one if you detect any sign it's going to explode.
Pressure in the containment chamber has increased fifteen melakols in the last two minutes.
What can we do to stop the overload?
Most of the conduits were damaged during the explosion. I can't even access the central computer.
Commander. Emergency bulkheads have sealed this section off from the rest of the ship. There is no way to gain access to the main Bridge or control centres.
Survivors?
Readings indicate at least seventy three Romulans are still alive.
Seventy three.
The pressure has jumped two hundred melakols!
I've lost control of the containment chamber.
It's going to implode.
We'll need to dump the entire engine core. Do you have an auto-eject system?
Yes, but it's not functioning. I'll have to do it manually.
Mister Worf, you two seal the chamber.
Implosion will occur in one minute five seconds.
Enterprise, we need to jettison the entire engine core. You'll need to extend the shields once it clears the hull.
Understood, Number One. We'll stand by for your signal.
We must get the doors closed.
Commander!
Time?
Thirty seconds.
I'm ready, Commander.
Stay there! Eject the chamber on my order!
Excuse me, sir.
Now.
Enterprise, extend shields!
Well, we're still here.
Yes.
We'll have a complete power survey done within the hour. We'll probably have to supply them with energy for life support, and they'll need a new engine core to get home.
Understood, Commander. Keep us informed of your efforts. Picard out. I'll be in Sickbay.
Aye, sir.
Ensign Ro to the Bridge. This is Ensign Ro reporting in. I'm at section twenty three baker, near Sickbay.  Sickbay.
Excuse me, I need some help. Excuse me? Excuse me, I need some help.
Excuse me! I need some help!
We shouldn't make any hasty decisions, Jean-Luc. The transporter could've beamed them somewhere else. The Romulan ship, another deck of the Enterprise.
We've already checked those possibilities. The initial findings would seen to indicate that there was a radiation surge from the Romulan engine core which disrupted the signal. They never rematerialised.
We should check again. There might be something that we've overlooked and
Beverly, we've done everything that we can.
You're right. I just hate making out death certificates. Does Ensign Ro have any family?
Captain, I'm right here.
None that I know of, but I'll check with the Bajoran liaison Office.
I'm not dead!
I'll have the official reports ready within the hour.
Captain, I don't know what's going on
Doctor. Doctor Crusher. Doctor Crusher, I'm right here. Damn it.
We're ready, Commander.
Riker to Enterprise. Begin power transfer.
The power flow is consistent at four hundred kolems. No fluctuations in frequency. The main power grid is online.
Picard to Riker.
Riker here. Power transfer appears stable at this end, Captain.
Good.
What is the status of the engine replacement?
Engineering is modifying one of our subspace resonators to act as a new engine core. It won't do more than warp two, but it'll get them home.
Very well.
Captain. The diagnostic of the transporter system shows an anomalous energy fluctuation. I will need to inspect the imaging scanner in transporter room three.
By all means.
Captain? I have a personal favour to ask. I considered Commander La Forge to be my best friend. I believe it is my responsibility to plan and conduct the memorial service. May I have your permission to do so?
Permission granted. Make whatever arrangements you think are appropriate.
Thank you, sir.
Commander, the  the Romulans want a computer. We cannot give them access to Federation technology. That is an unacceptable security risk.
What about a computer core from thirty or forty years ago? One the Romulans are already familiar with.
That would be satisfactory.
Check with the Enterprise, see what's available. Be sure your concern are addressed before we install it.
Aye, sir. Thank you.
La Forge?
Ro. Boy, am I glad to see you. And I'm really glad that you can see me. It's like I'm here, but I'm not here.
No one can see me either.
I can't figure it out. One minute we were transporting from the Romulan vessel, and the next I wake up in the arboretum with a splitting headache. Can you pass through things like bulkheads?
Tables, people, yeah.
Well, we're solid enough to each other.
It's not what you expected, is it.
What do you mean?
This. Death.
What?
We're dead, Geordi.
Is that some kind of a joke?
Our patterns were lost in a transporter malfunction. We never rematerialised after leaving the Romulan ship.
Wait a minute. What are you saying, that we're some sort of spirits?
Spirits, souls. My people used to call them borhyas. Whatever term you want to use, we're it.
But my uniform, my visor. Are you saying I'm some blind ghost with clothes?
I don't have all the answers. I've never been dead before.
We are not dead.
According to Doctor Crusher, we died in a transporter malfunction at fourteen thirty hours. Geordi, I saw her make out the death certificates. We need to make peace with our former lives. That's what I was taught. We have to say goodbye to the people who were in our lives.
No. You may be ready for the afterlife, but I'm not.
I don't see that we have much of a choice. When I was growing up, I never gave much thought to all the talk about borhyas. I figured that it was just superstition passed on to children.
Fine. You go make peace with yourself, all right? I'm going to transporter room three. I'm going to figure a way out of this situation.
I didn't have any warning that something would go wrong, sir. Suddenly their patterns just weren't there.
I believe the cause of the accident may be related to the explosion on the Romulan ship.
Really?
But that happened before we even arrived.
In all likelihood, the explosion damaged the Romulan cloaking device, causing it to discharge chroniton particles. I am detecting a chroniton field in here.
A chroniton field?
If the particles were produced on the Romulan ship, why are you detecting them here?
The transporter beam.
I suspect they travelled through the transporter beam. That may have been the cause of Geordi and Ro's death. I will go to the Romulan ship. Perhaps I can discover the source of the emissions.
Commander, are these chronitons dangerous?
They pose no danger to humans. However, some of the ship's systems may be affected by prolonged exposure. When I return I will devise a method to eradicate them.
La Forge to Ensign Ro.
Thanks for the ride. I'm here to say goodbye.
There are a lot of what appear to be experimental engine components lying around over there. I'd say they were testing a new warp drive design and it blew up in their faces.
That would explain why they're so far away from Romulan space. To avoid being picked up on Federation long range scans.
We should have an engine core ready for them by nineteen hundred hours.
Commander, there'll be a memorial service at twenty three hundred hours this evening. Mister Data is making arrangements.
I'll be there.
Me, too.
In fact I might like to say a few words.
You did know La Forge longer than any of us.
Actually, I was thinking more about Ensign Ro.
Me?
When you're ready, coordinate with Mister Data.
Wait a minute. What are you going to say about me?
Captain. I don't believe this. I'm dead. you can't even hear me and I'm still intimidated by you. I just wanted to say thank you. For trusting in me when no one else would.
Hey, there you are. Excuse me, Captain. Listen, Data's taking the next shuttle over to the Romulan vessel and we need to be on it.
Why?
because I think what happened to us, the answers are over there.
Why can't you just accept the fact
Look, if you're right then we're dead and this doesn't make any difference. But if I'm right, then we're still alive and I'm going to need your help.
Lieutenant, I am planning a memorial service for Commander La Forge and Ensign Ro. I would like you to participate.
What kind of service?
Captain Picard asked me to arrange a ceremony that was appropriate. I have given a great deal of thought as to what is appropriate in this instance.
Sir, shuttlecraft four has not yet cleared the Romulan ship.
Hold position here.
This is weird, listening to them plan our funeral.
I find I am having difficulty deciding what kind of service to have. Do you have any suggestions?
Human custom is to conduct a solemn, dignified service in which the dead are praised by their friends and loved ones.
Ensign Ro was Bajoran. Her beliefs should be reflected as well. However their death rituals are quite complicated.
Please, not the Death Chant.
The Bajoran Death Chant is over two hours long.
I am not certain that either human or Bajoran rites are fitting, and I have researched the funerary customs of over five thousand cultures to no avail.
Shuttlecraft four has just cleared.
Resume course. In almost all societies, it is traditional to say a ritual farewell to those you call friends. I never knew what a friend was until I met Geordi. He spoke to me as though I were human. He treated me no differently from anyone else. He accepted me for what I am. And that, I have learned, is friendship. But I do not know how to say goodbye.
He seems almost human, doesn't he.
Commander, I am not the proper person to advise you.
Why?
I am very happy for Commander La Forge. He has crossed over to that which is beyond. For a Klingon, this is a joyful time. A friend has died in the line of duty and he has earned a place among the honoured dead. It is not a time to mourn.
Begin docking procedure.
Data, that's a nice sentiment, but a little premature. I don't plan on being commemorated before my time.
I'm afraid I fail to see the point of this investigation, Commander.
Chroniton emissions may have been responsible for the accident which claimed the lives of our officers.
A most regrettable event, of course.
Was your cloaking device damaged in the explosion?
All of our systems were damaged, including the cloaking device.
That explains the chroniton fields I am detecting in here now. For your own safety, it is important to eliminate those emissions.
Our safety?
There is no way to predict what will happen when the chronitons interact with the new engine core.
I've never seen anything like this. There's something in here that looks like a molecular phase inverter.
What's that?
It's supposed to change the structure of matter so it can pass through normal matter and energy. Hang on a second. A few years back, we got intelligence reports that the Klingons were working on trying to combine a phase inverter and a cloaking device. In theory, they believed that a phased ship could hide anywhere, even inside a planet, and that conventional weapons would be useless against it.
How far did they get in their research?
It never got out of the preliminary stages. There were several accidents. The Romulans might be pursuing the same technology, trying to combine an inverter and a cloaking device. And if this is the prototype
Then that would explain the explosion and the chroniton fields.
And us.
You mean we're cloaked?
Not just cloaked, phased. Our entire molecular structure altered so that we don't have any substance.
Then that would mean we're not dead.
Yes. It would also mean that there's probably a way to de-phase us.
The field emissions are particularly strong in this area.
You can be assured that the emissions will be eliminated before the engine core is replaced.
Commander, may I speak with you?
If they come back they're going to discover the interphase generator.
Is their power transfer beam still at full intensity?
Yes. It will be until we're ready to switch to internal power.
We will set up a muon feedback wave inside the transfer beam. The particles will accumulate in their dilithium chamber. When they go to warp speed, their engines will explode.
We've got to get to the Enterprise and warn them.
How?
I don't know, but we have to find a way. Come on.
The muon feedback wave's not showing up on any of the engine displays.
The Romulans must be hiding it in a sensor return signal. Unless someone runs a level three diagnostic, they'd never detect it. There must be a way to warn them before the ship goes to warp.
This is puzzling. Three more chroniton fields have formed aboard the Enterprise in the last hour.
There's no reason why the interphase device would be producing new fields aboard this ship.
We should begin decontamination immediately. Run an internal sensor sweep for locations of all chroniton fields on the Enterprise.
Aye, sir. The following areas are showing contamination. Sickbay, Transporter room three, main Bridge, Captain's Ready room, shuttlebay two, and main Engineering.
Ro, look at this.
I do not understand how these new fields have formed. No transporter beam has been active in any of those areas. I cannot see that they have anything in common.
Oh, yes they do.
In fact, they seem to be appearing at random.
No, they're not. We were in every one of those locations. Somehow we're leaving chroniton footprints behind us.
Can you narrow the focus of the scan to pinpoint the locations?
Not with the internal sensors, Commander.
Go to science station two on the main Bridge. Use a lateral sensor array to get a more precise reading. I will modify an anyon emitter to eliminate the fields once they've been isolated.
Why don't you go with her and see what the lateral sensors turn up. I'll stay here with Data.
Right.
Well that's interesting. You're reading chroniton readings in here, but not from me? There's a field in this wall? Why? Data, I came through this wall. I walked right through it when I came in here. When the phased matter in my body passed through the wall, it must've disrupted the wall's molecular structure producing a chroniton field. Data, I'm right here that's me you're reading. Watch.
Come on, it's me. You see?
Do not move. Yes, I can see you.
Who are you?
Where is the scientific officer? The one like us. The one who came with you to our ship. He spoke of a plan to return to normal. Yes, this disruptor works. I was wearing it when I was changed. Now, where is he?
Data, stop being so rational. Try using your imagination once in a while. These aren't just random patterns, it's me!
Hey, watch where you point that thing. Wait a minute, Data, I think you did something here . It's not so easy to push through any more. The molecules in my hand must have been partially de-phased by the anyon beam. Data, if a low level beam can bring my hand part of the way back, maybe a high level beam can bring me all of the way back. I'll just have to get you to turn up the beam intensity so that. Hey, wait a minute, don't stop now. No, no, no. Data, don't give up on it. It works, I was just creating more fields. Your method is fine. You just need to turn up the intensity, Data.
He's in here.
Brossmer to Commander Data.
Data here.
I've just detected a large chroniton field on deck seventeen. The field strength is three hundred percent above the others we've found, sir.
Is that Ro?
Acknowledged.
Get up. Where is the science officer?
I'll go. Commander?
Excuse me for interrupting, Lieutenant.
Ro!
I'm detecting a chroniton field in your room. May I scan the area?
Certainly.
Thanks.
Any time.
There's still no indication that the Romulans set up a muon wave in our dilithium chamber.
It's there, and when they go to warp
Incoming message from the Romulan ship, Captain.
On screen.
Now what?
Installation of the new engine core has been completed. We are ready to switch to internal power, Enterprise.
Understood. Disconnect the power-transfer beam.
We are now on internal power. Captain Picard, please accept my sincere thanks on behalf the Romulan Empire.
Don't listen to him, Captain.
It was our pleasure, Mirok. And I hope that this example of cooperation between our two peoples will not be an isolated incident.
As do I, Captain.
Set a course for the Garadius system. Warp six.
No, Captain wait.
Don't do it, sir.
Captain. I'm still running the decontamination programme. Mister Data believes we shouldn't engage the warp drive until I've cleared all the chroniton fields from the ship.
Very well. Let me know when you finished your sweep.
Yes, sir.
If we can get to the locations that she's decontaminating, maybe the anyon emissions would re-phase us enough for someone to see us.
Yeah, well the beam strength would have to be pretty strong in order for us to be visible for more than a millisecond. Somebody's going to have to be looking directly at us.
Then we're going to have to go somewhere with an awful lot of people.
It's time, sir. We should go.
You have the Bridge, Mister McDowell. I'll be at the service in Ten Forward.
Ten Forward? Well, that's perfect. We'll create as many chroniton fields in there as we can. Get them to flood that room with a stronger beam.
Deck ten. I've been thinking about the first time I met Geordi La Forge. He was a young officer assigned to pilot me on an inspection tour, and I made some off hand remark about the shuttle's engine efficiency not being what it should. And the next morning I found that he'd stayed up all night refitting the fusion initiators. Well, I knew then that I wanted him with me on my next command. Have you decided what you're going to say about Ensign Ro?
Yes, I have. It wasn't easy.
Situations like these are never easy, Number One. RO Why? What wasn't easy? What?
What is going on here?
It's our memorial service.
This?
Why not?
I don't believe this. They think we're dead and they're having a party.
Yeah. It's perfect. Come on, let's get started.
Well, this is unusual.
Yeah, I think I like it.
Now I suppose I'll never know what you were going to say about me.
Do you think the others will think this service appropriate?
Look around you, Data. Everybody is sharing their memories of Geordi and Ro, laughing and talking. What could be more appropriate than that?
I am glad you approve, Doctor.
Brossmer to Commander Data.
Go ahead, Chief.
I'm sorry to disturb you, sir. We've cleared the critical areas of chronitons but we've detected a new field forming in Ten Forward that's stronger than any we've seen before.
Should I wait until after the service is over before beginning decontamination?
No.
No. Anyon emissions are harmless. Please begin immediately.
Aye, sir.
Here we go.
Worf! Worf, can you see us?
Lieutenant!
We're right here, Worf. Damn.
We have to find a way to increase the emission strength.
Yeah, I know.
if she hadn't lost her rank as a result of that incident at Garon Four, I think she would've made Lieutenant Commander by now.
Bridge to Captain Picard.
Go ahead.
Incoming message from Garadius Four, sir. The diplomatic situation is deteriorating. They want an update on our ETA.
Stand by, Ensign.
We've got to do something now, before they go into warp.
The disruptor. I can put it on overload.
Do it.
Let's go!
I would like to get under way as soon as possible. The situation on Garadius Four is becoming serious.
I see no reason to delay our departure. The chroniton fields have been cleared from all critical areas.
Excellent. Mister McDowell, will you set course for Garadius Four and engage at
Commander Data, chroniton field strength in Ten Forward has just increased by three thousand percent.
Curious. Captain, I believe we should decontaminate this room before getting underway.
Very well.
Chief.
Yes, Commander.
Increase anyon emissions to six thousand particles per second and decontaminate this area.
Okay, hang on.
Data, can you see us?
Captain, we're right here.
We're right here! We're right here!
Did you see that, Mister Data?
Yes, sir.
Come on, Data. Put it all together now.
These were not ghosts. what did we see?
I believe I may know what has happened, sir.
Data, please be right.
It would explain the mysterious chroniton fields
Yes, yes, yes.
If they were cloaked in some way.
Are you saying that they're still alive?
If I am right, sir, they are, and in this room. Their brief appearance coincided with the anyon sweep. Perhaps the anyons neutralise the cloaking effect. Chief Brossmer.
Yes, Commander?
Set the anoynic beam to its highest level and flood Ten Forward.
Aye, sir.
Data, do you see us?
Of course.
La Forge to Engineering. Take the warp engines off line until further notice. There's a muon wave build up in the dilithium chamber.
Captain, who gave that order?
That was Commander Geordi La Forge, Ensign. Please follow his instructions.
Aye, sir.
It looks like a great party. Do you mind if we join you?
Geordi, it is good to see you.
Thanks, Data. I've never been to a better funeral.
Could you pass the rolls?
You've been eating for over an hour.
Come on. We didn't eat for almost two days. I'm hungry. What's wrong?
Nothing.
Come on.
I was raised with Bajoran beliefs. I even followed some of the practices, but I never really believed in a life after death. Then suddenly I was dead and there was another life, and it made me feel like I'd been pretty arrogant to discount everything I'd been taught, you know? Now I don't know what to believe.
Maybe we should develop our own interphase device. If it can teach Ro Laren humility, it can do anything.
Come.
You wanted to see me, Captain?
Yes, Counsellor. Come, sit down. Counsellor, you've had the opportunity to observe Doctor Pulaski for some time now. How would you evaluate her as a Chief Medical Officer?
I've never met a more dedicated physician. I would say she has a passion for her work.
Yes, of course. I entirely agree. Is it possible that such consuming dedication could interfere with her judgement?
I feel your concern, Captain, but I don't share it. Perhaps because I've had the opportunity to spend more time with her and get to know her better.
Yes, perhaps you're right.
Captain, we are picking up a faint distress signal on an open subspace frequency. It appears to be coming from an adjacent sector.
Respond on the same frequency.
Are you locked on to that transmission?
Aye, sir. A voice only transmission from the USS Lantree, a Federation supply ship.
USS Lantree, this is Picard of the Enterprise. What is the nature of your emergency?
Can't hold out any more. People dying. Too many to help.
We are still receiving their signal, Captain, but there is no message.
Lantree. Are you under attack? Lantree? USS Lantree, this is the Enterprise. Come in, Lantree. Replay that last transmission.
Can't hold out any more. People dying. Too many to help.
Have we got a fix on her?
Two point two milli-parsecs, bearing three zero at one four five degrees.
Number One?
We'd better take a look. What kind of vessel is she?
The Lantree is a Class Six Federation supply ship assigned to Gamma seven sector, Captain L.I. Telaka commanding. Normal complement, twenty six officers and crew.
Armed?
Class three defensive only.
Is she still underway?
Aye, sir.
Adjust course to intercept. Warp seven.
Adjusting course to intercept. Warp seven, sir.
Engineering, transfer to Bridge.
We are closing on the Lantree, Captain.
Take us out of warp. Establish parallel course. Match speed.
Yes, sir.
Hailing frequencies.
Open.
Lantree, this is the Enterprise. Captain Telaka, this is Picard of the Enterprise. Do you read me?
No life signs, Captain.
Counsellor?
Nothing, Captain.
What else have we got in the neighbourhood?
No other vessels of any kind within two parsecs.
No battle damage.
All systems seem functional, Captain. Everything is in perfect order.
We have to board her, Captain.
Possibly, Mister Worf. Number One?
If we gain control of her systems remotely, we could activate the viewscreen. That way we could at least look at the Bridge.
Agreed.
Computer, security override request.
Identify.
Picard, Jean-Luc, Captain, USS Enterprise. Request control access Starfleet ship USS Lantree, Isao Telaka commanding.
Enter access code.
Omicron omicron alpha yellow daystar two seven. Enable.
I have verified receipt of the access codes for the Lantree, Captain.
Grand. Commence operations.
Our first move will be shut down the engines.
Standing by, Commander.
The Lantree computer reports access codes received and accepted, sir.
Sickbay on alert, Captain.
Interlock is engaged. The Lantree is responding, sir.
We have override control of her Bridge, Captain. All systems answering.
All right, let's have a look.
Lantree Bridge monitor engaging.
Are you reading anything, Doctor?
Still no signs of life, Captain.
Magnify. That must be Captain Telaka on the left. Let's look at him. Closer. My God.
Looks like they had a battle with time.
And lost.
Heart, lungs, liver, everything.
What is it?
They died of natural causes.
Natural causes? What in nature could cause that?
For the record, Captain, they died of old age.
We've downloaded the Lantree's log, sir.
Play back the Captain's last entry.
Captain's log, stardate 42493.1. There are only six of us left. We've set course for the nearest Federation outpost, but I am afraid it's too late. All attempts to analyse what is happening have failed. In the last few hours I've watched friends grow old and die, and I'm seeing it happen to me. Captain L.I. Telaka, USS Lantree.
Captain Telaka was my age, sir.
Doctor?
Every member of the Lantree crew had a complete examination at the beginning of this duty cycle eight weeks ago. They were in perfect health.
Nothing else since?
A single medical entry noting that the First Officer was treated for Thelusian flu five days ago.
Thelusian flu?
It's an exotic but harmless rhinal virus. It couldn't have caused this.
The last port of call of the Lantree was the Darwin Genetic Research Station on Gagarin Four three days ago.
Whatever happened, it could be something that the Lantree crew already had or it could have come from Gagarin. At the very least, the people from Darwin Station deserve a warning. We may have to consider a quarantine.
You'll agree that we should quarantine the Lantree.
Absolutely.
Lieutenant, initiate the quarantine transmitters on the Lantree and activate her marker beacons. We'll need to find her again.
Aye, sir.
Quarantine warnings active on all frequencies, Captain.
Extreme caution. The USS Lantree is a quarantined vessel by order of Starfleet Command. Do not board.
Set course for Gagarin Four, warp seven.
Course and speed set, sir.
Engage.
Captain's log, supplemental. We're en route to the Federation Research station on Gagarin Four. The mere thought of a possible connection between the Lantree tragedy and a genetic research facility fills me with profound apprehension.
We're approaching Gagarin Four, Captain.
Standard orbit, Mister Crusher.
Aye, sir.
Hailing frequencies.
Open.
Darwin Station, this is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the USS Enterprise.
Enterprise, this is Darwin Station. I'm Doctor Kingsley. We've just declared a medical emergency here. We need your help.
Doctor Kingsley, what is the nature of your emergency?
To whom am I speaking, please?
I'm Doctor Pulaski, Chief Medical Officer.
Katherine Pulaski, author of Linear Models of Viral Propagation?
That was a long time ago.
But still the standard. I can't think of anyone I'd rather be dealing with. Doctor, we're experiencing the rapid onset of geriatric phenomena. The first symptom is sudden, acute arthritic inflammation. Then the aging process accelerates.
The Lantree.
Doctor Pulaski, I celebrated my thirty fifth birthday a week ago.
Doctor, we understand that Darwin Station is involved in genetic research. Is there a possible connection?
Our research here is limited to human genetics. I can assure you we're not dealing with something that got away from us. We believe that we were infected by a supply ship that was here three days ago.
Doctor, if you're speaking of the Lantree, we encountered it a few hours ago. All the crew members were dead.
Which would seem to confirm our suspicion. Were you able to establish a pathology, Doctor?
Doctor, did you hear what I said? All the twenty six men and women aboard that ship were dead.
I heard you, Captain, and the prognosis is alarming, but my immediate concern is our children.
Children?
They represent years of advanced genetic research. You must evacuate them as soon as possible.
I'm sorry, but under the circumstances, until we know what's going on I'm imposing a full quarantine on Darwin Station.
But the children have been in protective isolation since this was detected. They show no symptoms. You cannot leave them here to die!
Doctor, our options in a quarantine situation are extremely limited. We are going to consider the possibilities. I suggest you do the same.
I recommend against contact, Captain.
Number One?
I have to agree, sir. I wish there was something we could do, but the risk is too great.
Doctor?
If the children are free of disease, as Doctor Kingsley said, they should be evacuated. I would like to bring one of them aboard within a force field for a complete examination.
Counsellor, do you sense anything?
Doctor Kingsley sincerely believes the children are not a threat, but she's not telling us the whole truth. I recommend caution.
We have only Doctor Kingsley's assurance that these children are not infected, whereas we have seen the results of this disease first hand. In a case like this, I think we should err on the side of caution.
All right. We could beam up one child in styrolite in suspended animation. That way I could scan for possible infection without any danger to ourselves or to the child.
But we don't know what we're looking for.
Exactly. And we won't know until we begin gathering data. Captain, that's worth some risk.
There's always risk, Doctor. Proceed with the examination, but I shall require positive proof that these children are harmless before I place any of my crew in jeopardy.
The forcefield's ready, Captain.
Activate it.
Transporter?
O'BRIEN:This is Chief O'Brien, sir. Almost ready.
Is there a problem?
O'BRIEN:It's the styrolite. I'm altering the delta-T so the styrolite coding materialises two micro-seconds ahead of the child.
O'BRIEN:It has to be right the first time.
Well take all the time you need.
O'BRIEN:Entering corrections now, sir.
O'BRIEN:Ready, Captain.
Doctor Kingsley, are you ready to transport?
You have the coordinates. We have one twelve year old male encased in number six styrolite.
Transporter, energise.
A trick!
Transporter, reverse
One moment, Lieutenant. Whoever he is, he's still in stasis.
The styrolite is intact, Captain.
Force field down.
Captain, there's a definite presence, a distinct personality. Even in stasis it's quite strong. The child is unquestionably telepathic.
A child this mature? We could be looking at the future of humanity.
At least Doctor Kingsley's vision of it.
This child is in better health than we are. His immune system is so advanced it may not be possible for him to contract disease. I want to free him from the styrolite.
That seems rather risky, Doctor.
I can do no further tests until he's out of it.
But what if you're wrong? You saw what happened on the Lantree.
I know I'm right.
I can't expose the Enterprise until I know where this disease came from and how it is transmitted.
I realise that, Captain. Naturally, we'll establish a force field containment.
But if we lose the force field for any reason, we lose the ship. Force fields can fail, and until
We don't have that kind of time. These children can't survive in the lab once their parents are dead. Look at him, Captain. He's a human being who needs our help.
But the risk is
Minimal.
If you can demonstrate that he is biologically harmless without risk to the crew, I'll do everything in my power to assist. And Doctor, God knows I'm not one to discourage input, but I would appreciate it if you'd let me finish my sentences once in a while.
Deanna, do you have a minute? You've known the Captain for some time. I think I need some advice. I don't seem to be dealing with him very well.
Why do you say that?
Well, my arguments don't seem to have any affect on him. We just end up quoting regulations to each other. He has such a consuming dedication to his ship, he doesn't seem able to step back to see the human side of the equation.
What's the matter?
Kate, I don't think he'd be where he is if he couldn't see the human side of the equation. Perhaps the two of you aren't all that different.
What do you mean?
Let's just say you both have well established personalities.
Doctor Kingsley, this is Kate Pulaski.
Doctor? Do you have a decision?
I'm afraid it's bad news.
How can that be?!
The risk to the ship and crew is too great. Until we absolutely know the cause of the disease, the children
The children are harmless. Every test on them has been negative. I demand that you do something to save them. Please, Doctor. For God's sake, we haven't got much time.
Stand by. I'll get back to you.
Geordi, I need your help.
What is it, Doctor.
I need to prove the children are harmless. I can only do that in a fail-safe environment.
The problem is there's no area on the ship that can be sealed off with absolute certainty, even with force fields.
Sickbay has an isolated system.
But it's not possible to totally cut it off from the rest of the ship. The only truly independent environment would be something like a shuttlecraft.
A shuttlecraft. Why didn't you say so?
Come.
Captain, I'd like permission to put the boy in a shuttlecraft. I can study him there without risk to anyone else.
What about you?
I'm prepared to take that risk. Someone has to breathe the same air he breathes, to touch him. I'm volunteering to make that test myself.
Doctor, you have a responsibility to this ship which goes
I also have a responsibility to humanity.
Starfleet guidelines about contact with quarantined
You don't have to quote the rule book. You were saying?
Request approved.
Captain, you said if I. Approved?
I recognise that you're trying to satisfy my conditions.
Thank you.
You sent for me, Doctor?
I did, Commander. I assume that you're qualified to pilot this shuttlecraft.
Certainly. I took advanced training in the operation of auxiliary space vessels at Starfleet Academy, where I received
A more than passing grade, no doubt. Please, come aboard. We don't have much time.
Shuttlebay three force field activated.
You're certain the Captain approved this, Doctor?
You'll take us a few hundred metres away from the Enterprise and hold position.
Begin shuttlecraft launch sequence.
Good luck, Doctor.
We are in position, Doctor.
It's the only way to prove they're harmless.
And if they are not?
I hate to keep reminding you, but you are a machine. You'll be perfectly safe.
That is by no means certain, Doctor, but I was referring to you.
Medical research is sometimes a risky business. It's all part of being human. Shall we proceed?
Ready to transport.
You have the coordinates, Chief O'Brien.
O'BRIEN:Shuttlecraft, maintain your position and stand by.
Standing by.
O'BRIEN:Transporter control, what's our status?
We have a green panel, sir.
O'BRIEN:Stand by to transport.
Aye, sir.
O'BRIEN:Energise.
Oh, yes, I do. I understand you perfectly.
How could you, Doctor? He has not said anything.
Oh yes, he has. Troi's right. He's telepathic.
Time?
Zero three two two exactly.
She's been in direct contact with the boy for eighteen minutes.
All systems are functioning within normal specifications, Doctor.
The manufacturer will be pleased to hear it. I appreciate your help, but your bedside manner needs work.
Bedside manner?
Doctor?
Doctor, I don't understand. What has happened?
There was no warning.
Explain.
Arthritic inflammation. It's the initial symptom of the disease.
What can we do?
Return the boy to Darwin Station. Apparently the children are carriers.
Chief O'Brien, are you ready?
O'BRIEN:I have the original coordinates of the Darwin isolation lab, Captain.
Quickly, please.
O'BRIEN:Shuttle One, hold your position.
Holding.
O'BRIEN:Stand by to transport.
It wasn't your fault.
Tell us what you need, Doctor.
There's nothing you can do, Captain. I'm not going to make myself an exception to the Darwin quarantine. Shuttle One out.
What is your condition, Doctor?
Not exactly up to factory specs. I'm sorry. The pain is tolerable, thank you.
Shall I set course for Darwin Station?
We're already under quarantined. What do we have to lose?
We can no longer consider the Darwin Station crisis our most immediate concern, although Doctor Pulaski's condition is inseparably linked with that emergency. Her safe return and that of Commander Data must take priority, please.
Shouldn't Doctor Pulaski be involved in this?
From what we've seen on the Lantree, Doctor Pulaski may not have time to help herself.
Well I suggest we beam them both back onto the ship. Commander Data is most likely immune and surely the biofilter will
O'BRIEN:The transporter's biofilter won't protect us. The boy was transported twice already and still infected Doctor Pulaski.
Couldn't we adjust the biofilter? We could alter the filter to screen out whatever it is that's causing the disease.
But we don't know what's causing the disease. We can't protect ourselves against the unknown. What we need is some kind of filter that doesn't depend on known biological factors.
O'BRIEN:We might try the trace.
The transporter trace?
O'BRIEN:As you know, the transporter keeps a record of all transmissions, a pattern if you will. Usually it's just stored for security purposes, but if we use the transporter trace to control the reconstitution process
I don't think it's ever been tried quite that way before, but theoretically it is possible.
O'BRIEN:I'd have to make extensive modifications.
Then do it. It seems we have no alternative.
Where will we get the trace pattern? The Doctor's never used our transporter.
Never?
No. She's a woman of very strongly held opinions, sir. What was her previous assignment?
Her last ship was the Repulse.
Bridge, Picard. Contact the USS Repulse using subspace captain's priority channel.
Oh, Doctor Pulaski. I can only tell you how much I regret the burden we've imposed on you. On both of you.
Commander Data is an android, Doctor. He is unaffected. As for me, I chose this. I was convinced the children were safe.
I still can't believe you were infected by one of our children.
The evidence is fairly conclusive.
You don't understand. They were designed to resist disease.
I think it's time we talked about that.
Let me show you something.
Our ultimate achievement. The oldest is twelve, and all are telekinetic. Watch.
Genetically engineered?
Not engineered, created. Perfect in every way. Their body structure, their musculature, their minds.
You were telling me about their immune system.
That was our masterpiece. We gave these children an aggressive immunity. The rest of us were infected by the supply ship, but they were protected.
The Lantree logs indicated that only one crewman had any illness prior to arrival here. The First Officer had a mild case of Thelusian flu.
Yes, he was one of the crewmen who came in direct contact with us.
The Thelusian flu would have little effect on you, but tell me, how would they react?
Their immune system would release an active antibody that would attack the virus.
Even at a distance?
Their immune systems don't wait for a disease to attack the body. It would seek out an airborne virus and destroy it.
Destroy it? How, exactly?
The antibody would adapt itself to alter the genetic code of the virus.
Commander, I want an analysis of the interaction between the Thelusian flu and the children.
On a molecular genetic level?
We don't have time for that. Genetic analysis could take months.
Not necessarily. Commander Data has a way with computers.
Sorry, Picard. We erased Doctor Pulaski's transporter pattern right after she transferred. Not that she used the transporter much, she preferred using the shuttlecraft. I would have given her a shuttle if it would have kept her here.
Tell me, Taggert, if she served you as well as you say, why did you let her go?
I see you haven't run into her stubborn streak yet. As soon as she found out about an opening on the Enterprise, she put in a request for transfer. Knew your service record backward and forward. Apparently she's been an admirer of yours for some time.
Extraordinary.
Commander, what have you got?
The answer, I believe, Doctor. The Lantree was not the source of the disease, but it was the trigger.
Trigger?
The Lantree's First Officer exposed your children to Thelusian flu for the first time. Their active immune systems set out to attack the virus, and once it was triggered, it kept going. The antibody created an unexpected side-effect. It alters the genetic make-up of normal humans. This is a comparison of the normal and altered DNA. These are the two molecules that have been transposed.
And since our DNA is self replicating, the process
Is irreversible.
Judging from what happened on the Lantree, anyone is a carrier once they're infected.
Have you made any progress, Doctor?
I'm afraid so, Captain. The children don't carry the disease, they are the cause.
What do you mean?
Their advanced immune system has created an antibody that changes normal DNA. The altered genes are the ones that control aging.
Then why did it attack you more quickly than Doctor Kingsley?
The enclosed environment of the shuttlecraft concentrated my exposure. The Lantree's First Officer carried the antibody onto his ship. It had the same effect on his crew.
Right, what's the next step?
The children will survive, but the rest of us are just about out of time.
Doctor, I want you back aboard this ship. We'll beam you up in suspended animation like the boy. That will give us more time.
Captain, I appreciate what you're trying to do, but I got into this by leaping before I looked, and I won't allow you to make the same mistake. Chief Medical Officer's log. This will be my final report to the Enterprise. Just as changes in evolution are known to be caused by changes in the environment, we now know the process also works in reverse. An attempt to control human evolution has resulted in a new species that's lethal to its predecessors. The children will be condemned to live out their lives in isolation. Quarantine of the Darwin Station must be maintained for ever.
I am sorry I could not be more helpful, Doctor Pulaski.
You did everything you could, Commander. As androids go, you're in a class by yourself.
Doctor
Please, give my best to the Captain.
Enterprise. Commander Data ready to beam aboard.
Captain, Kate knew what she was doing.
I wish I could be certain that we'd tried everything.
Commander Data is ready to come aboard, sir.
You have the Bridge, Number One.
No life forms present.
O'BRIEN:You may step down, sir.
Data, tell me if. It's good to see you again.
Thank you, sir.
Now, quickly. If the changes in Doctor Pulaski's DNA were reversed, would it be possible
It is not reversible, sir. The subtle molecular transposition of
Yes, yes, yes. But say if it were undone, would she be normal again?
As normal as ever, sir.
You said that the transporter could be modified to filter out the changes in Doctor Pulaski?
O'BRIEN:Yes, sir, but we were unable to locate her trace pattern.
Well, what if we used a sample of her DNA, say from a blood test taken before she was exposed to the disease? Could that be used to filter out the genetic changes?
O'BRIEN:Well, I'd have to get into the biofilter bus to patch in a molecular matrix reader. That's no problem. But the waveform modulator will be overloaded without the regeneration limiter in the first stage circuit.
Interesting. However, theoretically,
Data.
Yes, sir.
Can you do the modifications?
O'BRIEN:I think so, sir.
Then make it so.
O'BRIEN:You heard what he said. Let's get those panels off.
A blood test, a tissue sample, anything that would have a sample of Doctor Pulaski's original DNA.
No, sir. Her records were shipped by way of Starfleet headquarters. They have not caught up with us yet.
This is ridiculous. A cell, a single cell. Let's check her quarters.
Anything. A fingernail, a hair.
Hair brush.
It has a follicle, sir. Live cells.
Darwin Station, this is the Enterprise.
Go ahead, Captain. I'm here.
Doctor, we may have a solution. We have a sample of your normal DNA to use as a filter in the transporter. We think that we can beam you aboard while filtering out any of the genetic problems caused by the disease.
Interesting theory, Captain. If it works, we could use the same technique to save Doctor Kingsley and her colleagues.
I think you should know, this has never been attempted before.
Well, I'll tell you one thing. If I live through this, I'll have a much better understanding of geriatrics.
All set, Chief?
O'BRIEN:Almost ready, sir. There's just one thing.
Yes?
O'BRIEN:This modification's one way only. If it doesn't work we won't be able to reverse transport the Doctor back to the planet.
Then I'll operate the transporter controls myself. If she's going to be consigned to oblivion, then
O'BRIEN:Thank you, sir. I'll be monitoring the medical scans. But you'll be able to tell if it's worked by watching the stack.
Doctor Pulaski, are you ready?
I suppose I am, Captain.
Here we go.
It's not working.
O'BRIEN:Captain, wait.
Doctor.
Good to see you, Doctor.
Welcome back, Doctor. Come.
Captain, if this hadn't worked?
If this hadn't worked, it would have been necessary to beam your energy into empty space.
And spread my atoms spread across the galaxy.
Yes. I'm sorry.
No, no, don't be sorry. Every time I get into the damn thing, I'm convinced that's what's going to happen.
Chief Medical Officer:Chief Medical Officer Chief Medical Officer's log, supplemental. The adults of Darwin Station have been restored to normal health using our transporter. They will remain on Gagarin Four and continue their research in hopes of one day rejoining their children.
Impulse speed.
There she is, Captain.
Scientists believe no experiment is a failure, that even a mistake advances the evolution of understanding.
Close to forty kilometres.
Forty kilometres, aye, sir.
But all achievement has a price. For one brief glimpse at the mysterious blueprint of human evolution, the men and women off the USS Lantree paid with their lives. Their sacrifice is thus noted in this scientist's log.
Number One.
Lieutenant Worf, arm the photon torpedoes.
Torpedoes ready, Commander.
Extreme caution. The USS Lantree is a quarantined vessel by order of Starfleet Command. Do not board.
Gentlemen.
Extreme caution. The USS Lantree is a quarantined vessel by order of Starfleet Command. Do not board.
Set course and speed for Star Station India.
Course and speed set, sir.
Engage.
I don't know what they'd have done without me. First, I had to learn how they communicate. It was an absolutely exhausting process.
It must have been.
Quite different from Betazed telepathy. We transmit words. With the Cairn, it's images. A flood of them all at the same time. It's overwhelming.
I can imagine.
Actually it's a very efficient way of communicating. If two Cairn were having this conversation it would have been over minutes ago.
Really?
Of course, they realise that they'll want to communicate verbally if they join the Federation. Do me a favour. Introduce yourself to one of them. Engage him in conversation. They need the practice.
I'd be happy to.
It's called a visor. It enables me to see.
Like my vocal enhancer. It helps me make sounds.
I see you've already met my star pupil. Hedril's picked up spoken language much faster than the others.
It is often the case that children learn languages more easily than adults.
Deanna was quite good at languages when she was little. Where is Deanna?
Well, she must be here somewhere.
Hedril, darling.
What?
Go find your father, dear. I want to talk to him.
Mrs Troi?
Yes yes just a little tired. This constant telepathy with the Cairn. I'm fine, really. Aren't you going to mingle, Mister Woof?
I do not care for telepaths. They make me uneasy.
Don't worry. The Cairn couldn't read your thoughts even if they wanted to. Your brain isn't sophisticated enough.  Neither is yours, dear. They can only communicate with other telepaths. Have either of you seen Deanna?
She was working, but she said she would be  Speak of the devil.
Sorry I'm late. I lost track of the time.
Deanna, dear, come with me. I want you to meet the senior diplomat of the Cairn delegation. Maques, this is the beautiful daughter I've been telling you about. Deanna.
Pleased to. Hello.
Hello. Pleased to meet you.
Oh, yes, that is it. Pleased to meet you, Deanna.
Good. Well, I'll just let you young people chat.
Well, Maques, what do you think of the Enterprise?
It is beautiful. Comfortable, also.
I'm glad you think so.
There is another word that describes it. But I cannot remember.
You've learned a great deal in a very short time. I'm sure it won't be long before your words do justice to your thoughts.
Your mother told me of your need.
Need?
A moment. Husband. You need a husband. I need a wife.
Deanna! Good morning. So what did you think of Maques?
Why did you do that, Mother? You embarrassed both of us.
He's really very sweet. And lonely. Poor man. A widower, raising a child alone.
Mother, don't start.
I just think it's time for you to settle down. If your father were still alive, I'm sure he'd say the same thing.
Deck eight.
But you'll do exactly what you want. Just like always.
Mother, stop it.
Are you coming?
What's wrong?
You are so precious to me. You're all I've got. If something happened to you I don't know what I'd do.
Nothing's going to happen to me.
You'd better go.
My first appointment isn't for a few minutes. Why don't we talk for a while?
No, I'm fine. I'm just tired from working with the Cairn. It's making me emotional.
Are you sure?
Go on I'll see you later. Go on.
Maques.
I must to apologise for yesterday.
You don't have to.
My words, they were confused.
It wasn't your fault. Please.  My mother misled you.
Not in everything. She has an image of you in her mind. She shared it with me. You are even more beautiful. The way my people communicate, it is direct. Nothing is hidden.
Yes?
Your mother is the first to learn our telepathy.
You mean you've never had telepathy with someone who wasn't Cairn?
No. To communicate with her is very different.
In what way?
Always there is a part of her that. Um. A part of her that is dark.
Dark?
A part of her that can not be seen. Do you understand?
I'm not sure. Have you ask my mother about this?
She called it. A moment. Privacy.
Of course. You said among the Cairn, nothing is hidden. We value honesty, but we don't always share everything we're thinking and feeling.
This is privacy?
Yes.
It is normal?
For us, yes.
If this is your way, I am relieved.
It is our way.
I will leave now.
I'm glad you stopped by.
I am glad to have stopped also.
I was all set for another round of arguing when all of a sudden she just fell apart.
She's under a lot of stress. She's preparing the Cairn to meet with the Federation Council.
It's more than that. I'm been sensing very erratic emotions from her. Even the clothes she's wearing are unusual. They're so subdued.
Maybe you just need to sit and talk with her.
Commander! Take your hands off her.
Mrs Troi.
Don't you Mrs Troi me.
Mother!
Why don't you leave her alone? If it weren't for you she'd be married by now.
That's enough!
Now I am warning you. Stay away from my daughter!
You're coming with me.
I don't know what got into me. Please, tell Will how sorry I am.
You're fine, but your psilosynine levels are a little low.
Psilo-what?
It's a neurotransmitter involved in telepathy.
It's been depleted by your work with the Cairn. You're going to have to try to avoid telepathic communication for a while.
I can't.
Why?
We only have three days left and the Cairn have so much to learn.
Lwaxana, I'm sorry, but you're going to have to take some time and rest.
Maybe I can help with the Cairn.
No, you're only half Betazoid, dear. And you have no experience with their form of telepathy.
Then I won't use telepathy. We'll work verbally.
I suppose we could do that. And if they don't understand something I'll explain it to them telepathically.
No, you'll work verbally too. The point is for you to get some rest, mother. Besides, it'll do them good to have to figure things out with words.
I suppose you're right.
This is the ship's arboretum.
Arbor means tree.
Very good, Hedril. This is where people come to relax, enjoy themselves in a natural setting.
Flowers of all hue, and without thorn the rose. It's an old earth poem by John Milton.
Please, what is a poem?
Poetry is an art form that uses words, put together in new and unexpected ways, sometimes in rhyme. Milton was speculating that in Heaven, roses wouldn't have thorns.
Heaven?
Oh. Er, Heaven is. Well, it's, how can I put it?
Yes, I see. Thank you. Heaven.
Mother, you're supposed to be avoiding telepathy.
I'm only trying to help, dear.
You don't look well.
I'm just tired. Maybe I'll sit down.
Don't worry she'll be fine. This is something I think you'll find interesting. It's a jewel plant from Folnar Three. The plant secretes a resin which is collected within the blossom. By the time the bloom has faded, the resin has hardened into a rare and beautiful gem.
Mother!
Mother? Troi to Sickbay. Medical emergency in the arboretum.
She's not responding to cortical stimulation. I'm not sure what else I can do.
I don't understand. She was fine just yesterday.
It's so strange. It's almost as if her brain has shut itself down.
Is there a physiological cause?
I'm running a subneural scan. As far as I can see there's no tissue damage, no neurochemical imbalance, no sign of infection, nothing.
Yet her neural activity is practically non-existent.
The only exception is in the paracortex. Activity there is almost off the scale.
The paracortex is the Betazoid telepathic lobe. She communicated with Maques telepathically just before she fell.
Might there be some side effect of Cairn telepathy of which we're unaware?
It's a possibility.
I think it's time that you and I had a talk with Maques.
I am very apologetic for what has happened to your mother.
Maques, is it possible that your telepathic communications with Mrs Troi harmed her in some way?
No. I tried to explain before. Bad thoughts, they hurt her.
What thoughts? Take your time.
Inside her, the dark place.
I don't understand.
She is, what are the words? I don't have the words.
Counsellor? Stop it!
It's all right. I'm fine. He was just trying to communicate with me telepathically.
Do you understand now?
I'm not sure.
He communicated so much to me that at first it was just a jumble of images.
Have you been able to sort any of it out?
I think so. During his telepathic contact with my mother, Maques sensed what he calls a dark place. He tried to tell me about it before, in my office, and I misunderstood. I thought he was talking about thoughts my mother was keeping private, but what he meant was that there was something happening in her met conscious mind.
Metaconscious?
It's a part of the Betazoid psyche. It's a kind of filtering mechanism that protects us from psychic trauma.
Is Maques suggesting that your mother's metaconscious has been somehow damaged?
He feels that whatever is wrong with her is centred there. If he's right it may mean that she's suffered some kind of trauma that her metaconscious just can't tolerate.
Has your mother mentioned anything that happened to her lately, something that might have been traumatic for her?
No. Nothing.
Maques could be wrong about this. There's still a chance that a subneural scan might be able to pinpoint an physiological cause for your mother's condition, something that I might be able to treat. The results won't be in until morning. Maybe we should all try and get some rest.
I'd like to stay here with her. I'm going to try to contact her telepathically.
All right.
Mother can you hear me? Please come back to me. Please.
Help me.
Mother?
Help me.
How? How can I help you?
Tell me, mother. Please.
Computer, lights!
What are you doing?
Maques, what were you doing in Sickbay?
Helping. Trying to help Lwaxana.
How? What were you trying to do?
I was. She was. You, Deanna. Maybe you.
Yes?
You must. How can I explain
Tell me telepathically.
Maques believes my mother's psyche has collapsed in on itself. That for some reason, she has retreated into her metaconscious mind.
Was he trying to contact her telepathically?
Yes. He was able to access images being generated by her metaconscious, but he couldn't make any sense of them.
I did not understand.
He saw faces he didn't recognize, events he couldn't interpret.
If we could decipher these images, we might be able to determine whether or not your mother's condition was induced by a traumatic event.
Maques feels he can provide a telepathic bridge that will allow me to access my mother's metaconscious. If he can, I might be able to find out what happened to her.
And if you succeed, can you use that information to help your mother?
I'm not sure. But I do know that there's a part of her that wants to be helped. When I tried to contact her telepathically, I heard a voice calling out to me.
If her psyche has collapsed in on itself, could accessing her mind pose any danger to you?
There's no way to know. I'd like to try.
I'll be monitoring her throughout the entire procedure. If anything goes wrong, Maques can break the telepathic link.
Your mother. Part of her is very frightened. She may resist you.
I understand.
Help me.
Mother?
Help me.
Counsellor? Can you hear me?
Captain?
Deanna, Doctor Crusher's become concerned that your paracortical readings have become erratic.
Are you talking to me from Sickbay?
Yes. I want you to sever your connection to your mother.
Why don't you ask Maques to do it?
I'm asking you. That is an order, Counsellor.
You're not Captain Picard.
Leave me alone, please.
This isn't real. None of this is real.
Deanna.
Daddy?
Look at you. You've become a beautiful woman
Don't do this.
I'm sorry I had to go away when you were so little. I didn't want to.
You're not my father. You're part of my mother's mind. What is this place?
This is our house near Lake El'nar on Betazed. We used to live here. Deanna, let's not waste this chance. I want to hear everything about you.
Did I live here?
For a while when you were a baby. You were such a beautiful baby. Your mother and I loved you so much.
I don't remember these toys.
I bet you don't remember me singing you to sleep at night either, but I did.
I do remember. I always felt safe when you sang to me.
There was one song you always asked me to sing. You couldn't fall asleep unless you heard it.
Down in the valley.
Yes.  Down in the valley, valley so low. Hang your head over, hear the wind blow.
No, you're just trying to keep me here. Keep me from finding something.
Your mother doesn't want to see you, Deanna.
I have to help her.
If you want to help her, leave. Let her have peace.
She called out to me. She does want me to help.
Stay with me, just a little while. Deanna, it's been so long. We'll never have this chance again.
Goodbye, Daddy.
Hedril.
Mother.
Get away from her!
No!
Hedril, I asked your father to bring you here because I wanted to talk to you about something. You know that Lwaxana's sick, don't you?
Yes. Is it my fault?
No, not at all. But I believe that she's been thinking about you. Do you know why?
I make her sad.
Why do you say that?
Because it's true.
Do you have any idea why Hedril would make my mother sad?
No.
Well, thank you for coming to talk to us. I'll see you later, all right?
Counsellor, I hope your mother gets better.
Thank you, Hedril. So do I.
I just don't understand how she fits in to all this.
And I haven't found a physiological cause for what's happened to your mother, which makes me feel that Maques was right when he said that your mother's condition was precipitated by a traumatic event.
Could this event have involved Hedril?
I don't think so. My mother never mentioned her.
Does your mother keep personal logs or a journal?
Yes, she does. I'll contact Mister Homn on Betazed and ask him to transmit a copy as soon as possible. There may be some clues there.
Perhaps we are being too literal. I have recently learned in my study of dream analysis that people who appear in a dream can sometimes represent different aspects of the person who is dreaming.
That's right. A child might represent vulnerability. Hedril may depict some fragile part of my mother.
A part that she's protecting. You said that everything you encountered when you were in her mind was a barrier of one kind or another.
Yes. You, the wolf, my father. It was though she were summoning all her defences to keep me away. But keep me away from what? What is she protecting?
Come in.
Counsellor.
Hello, Captain.
I've just come from Sickbay. Doctor Crusher feels that your mother's condition is worsening. Her neural foundations are getting weaker. Have you had any luck here?
No, nothing. I've gone through all her belongings, read her journal from the last five years, and other than the fact that I'm not married yet, nothing bad seems to have happened to her.
Is this your Father?
Yes.
He had a kind face.
I remember when he died, my mother had to go through all his things and pack them away. I was seven. I remember thinking how mad he'd be when he came home and saw what she'd done. I didn't understand he wasn't coming back.
Deanna, your mother might still come out of this.
If we can't figure out what's wrong with her, Captain, I don't think she will. But I don't know what else to do. I've talked with Mister Homn, who's known her for years. I've checked her medical records. I've made enquiries to the government on Betazed, I've contacted her closest friends. If she's been through some kind of psychic trauma, there's just no evidence of it.
You said you'd reviewed her journals for the past five years. Maybe we should go further back.
That's a lot to review. My mother's kept a journal since before she was married.
Then let's start at the beginning. The first entry seems to be stardate 30620.1.
That's the year they were married.
That's odd. There's a seven year gap.
It starts about a year after the wedding.
And if I'm not mistaken, it ends a few months after your birth.
My mother's so diligent about her journal. why would she have stopped making entries for so long?
She didn't. The files were deleted, by your mother, almost thirty years ago.
I don't understand any of this. Captain, I have to go back inside my mother's mind. It's the only way we're ever going to get any answers.
Thank you. Deanna, you understand that if your paracortical readings go too high again, I'm going to tell Maques to sever the connection.
I know.
Hedril, be careful.
Who is Hedril?
Wait! I want to talk to you.
Help me. Help me!
Go.
Mother?
Go away.
No. I want to help you. Why did you delete parts of your journal? Did something happen to you you don't want me to know about?
Leave me alone, please.
Who's Hedril, mother? Why is she here? Is Hedril me when I was a little girl?
No! Oh, no, I'd never let anything happen to you. Never.
Did you let something happen to someone? Was it here at El'nar?
You were just a baby.
Tell me. Whatever it is. we can face it together.
I can't. I can't.
You can. We can.
Help me. Help me, papa.
Please don't make me go through this again.
Hold on to him. Don't let him run off.
I won't. Mommy, can we go play by the water?
No, Kestra, stay here with us.
Please?
Kestra. Oh, Kestra, you've made the baby cry.
Kestra?
Don't cry, Deanna. Don't cry, mommy's here.
Mommy, please?
No, Kestra. We're going to eat in just a few minutes.
What's wrong, what's wrong, little one? Tell mommy what's wrong. Ian, she's teething, Now where's her ring?
No, no. I don't want to see this again. I can't.
What happened, Mother. What happened next?
I don't remember.
You have to. You can't hold it back. It's killing you.
The dog got away. She ran after him. We didn't notice.
Why? Why did I look away? Why wasn't I paying attention?
You have to forgive yourself, Mother. You have to let go.
How can I? I let her die.
It was a terrible tragedy. The worst thing that can happen to any parent. I know you feel responsible but it was an accident. And what you're doing isn't fair to Kestra.
I saw a little girl who was sweet and happy. She must have brought a great deal of joy to your lives.
She woke up every morning with a smile.
Isn't it better to remember her like that? I just found out I had a sister I never knew. I'd like to learn what was good and joyous about her. To celebrate her life, not mourn it.
How? How can I do that?
Kestra was here a few moments ago. Talk to her.
No. No.
Do it, mother. Tell her how you feel. I'll be here with you. I'll help you.
Mommy.
Kestra. Oh, Kestra. My precious one. I'm so sorry.
I have to go now.
I know. I know.
I remember the day I took this.
Mister Homn said he saved it in case someday you wanted to remember her.
I wish you could have known her, Deanna. I wish you two could have grown up together.
Tell me about her. I want to know everything.
It's been five months since Marc's accident. I haven't missed a single hour of my duties. I volunteered for extra time in the nursery. My language studies are better than they've ever been. Somebody else might have given in, but I didn't.
Given in to what?
Death is a normal part of life. Maybe some of us are better at facing that than others.
Maybe some of us aren't facing it at all.
What do you mean?
Recovery from a great loss involves a great deal of pain. If we try to avoid that pain, we can make it harder on ourselves in the long run.
But I feel fine.
Today would have been your husband's thirty eighth birthday.
You keep excellent records, Deanna. Last night. I dreamt Marc was with me, celebrating. I was so glad that this nonsense was finally over. Then I woke up. Alone. And I knew that he was dead. For the first time, I knew it. I looked around for anything that belonged to him. Anything. I forgot that after the funeral I told them to take it all away. What in the world was I thinking?
They didn't take everything away.
How did you know?
An ancient trail along the Kabul River in the Himalayas. It's a wonderful programme. Will, it would do you good to have a little fresh holodeck air.
I think my horsemanship is a little rusty for the Himalayas. Thanks anyway.
Nonsense. We programme an appropriately docile steed
Captain. Sensors indicate a vast field of
Of what, Lieutenant?
It's gone. But something did appear directly in our path.
Deflector shields are not encountering elevated levels of interstellar matter.
A sensor echo, Data?
Uncertain. I have no unusual readings, Commander.
I promise I'll come by to see you tomorrow. Deanna, are you alright?
What? What?
You faded out there for a second.
Oh. No, no, I'm fine. I'm just very tired, that's all. Will I see you tomorrow?
Tomorrow. Thank you, Deanna.
An aggregate field of plane-polarised objects has just appeared. And disappeared.
Recommend we run a diagnostic on the forward sensor array. We don't want a ghost tailing us all the way to T'lli Beta.
I'm not convinced it is a ghost. There may be something there, Commander.
Ensign Allenby, full stop.
Aye, sir.
Let's investigate both possibilities.
Captain's log, stardate 44356.9. Sensor diagnostics have been completed and indicate that all systems are normal. There remains no explanation for the images which appeared in our path.
I have completed another full scan of the area, sir. There is no further indication of the anomaly.
Ensign, prepare to resume course to T'lli Beta. Mister Data, what velocity would put us back on schedule?
A resumption of our present course at warp six will place us in the T'lli Beta system in six days, thirteen hours, forty seven minutes.
What, no seconds?
I have discovered, sir, a certain level of impatience when I calculate a lengthy time interval to the nearest second. However, if you wish
No, no. Minutes is fine.
Stand ready at warp six, Ensign.
Aye, sir.
Engage.
Riker to Engineering. Geordi, what the hell happened?
Checking. Looks like the field collapsed before we could enter warp.
Recommend full stop while I check it out.
Back to full stop, Ensign.
Aye, sir.
All decks reporting minor injuries only.
Damage?
None, sir.
Weapons and shields normal.
Go to yellow alert.
Captain, we've started moving again. Something is pulling us.
Troi to Doctor Crusher.
Yes, Deanna?
Beverly
I'm feeling very dizzy.
Did you hit your head?
I'm not sure. I'm not sure what happened.
Lie down, breathe deeply and stay calm. I'm getting calls from all over the ship. I'll be there as quickly as I can.
New heading confirmed. Zero two five mark two seven three. Speed is holding at one tenth impulse.
Whatever's pulling us sure isn't in a hurry.
Picard to La Forge.
Go ahead, Captain.
If your engines are functioning we'll attempt to break free.
Everything down here seems normal enough, sir, but I suggest we take it a bit slower this time.
Ensign, bring us around ninety degrees to starboard.
New course laid in at ninety degrees to starboard.
One quarter impulse, engage.
Aye, sir. Nothing, Captain. Speed and course are unaffected.
One half impulse.
No change.
Full impulse. Rotate heading in five degree increments.
Aye, sir.
La Forge?
There's nothing wrong down here. The engines are fine.
Integrity field stress exceeding eighty two million kilodynes. Recommend immediate shutdown, sir.
Make it so, Ensign.
All engines down. We're still being pulled. Same heading, same speed.
I got here as quickly as I could. I've got a Sickbay filled with headaches. How are you?
Well, when I first called you I was feeling intense pain. Now it's gone, but I'm feeling a bit foggy.
I'd like to take you to Sickbay and run an inner nuncial series. Can you walk?
All senior staff report to the Observation Lounge.
Are you up to that?
I think so.
What is it?
Nothing. Nothing, I'm fine.
Could it be some sort of tractor beam?
No other ship is indicated.
Mister Worf, what is your analysis?
Tactical sensor readings are indeterminant.
They don't even give us enough for an educated guess.
And yet all sensors are operating properly.
Can there be an intelligence at work here? Counsellor, do you sense a lifeform out there?
No, I don't think so. No. There's nothing. Nothing. I sense nothing.
It's alright, Counsellor. Perhaps there's nothing out there to sense.
Indeed, there are many races that are not empathically detectable. The Breen, the Ferengi, the
No, you don't understand. I don't sense anything. Not out there, not in here. All of you, you're all blank to me.
No indication of a concussion or a blow to the head. Just a pattern of unresponsive neural cells throughout the cerebellum and cerebral cortex.
Unresponsive?
There's brain damage. How serious, I can't tell yet.
But I feel perfectly fine otherwise.
Can you treat it?
I'm not sure. I have to review the database on Betazoid neurophysiology.
The Betazoid brain has a remarkable ability to heal itself. This condition could just reverse itself time.
It might. But you are half human. That changes the map a little. I don't want to offer you any false hopes.
It's just hope, Beverly. Not false hope.
What would cause something like this? Because it started at the same time we encountered the anomaly.
There may be a connection. I don't know. If you were anyone else, you know the first thing I'd do? I'd send you to Counsellor Troi.
Well, then I have an advantage, don't I? I see her quite often.
Deanna, it's no different than one of us suddenly going blind.
You don't have to tell me, Beverly. I understand the psychology.
You may understand it but you've never had to live with it.
I may be perfectly fine by tomorrow.
And you may not. Now, I'll do my homework. I'll see what I can do to regenerate those cells. In the meantime, I want you to talk to someone. There are several people on board who have degrees in psychology, who are qualified therapists.
Okay, fine, if I need to. Right now, I just want to go back to work.
Deanna.
If there are no medical objections?
No medical objections.
Thank you, Beverly. Will.
Come in.
I don't have a psychology degree, but if you'd like to talk?
You know what the worst part of this is? And I've seen it happen to so many patients.
What?
The way other people change. How they start to treat you differently. They walk on eggshells around you. Sometimes they avoid you altogether. Sometimes they become overbearing, reach out a helping hand to the blind woman.
I'm sorry if I
I will not be treated that way!
Hey! Imzadi.
Oh, please.
Deanna, I've never seen you quite so scared.
I'm fine. If I get better, I get better. If I don't, I'll adapt. Life goes on.
Deanna.
I really have to finish this. I have some appointments this afternoon.
Probe launch successful. Telemetry transmissions are being received.
Okay, let's see what we've got. Nothing unusual here. The same reading as the ship sensors.
Expanding analysis parameters. Including Bayesian functions, broad EM and subspace spectrum polling.
No change.
I am adding virtual particle trajectories.
Whoa. What is that?
Unknown. I am attempting to analyse motion pattern. Results still inconclusive.
Last time I saw anything that looked like that, I was skin-diving off the coral reefs at Bracas Five.
You said you woke up a new woman this morning.
That's how I feel.
Tell me about her, this new woman.
She's not holding anything back any more.
She's not?
I let it all out last night. I cried for two hours. I realised that I had never accepted the loss of my husband. I worked hard, I kept busy, I did everything to pretend it never happened.
And you feel different now?
Completely.
Can I share something important with you?
Of course.
I've temporarily lost my empathic sense. It's kind of like having one hand tied behind your back.
I'm so sorry. Do you want me to come back?
No, no, I'm fine. It's just I feel before we continue it's important you know that. Okay?
All right.
Because I can't tell how you're feeling this morning, but it seems to me that one night of crying can't make up for months of denial.
No. You're wrong. I feel better today than I have in ages. You're absolutely wrong, Deanna.
The probe's point of view reveals that the objects exist entirely in two dimensions, on a single plane.
They have length and width, but not height. Virtually flat.
That is why the ship's forward sensors did not detect them initially. We were looking at them along their edge. There was no surface to read. I will illustrate.
Are they a lifeform?
The movement pattern within the cluster is not a naturally occurring phenomenon in the Newtonian sense. They appear to be alive.
Can you explain why they're pulling us along with them?
Somehow, they're able to polarise the graviton field as they move about. We're caught in the wake.
How do we get out of it?
Best idea for now is to try a controlled overload of the warp drive. Jump directly to warp six. The laws of a three-dimensional universe say it should work. Don't know about a two-dimensional universe though.
Fascinating. So many questions. How can a two-dimensional entity have access to a three-dimensional universe? And are they aware of us? Number One, if we can put off the T'lli Betans, I would like to investigate this further as soon as we're free of the graviton field.
It's a shame we can't tell if they're sentient.
What do you mean by that? I'm doing the best that I can.
No one suggested otherwise, Counsellor. Mister Data, try to isolate any signal patterns from the cluster. Perhaps there'll be a basis for communication. Mister La Forge, we'll attempt your warp jump as soon as you're prepared. That'll be all. Counsellor
How are you feeling?
Beverly, I can't do my job. I'm absolutely lost. You have to do something.
I cross-referenced your scan results with the baseline files in the computer. Nothing helpful has turned up. And so far the lab work is inconclusive.
Inconclusive. What does that mean?
It means there is nothing I can do now. I am still trying.
How do you people live like this?
We get by pretty well, actually. And so will you, in time.
You have no idea. No idea what this is like. How can you know what it's like to lose something you never had?
I don't claim to.
And yet you're telling me I'm supposed to get used to it.
If our positions were reversed, what would you tell me?
If our positions were reversed, I wouldn't have been in here treating skinned elbows while you were lying passed out on your office floor. I'd have been there a lot sooner. Perhaps in time to prevent this from ever happening!
I've been working with Ensign Brooks since the death of her husband. She's avoided the reality of what happened, denied it to herself, and I realise I've been doing the same thing about my condition.
That's perfectly understandable.
It's time I accept the truth, Captain, and resign as ship's counsellor.
Resign?
I can no longer fulfill my obligations. What other option is there?
Deanna, I've been fortunate to have access to your Betazoid abilities. Most starship captains have to be content with a human counsellor. Empathic awareness is not a requirement of your position.
It is for me.
I'm sure that after a while you'll be able to adjust. They say when one loses a sense, the other senses become stronger to compensate. A blind man develops better hearing.
With all due respect, Captain, you don't know what you're talking about. That is a common belief with no scientific basis, no doubt created by normal people who felt uncomfortable around the disabled. I am disabled, and I'm telling you I cannot perform my duties.
There was a teacher of mine at the Academy who had been confined to a wheelchair since birth. She was a woman
Captain, spare me the inspirational anecdote and just accept my resignation.
Come in.
I really would rather be alone right now.
Too bad.
Is this how you handle all of your personnel problems?
Sure. You'd be surprised how far a hug goes with Geordi, or Worf.
Will, I don't know what to do.
So you resign? You walk away from all the people who care about you?
I look around me and all I see are surfaces without depth. Colourless. Hollow. Nothing seems real.
I'm real.
No, you're not. You're a projection, with no more substance to me than a character on the holodeck.
I don't believe that.
You have no idea how frightening it is to just be here without sensing you, without sharing your feelings.
That's it, isn't it? We're on equal footing now.
What?
You always had an advantage. A little bit of control of every situation. That must have been a very safe position to be in. To be honest, I'd always thought there was something a little too aristocratic about your Betazoid heritage. As if your human side wasn't quite good enough for you.
That isn't true.
Isn't it?
La Forge to Riker.
Go ahead, Geordi.
We are ready to attempt a controlled overload jump to warp six.
Acknowledged. I'm on my way to the Bridge. I'll check in on you later.
Really, you don't have to.
I will check in on you later.
Setting a new course at optimal shearing angle. Bearing two one seven mark two zero three.
Engaging impulse
Engines now.
Mister La Forge, go to warp.
Aye, sir.
Status?
Unchanged. We have not broken free of the graviton field.
Integrity-field pressure has increased by two hundred seventeen percent, Captain.
Warning. Differential stress will exceed upper limit in fifteen seconds.
Disengage all engines.
Warning. Differential stress will exceed upper
Engines disengaged, sir.
Report, La Forge.
The energy we wanted to transfer to the nacelles
Was absorbed by the graviton wake instead. It set up a torsional wave that rebounded back to the ship.
We're lucky the hull is still in one piece.
This little nuisance is beginning to lose its fascination.
Sir, during our attempt to break away, I recorded a momentary alteration of the movement pattern within the cluster.
You think we got their attention, Data?
Perhaps, but just for an instant. The pattern immediately returned to its previous dynamic.
Follow up on it, Mister Data. Input your observations into the Universal Translator.
Aye, sir.
Perhaps the movements themselves are an attempt at communication.
More tea? I didn't mean to startle you.
That's alright. I'm getting used to it.
May I?
Sure.
Are you really getting used to it?
No.
Do you want to talk about it?
No.
Good. I get so tired of people coming in with their problems. They come in, they want a shoulder to cry on, and generally it turns out to be mine.
You'd make a good counsellor.
I think so too. So I'm going to talk to Picard about it.
About what? You becoming counsellor?
Well, yes, you're leaving. That means there won't be a counsellor on board, and I suppose I'm going to have a very long line at that bar. It would be nice to have a nice office, too.
It's more than just letting them cry on your shoulder. It takes an enormous commitment.
I can do that.
Guinan, people come to you to talk about things they want to reveal. As ship's counsellor, you have to get them to talk about things they don't want to reveal.
I could do that too.
What are you? You don't really want to be ship's counsellor.
What would make you say that?
I just know you're not serious.
Have I given you any indication that I might not serious?
Not really, but
Then how do you know? Are your empathic abilities coming back?
No. I suppose it's just instinctive. I get it. You're trying to make me see that I have other abilities to draw on. Human intuition, instincts. Guinan, those skills only develop after years of experience. It's not that easy.
No one said it was easy. It's much harder than you think. Human intuition and instinct are not always right, but they do make life interesting.
So I'm discovering.
Problem, Data?
Yes, Commander. Sensors are detecting highly accelerated interstellar gases.
Suggesting?
Uncertain, sir. The phenomenon is within visual range.
On screen.  Magnify.
It appears to be a cosmic string fragment. Only one hundred seven kilometres long.
A cosmic string?
No wider than a proton but with gravitational fields as powerful as a black hole.
The two-dimensional beings seem to be caught in the gravitational pull of the string. Their course is taking them directly toward it.
And us right along with them.
Captain's log, stardate 44359.5. What began as a curious inconvenience has turned into a serious threat. At current speed, the two-dimensional beings and the Enterprise will be drawn into the cosmic string fragment in seven hours.
The entities offer no indication that they are aware of the string fragment, Captain. Their course and speed remain constant.
Sir, recommend we fire a spread of photon torpedoes into their field.
Must we destroy them to save ourselves?
It is unclear what affect a photon torpedo would have on a two-dimensional beings, sir.
Nevertheless.
Well, we wouldn't necessarily have to fire at them. Half a dozen photon torpedo bursts directly in their path could make them change course.
Make it so.
Torpedoes armed. Fire distribution set. Detonation at seven kilometres ahead of the cluster.
Data, launch another probe. Patch the monitor through to the main viewer.
Probe has been launched. On screen.
Proceed, Mister Worf.
Launching photon torpedoes. Detonation in five seconds. Three, two, one.
There is no change in the graviton field. The torpedoes are having no effect, sir.
Fire another volley directly into their field, Mister Worf.
Launching torpedoes. Detonation in five seconds. Three, two, one.
Matter-antimatter explosions appear to be ineffective, sir.
Come in. Janet. Oh, I'm sorry, I meant to cancel your appointment today. Actually, I'm resigning as Ship's Counsellor.
Why?
I think it was fairly clear during your last appointment. It was obviously non productive. I couldn't sense what you were feeling.
Deanna, you were right about me. I had to go back and look at what I was doing, see why I was trying to convince myself and you that I was a new woman. You made me realise I was doing exactly the same thing to myself as I was before. Trying to hide from the pain. Maybe you couldn't sense what I was feeling, but you helped.
Come.
You wanted to see me, Captain?
Yes, Counsellor. Sit down, please. Our situation has become critical. The cluster remains completely unresponsive. We have not been able to alter its course toward the cosmic string fragment.
How much time do we have?
Less than five hours. Which is why I have called you.
Sir?
All that remains is the possibility of communication. There might be some way that we can warn them of their impending destruction.
I thought Data had already tried to establish communications through the universal translator.
He has tried every technical means at our disposal to reach them.
I wish I knew how to help, Captain, but under the circumstances
If there is a psychology to these creatures, we must discover it. If there is an explanation for their behaviour, we must know what it is. Even in your current condition, you are the most qualified person aboard this ship to assist. Data is in Observation attempting to formulate a strategy. I want you to join him. Deanna, we need you.
Captain's log, supplemental. If our speed and course remain unchanged, in one hour the Enterprise will be torn apart by the gravitational forces of the cosmic string fragment.
Are your signals reaching them?
Possibly. However, the beings may perceive them as negligible noise rather than an attempt at communication.
Is there any evidence at all that they're sentient?
Negative. The nature of their movement suggests a simple order of intelligence.
I'm sorry, Data. I don't seem to be much help without my empathic abilities. I just don't know how to draw on my human instinct.
As I have no human instinct per se, I cannot advise you, Counsellor.
Right now, I feel as two-dimensional as our friends out there. In the universe but barely aware of it. Just trying to survive on instinct. Data, what if they're simply acting instinctively? There are inherent, inborn forces in every species. What they need, what they fear. We have to discover what drives this species.
I do not believe there is any way we can know for certain, Counsellor.
We can speculate on the available evidence.
The only evidence we have at present is the brief interruption in their movement pattern during our last attempt to break away.
Which may suggest some kind of awareness of our presence.
Otherwise their course and speed have been constant.
On a straight line to the cosmic string. You're convinced the string's gravitation is pulling them in?
Because the cluster is two-dimensional, I do not have enough direct evidence to support that assumption. However, it is the most reasonable hypothesis.
Why?
It is unlikely they would intentionally move toward a destructive force.
Moths fly toward a flame. Horses sometimes run into a burning barn. Data, don't you see? We've been thinking in three dimensions. We have to get two-dimensional.
Pardon me?
Subspace signals, photon torpedoes, nothing's had an impact. It is reasonable to wonder if a gravitational pull, even as strong as a cosmic string's, would affect them.
Please continue.
What if they've chosen a course to the cosmic string? A case of pure stimulus response, driven by instinct, just like the moth to a flame.
If Counsellor Troi's supposition is correct, a replica of the string projected behind the cluster could induce them to reverse course, disrupting the graviton wake long enough for us to escape.
How do you simulate a cosmic string? It has the gravitational force of a hundred stars.
I do not suggest simulating the gravitational field of the string fragment, rather the string's vibration.
Vibration? We're not talking about a violin, Data.
No, Data's right. The principle is still the same. A cosmic string emanates a characteristic set of subspace frequencies as atomic particles decay along its event horizon. I could use the ship's parabolic dish to amplify and reflect those frequencies back toward the cluster. The Enterprise itself would echo the cosmic string.
How much time do we have, Mister Worf?
Twenty three minutes, sir.
Make it so.
Frequency-scan detectors engaged.
Receiving.
Data, we're picking up frequencies across the entire electromagnetic and lower subspace spectrum. Trying to isolate. Data, can you focus the reflector field for me?
Stand by.
I am differentiating particle-emission signatures now.
Good. Good, that's doing it. Patterns are converging.
Same course, same speed. No change, sir.
We are beginning to encounter the gravitational effects of the string. Impact is in four minutes.
Sir, shear force turbulence is impairing our ability to create an accurate simulation.
Geordi, fire up the impulse engines. Activate the
Ship's stabilisers.
Stabilisers on.
Electromagnetic and subspace wave fronts approaching synchronisation.
Three minutes to impact.
Status?
The cluster is unaffected. Same course, same speed.
Let's try turning up the volume. Increase the intensity, Mister Data.
Increasing by fifty percent.
They're slowing.
Graviton-wake field collapsing.
Mister La Forge, get us out of here.
With pleasure, sir.
The beings have resumed their course into the string. Three seconds to impact.
It's all right. They're home. We were wrong. The cosmic string it was never dangerous to them. It was the one place in the galaxy they most wanted to be.
Deanna?
Yes. I sensed it.
Such overwhelming intensity of emotion. When we first encountered them, it must have been more than my senses could process.
A short circuit.
Something like that. Oh, Beverly.
Apology accepted. Therapists are always the worst patients. Except for doctors, of course. Come by and see me in my office later, okay?
I was so awful to her.
You were just being human.
I never fully appreciated how difficult and how rewarding it is to be human, but I had a lot of help. Thanks.
Now, is that counsellor position is still open aboard ship?
It's been taken.
I just thought I'd ask. Better hours. Excuse me.
And you. Thank you for making me face my other half.
Frightening, isn't it?
A little. You were right, though. There is something to be learned when you're not in control of every situation.
Welcome to the human race.
By the way. The next time you call me aristocratic.
Captain, I have completed the spectral evaluation of the outer shell. Our survey of this protostar is complete.
Ensign, lay in a course to the next one, three quarters impulse.
Riker to Captain Picard.
Go ahead, Number One.
May I see you in the Observation Lounge, sir?
I'll be right there.
Oh, my God.
Then you can identify this object, Mister Picard.
Professor Galen?
Computer, lights up.
I suppose I should say Captain Picard.
Professor Galen contacted me from his shuttle an hour ago. He suggested that we surprise you.
To clarify. I insisted and your First Officer was good enough to accommodate me. I trust I'm not being overly presumptuous, now that my star pupil is master of the stars.
No one is could be more welcome on the Enterprise. I never thought I would see a Kurlan naiskos. Fifth Dynasty?
Is that your conclusion, Mister Picard. Forgive me again. I should say Captain.
Oh, please, Mister will do fine. Well, the overall configuration is certainly Fifth Dynasty. The surface ornamentation.
Yes?
Green polychrome over the eyes, and the eyes themselves are closed. This is third Dynasty. From the workshop of the Master of Tarquin Hill.
Well done.
Will, the Master of Tarquin Hill designed ceramic objects that were three hundred years ahead of their time. All we know of him is the work. His name has never been discovered. This object is over twelve thousand years old.
The planet Kurl? It's a hell of a long way outside Federation territory.
Indeed. I thought your study of Kurlan artefacts was done long ago.
I happened to be in the neighbourhood last summer. I couldn't resist. Go ahead.
You mean it's complete?
Will, the Kurlan civilisation believed that an individual was a community of individuals. Inside us are many voices, each with its own desires, its own style, its own view of the world. The Kurlan civilisation died out thousands of years ago. It is extraordinarily rare to find a figurine intact. Professor, this is an incredible find.
It's yours, Jean-Luc.
Oh, no. No. How can I accept this?
Graciously, Mister Picard. You could accept it graciously.
Thank you. How long can you stay? There's so much to talk about.
The Professor is scheduled to meet a Vulcan transport the day after tomorrow.
Two days? But that's not enough time.
We may have considerably more than that.
I don't understand.
I am currently on an expedition. A journey into an unexplored and historical territory, and I intend to take you with me.
Captain's log, supplemental. It's been over thirty years since I last saw my archaeology professor. His presence has taken me back to a time when I had considered a very different career.
May I ask you a frank question?
Please.
Your published writings have been sporadic for the last decade. Your appearance at symposia has been rare, or scheduled and then cancelled at the last moment. The finest archaeologist of the century is now shrouded with a cloak of mystery.
And as a result my reputation has no doubt grown.
I've never heard of anyone that didn't love a good mystery.
The Satarran of Sothis Three disdained them, but as a general idea, your statement holds.
So, what have you been doing for the past decade?
Are you familiar with micropaleontology?
Yes, it's the study of fossil records at the microscopic level. I read your papers on the subject, but that was years ago. It seemed as though the work had stopped.
No. The work continued. I made a discovery so profound in its implications that silence seemed the wisest course. This work has occupied my every waking thought, it's intruded upon my dreams, it's become my life. When finished and I announce my findings, it will be heard half way across the galaxy.
Tell me.
I'm cannot, Mister Picard. That information comes with a price. Your agreement to join me on the final leg of this expedition.
For how long?
Three months, perhaps a year. If I had complete diplomatic access and a starship, it'd be a matter of weeks. But as it is, we'll have only my shuttle and whatever arrangement we can make with transports, combined with our talents.
Why do you need my help in this?
I'm not a young man. There will be hazards along the way. I don't want my own inadequacies to jeopardise the completion of this work.
I'm deeply honoured that you'd think of me, but I have responsibilities.
To History. What if you could have helped Schliemann discover the City of Troy, or been with M'Tell as she first stepped on Ya'Seem. How could anything compare?
May I sleep on it?
Dream not of today, Mister Picard.
Dream not of today. The night blessing of the Yash-El.
As I recall, you missed that question on the final exam.
Well, I've had a few years to look it up. Professor, the Enterprise is yours for as long as you're here.
Thank you.
Dream not of today.
Come.
Good morning. Looks like you've been up for a while.
Yes.
Let's hear it.
I had a long talk with Professor Galen last night. He asked me to leave the Enterprise, to join him in an archaeological expedition which could last for nearly a year.
That must be tempting.
I couldn't leave the Enterprise. But the offer raised in me certain feelings of regret.
That you could have been an archaeologist and not a starship Captain?
No, not really. I'm not sorry for the path I chose. But the Professor did not choose this figure at random. The many voices inside the one. You see, he knows that the past is a very insistent voice inside of me. This gift is meant to remind me of that.
And the exploration of space? Surely that must count for something.
I wouldn't trade it for anything, and I would still make the same choice I made all those years ago. I just wish that I didn't have to say no to him a second time.
Were you two very close?
I had a father, but he was like a father who understood me. And he had his own children but they didn't follow in his footsteps, so I was like the son who understood him.
And yet you turned your back on him.
In a way, I wish he'd never come on board the ship.
Good morning, Mister Picard.
Professor.
The Vulcan ship will take us as far as DS Four. An Al-Leyan transport is scheduled to arrive at the station three weeks later. They'll take us as far as Caere, and then we'll use the shuttle to get us to Indri Eight, our first stop.
Professor, I'm afraid I won't be going. The Enterprise isn't something that I can leave and then come back to. If I go, I go for good. It's not something I'm not prepared to do.
This is not some undergraduate study project that you're turning down. This is the chance of a lifetime. Don't make the same mistake twice.
You don't believe that my career in Starfleet has been a mistake.
What are you doing at this very moment? A study mission. You're like some Roman centurion out patrolling the provinces, maintenancing a dull and bloated Empire.
We both know that's not true.
I know this. I know that as a scholar, you're nothing but a dilettante. Years ago, I gave you the opportunity to become the finest archaeologist of your generation. Your achievements could have outstripped even my own, but no, you decided to reject a life of profound discovery. You walked out on me.
I never wanted to become
Will you come with me?
I can't.
I'll be going.
But Professor, you're not scheduled to catch the Vulcan ship for another two days.
There's nothing for me here. Goodbye, Captain.
Captain's log, supplemental. We have completed our mission in the nebula and are en route to a diplomatic conference on Atalia Seven. I must admit I've lost my enthusiasm for those proceedings.
At our present speed, we will arrive at the Atalia system in thirty seven hours.
Captain, I'm going for a walk in the arboretum. I wouldn't mind some company.
Captain, a distress call from Professor Galen's shuttle. On screen.
Enterprise! I'm being boarded.
Transmission has been blocked.
I have located the shuttle. It is under attack.
Take us out of warp. On screen.
A Yridian destroyer.
Battle stations.
Aye, sir.
Professor Galen is still inside his vessel, sir. His vital signs are barely registering.
Get him out of there.
The shuttle is enveloped by a tractor beam. The transporter cannot penetrate it.
Hail the Yridians.
They are not responding.
Return phaser fire. Disable their offensive systems.
Worf!
I don't understand, Commander. The phaser blast was not powerful enough to destroy the ship.
Transporter Room One, lock on to Professor Galen and transport him directly to Sickbay.
Aye, sir.
He took a disruptor hit point blank. There is nothing I can do.
Jean-Luc, I was too harsh.
I'd say at least three Yridians boarded the Professor's shuttle.
What did they want?
I'm not sure, but it looks like they were trying to download something from his computer.
When he was attacked, Professor Galen began to protect certain files in his computer memory.
We were able to partially reconstruct the shuttle's computers, so at least we have some of those files. We found nineteen different blocks of numbers like this one.
What do they mean?
They could mean anything. Unless we can narrow the parameters of the search, it would be almost impossible for the computer to identify the pattern with any accuracy.
We tried every decryption key on record in case Professor Galen was using some kind of code. We still can't make heads or tails of them.
Were the Yridians able to get these number blocks?
At least some of them. It's impossible to say know many.
Apparently, the Yridians knew more about the Professor's work than we do. They may have known what these numbers mean.
If they did, that information died with them.
Not necessarily. The Yridians are information dealers. They may have been delivering the number blocks to someone else. Did they send a signal before they were destroyed?
No, sir. We detected no transmissions.
And there were no other vessels in the vicinity.
Did the shuttle's flight logs show where Galen had been before coming to the Enterprise?
Yes, sir. The logs indicate Professor Galen visited an unexplored star system, Ruah Four.
What's the distance from our present position?
Four days at warp six, sir.
The conference can wait. Set a course for the Ruah system.
Standard orbit, Ensign.
Ruah Four is a class-M planet. Sixty seven percent of its surface is covered with water. Its landmass contains multiple animal species, including a genus of proto-hominids.
Scan for earthworks or monuments that might indicate a previous civilisation.
There is nothing to indicate former occupancy by even a primitive culture, sir.
Then what was the foremost archaeologist in the Federation doing here? He left the Enterprise in a Vulcan ship for Deep Space Four, and then an Al-Leyan transport to Caere, and then the shuttle to Indri Eight. Mister Data, what do we know about Indri Eight?
The Indri system was first identified by Federation vessels nearly sixty years ago. The eighth planet is L-class. It is covered by deciduous vegetation, unexplored, with no apparent evidence of civilisations, either present or past. The planet possesses no animal life whatsoever.
Number One, we'll proceed to Indri Eight.
With all due respect, sir, we've already run into one dead end. Indri Eight doesn't seem much more promising. And we're late for the conference on Atalia Seven.
I'm aware of the Federation's timetable, Number One. Professor Galen visited here a few days ago. And he was on his way to Indri Eight when he was killed. There's some connection between these two planets. I'm going to find it.
Aye, sir. Ensign, lay in a course for Indri Eight, warp seven.
Come.
How's it going?
I thought if I stared at these number blocks long enough then I would begin to see some kind of pattern. So far, nothing.
I meant, how's it going with you?
If I had gone with him.
Captain, you can't start thinking like that. You didn't abandon him. You chose not to abandon a life-long career. It was the right decision, and in no way responsible for his death.
I realise that.
I know how much the Professor meant to you and how much you want to find out what happened, but staring at these numbers isn't going to bring him back. The conference on Atalia Seven has been scheduled for six months. Starfleet is relying on your mediation efforts to
Counsellor, this is not simply a case of me taking the Enterprise and its crew on some wild goose chase to purge myself of guilt and remorse. I will not let Galen's death to be in vain. Now, if that means inconveniencing a few squabbling delegates for a few days, then so be it. I will take the full responsibility.
Captain.
We are about to enter the Indri system, sir.
Riker to Picard. We are approaching Indri Eight.
On my way.
Sensors are picking up severe atmospheric fluctuations on the planet.
Assume a high orbit.
On screen, Mister Worf.
Some kind of plasma reaction is consuming the lower atmosphere.
Can we stop it?
No, sir. The reaction is global.
All life on the planet is being destroyed, sir.
Why would anyone want to destroy all the life on an uninhabited, neutral planet with no strategic importance whatsoever?
All the life. Perhaps the Professor's number blocks had something to do with organic matter.
If we narrow the search parameters to the biological database, it might increase the chances of the computer finding a match.
I'll be in the lab.
Pattern match found.
Specify.
The number blocks are mathematical representations of fragments of deoxyribonucleic acid strands.
DNA fragments?
Each from a different lifeform from nineteen different worlds.
The planets that these fragments are from are scattered across the quadrant. No wonder it took the Professor so long to collect them. But why?
Wait a minute. These fragments all seem to have similar protein configurations. They may be chemically compatible.
But how can that be possible? They're different species from different planets. There should be no compatibility at all.
I know, but look at the base pair combinations, they're uniform. If I'm right. Computer, connect the DNA fragments according to protein link compatibility.
What is it?
I have no idea.
This is not a natural design. Captain. This is part of an algorithm, coded at the molecular level.
An algorithm? Are you saying that these DNA fragments are elements in some kind of computer programme?
I know how it sounds, but there's no way this could be a random formation. This is definitely part of a programme.
This fragment has been part of every DNA strand on Earth since life began there, and the other fragments are just as old. Someone must have written this programme over four billion years ago.
So, four billion years ago someone scattered this genetic material into the primordial soup of at least nineteen different planets across the galaxy?
The genetic information must have been incorporated into the earliest lifeforms on these planets, and then passed down through each generation.
But why would anyone do this in the first place?
And what was this programme designed to do?
Well, we couldn't know that until we assembled the entire programme and then ran it. We've tried all the DNA material in the Federation computer, but we haven't been able to come up with any with compatible protein configurations.
Then they must be from worlds outside the Federation. Mister Data, how many people on the Enterprise are from non-Federation planets?
Seventeen, sir.
You know, this may be a long shot, but we should check each one of these seventeen people to see if they have the correct protein configurations.
I'll begin collecting DNA samples now.
You know, Captain, I've been thinking. Somebody else must know about this programme. I bet one of the missing fragments was on Indri Eight. That's why it was destroyed.
To keep us from finding that piece of the puzzle. It's four billion years old. A computer programme from a highly advanced civilisation, and it's hidden in the very fabric of life itself. Whatever information this programme contains could be the most profound discovery of our time. Or the most dangerous. And the Professor knew that.
They all came up negative.
Well I have been through every page of the Professor's published works, looking for some clue as to where to go next. So far, nothing.
Maybe we've been at this too long. Why don't we both get some sleep and start again tomorrow morning.
I was in the neighbourhood. When I asked the Professor why he went all the way to Kurl, he said, I was in the neighbourhood. Doing what?
Collecting DNA samples.
There's only one planet in the Kurlan system capable of supporting life. Loren Three.
No. There is no Loren Three sample from the data downloaded from the Professor's shuttle. If he did have one it must have been taken by the Yridians when they attacked.
Mister Data, set course for Loren Three, maximum warp.
Aye, sir.
We are approaching the Loren system.
Slow to half impulse, and take us into orbit above the third planet.
There is a good chance that our competition may be here before us. Battle stations, Mister Worf.
Aye.
We are now entering orbit.
On screen.
You were right, Captain, we've got company. Cardassians.
They are hailing us.
On screen.
My name is Gul Ocett. Identify yourselves and state your business in this star system.
I am Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Federation Starship Enterprise and I see no reason why I should answer to you. Cardassians have no claims in this sector.
I suppose not. But my admittedly hasty estimate shows one Federation Starship and two Cardassian war vessels. Perhaps I have miscounted.
Not at all. But we are on a purely scientific mission. You have no reason to interfere with us.
And you have nothing to lose by delaying a purely scientific mission for a few days. I invite you to withdraw.
Captain, a Klingon attack cruiser decloaking off the starboard bow. They are hailing us.
This is the Klingon vessel Maht-H'a. What are you doing here?
Captain's log, supplemental. It seems that we have not one, but two competitors in our attempt to complete Professor Galen's puzzle. I have prevailed upon the Cardassian and Klingon captains to meet with me.
I believe we all know why we're here. If we admit that, then we can move forward.
We were merely scouting the planet for possible colonization
NU'DAQ:Pah! A ridiculous story.
What were you doing here, then?
NU'DAQ:Scientific research.
Ha!
Look, if we try to deceive one other, then we shall get nowhere. I think we all know about Professor Galen's research, and about the computer programme composed of DNA fragments. I'll take your silence as confirmation. Now, it stands to reason that none of us has the DNA fragments necessary to complete the programme. You were the first to arrive in this system. Do you have an organic sample from the planet below?
Yes. And I will fire on anyone who attempts to obtain another one.
NU'DAQ:As if we fear Cardassian threats.
I believe that one of you has a fragment from Indri Eight.
NU'DAQ:Yes. And there will be no other samples from Indri Eight.
What is that supposed to mean?
He destroyed the biosphere of the planet after he had taken the sample.
Typical Klingon thinking. Take what you want and destroy the rest.
We're all missing some of the fragments, not necessarily the same ones. Unless we combine the ones we have, we will never learn the secret of the programme.
NU'DAQ:There is no secret. It is an ancient weapon design of incredible power. And the Klingon Empire will not allow it to fall into an enemy's hands. Or even a friend's.
A weapon? The Yridian who sold us the information claimed that the programme would yield the key to an unlimited power source.
But until we assemble it, we will never know its purpose.
He's right. As far as we know, it might just be a recipe for biscuits.
NU'DAQ:Biscuits? If that is what you believe, then go back to Cardassia. I will send you my mother's recipe.
How dare you!
Myriap! Enough. Without cooperation we will get nowhere.
What do you propose?
If you each bring your samples on board the Enterprise, I will combine them with ours. And then we will all observe the results simultaneously, giving no one the advantage.
NU'DAQ:And if we refuse?
Then this endeavour dies here, in this room.
Captain.
NU'DAQ:Excellent.
There's still one missing piece.
NU'DAQ:Pahk! We have surrendered what we had for nothing.
You are remarkably short sighted, Nu'Daq. We are closer to the answer than we were.
We may be very much closer indeed.
NU'DAQ:How can that be? We have no idea where to start looking for the missing DNA fragment.
This is a jigsaw puzzle whose pieces are scattered across the galaxy. Doesn't it make it natural to assume that the original designers of the puzzle should want us to find it? Why else would they have put the pieces in our DNA? And in turn, doesn't suggest they would try to make it easy for us to find those pieces, that there might be some pattern to their distribution?
The computer might be able to find that pattern.
Doctor, programme the computer to analyse the distribution of the pieces that we have, correcting for changes in star configurations over four billion years, then extrapolate for the missing piece.
That's going to take several hours to set up and to process. If you'll excuse me.
If you wish, you can stay on board while we wait.
NU'DAQ:I intend to.
NU'DAQ:Good evening, Commander Data.
Captain.
NU'DAQ:Is there any word yet on the missing fragment?
The computer is processing the data. I will be notified as soon as there is any information.
NU'DAQ:Commander, your reputation for physical strength is known even in the Klingon Empire. You are familiar with the B'aht Qul challenge?
I am familiar with many Klingon rituals, including the B'aht Qul.
NU'DAQ:Wa' Cha' Wej
NU'DAQ:Maw' tok!
My upper spinal support is a polyalloy designed to withstand extreme stress. My skull is composed of cortenide and duranium.
NU'DAQ:I understand your intellectual prowess is equally impressive. If I were to learn of the results from the computer search before the others, the Klingon Empire would have a strategic advantage. A being of your abilities would go far in the Empire.
You are attempting to bribe me.
NU'DAQ:Not at all.
You suggested a plan that would work to your advantage, one that I would be capable of executing. You then implied a reward. Clearly you were
NU'DAQ:Commander, never mind.
What the hell? Computer, perform a level three diagnostic on the primary defensive systems. La Forge to Captain Picard.
What is it, Geordi?
You might want to come down here. I found something that I think you should see.
The computer has completed its analysis.
The computer was able to extrapolate this geometric pattern based on the distribution of the fragments.
Computer, highlight the section of the missing pattern. The missing DNA fragment should be in this system.
The star is in sector two one four five nine. The Rahm Izad system.
Direct hit on our port nacelle. They are powering up for another volley.
Let's make it look good. Ensign, release the inertial dampers.
Aye, sir.
They are firing.
Report, Number One.
The power boost to the structural integrity field protected the nacelles. We used the inertial dampers to simulate complete shield failure.
NU'DAQ:It is fortunate that your Engineer discovered Gul Ocett's attempt to tamper with your defensive systems. Maht-H'a. Status.
Minor damage to starboard nacelle. We will be operational in less than one hour.
NU'DAQ:What? You incompetent Top'a. You were supposed to be prepared.
The Cardassian vessels have set a course for Rahm Izad.
Well, it won't take them long to realise that Rahm Izad is the wrong planet. Captain, you're welcome to join us.
NU'DAQ:I will go with you.
Ensign, set in a course for the Vilmoran System. Warp nine.
Aye, sir.
Engage.
I am scanning all seven planets of the Vilmoran system. None appears to support life.
How can that be? The Professor's data depends on
Correction. The second planet shows evidence of an ancient ocean, now dry.
It once supported life.
Yes, and it still may, in a limited fashion not detectable by our long range sensors.
Lay in a course, Ensign. Full impulse. Riker to Transporter room one.
Captain, we've located a planet that may still support life. We'll know in a minute.
Any sign of the Cardassians?
Not yet. We don't know how long it'll stay that way.
Acknowledged.
I am reading a small pocket of vegetative life. A primitive lichen growing in a fossilised seabed.
Transporter room one. I am programming the coordinates. Stand by.
There. Over there.
Captain, we've got company. I'm ready to pull you out of there.
Wait for my order, Number One.
NU'DAQ:You dishonorable top'a!
Perhaps we could exchange insults some other time. I'm rather busy now.
Well, it was quite a chase, wasn't it, my friends?
NU'DAQ:How?
We intercepted several communiqus between the Yridians and Cardassia. My ship was watching under cloak when Professor Galen's shuttle was attacked.
And you have been shadowing us ever since.
And now the reward. Step clear, please.
I shall destroy the entire rockface and every trace of DNA with it. You will go back to Romulus empty-handed. Your superiors will be quite pleased.
Perhaps we could come to a compromise? You give us the gene code.
The seabed it may be only partially fossilised. It could still contain organic material.
Which would still contain the DNA.
NU'DAQ:I will not be eliminated now.
You can be eliminated by a disrupter. Now, what do you say to my offer.
How can I be sure you won't kill me if I acquiesce.
I've given you my word.
NU'DAQ:Etched in stone, no doubt. No deals. There will be no deals as long as I'm still alive.
Do not press me, Klingon. I don't care whether you live or die.
If you fire, others will also. Many will die.
The programme has been activated. I think it's reconfiguring the tricorder.
NU'DAQ:We die together, Brother. Tash Koh Tah.
It's modifying the emitter diode to project something.
You're wondering who we are, why we have done this, how it has come that I stand before you, the image of a being from so long ago. Life evolved on my planet before all others in this part of the galaxy. We left our world, explored the stars, and found none like ourselves. Our civilisation thrived for ages, but what is the life of one race, compared to the vast stretches of cosmic time? We knew that one day we would be gone, that nothing of us would survive. So, we left you. Our scientists seeded the primordial oceans of many worlds, where life was in its infancy. The seed codes directed your evolution toward a physical form resembling ours. This body you see before you, which is, of course, shaped as yours is shaped, for you are the end result. The seed codes also contained this message, which we scattered in fragments on many different worlds. It was our hope that you would have to come together in fellowship and companionship to hear this message. And if you can see and hear me, our hope has been fulfilled. You are a monument, not to our greatness, but to our existence. That was our wish, that you too would know life, and would keep alive our memory. There is something of us in each of you, and so, something of you in each other. Remember us.
NU'DAQ:That's all? If she were not dead, I would kill her.
The very notion. That a Cardassian could have anything in common with a Klingon, it turns my stomach.
Picard to Enterprise.
Standing by, sir.
Captain's log, stardate 46735.2. Our frequent use of high warp over the last few days has overextended the propulsion systems. We are finishing minor repairs before returning to Federation territory.
It's a shame Professor Galen didn't live to see the end result of his search.
I can't think of anyone who would have appreciated it more.
If it hadn't been for you, his dream to solve that puzzle would never have been realised. You left him a wonderful legacy.
Yes, but it would've been a more fitting legacy if the message had not fallen on such deaf ears.
You never know. Well, I have to get this day started.
Both of us.
See you this afternoon.
Riker to Captain Picard.
Incoming transmission from the Romulan command ship.
Put it through.
Acknowledged.
Captain, my ships are leaving orbit for Romulan space. Until our next encounter.
Until then.
It would seem that we are not completely dissimilar after all, in our hopes, or in our fears.
Yes.
Well, then. Perhaps, one day.
One day.
Commander, away team reporting in. Lieutenant Worf standing by.
This is Riker. Go ahead, Lieutenant.
The archeologists have identified the markings in these caverns. This planet was apparently once home to a race known as the Koinonians.
What do we know about them, Data?
The Koinonians were an intelligent culture which became embroiled in a war that lasted for several generations. Our best evidence indicates they destroyed themselves.
We have completed our survey of the third tunnel and will proceed into the ceremonial chamber.
Affirmative. Enterprise out.
Destroyed themselves, Data?
According to historical records. This will be the first opportunity for a Federation team
Captain! Beam them up quickly!
Captain. Emergency beam up! Enterprise, emergency! Severe injuries.
Transporter Room!
O'BRIEN:I've got them, Captain.
Beam them straight to Sickbay. Doctor Crusher, incoming wounded.
Away Team is aboard, Captain.
One dead on arrival.
Captain's Log, stardate 43198.7. The Enterprise remains in standard orbit while we investigate the tragedy which has struck the away team. Lieutenant Marla Aster, ship's archaeologist, has been killed in what should have been a routine mission. Whatever the explanation, it will not bring back a valued and trusted officer.
Lieutenant?
We had completed our investigation of the third tunnel. Our scans had indicated no weapons or traps of any kind. Lieutenant Aster was three metres behind me. An explosive device went off. There was no warning. Lieutenant Aster bore the full brunt of the detonation.
Lieutenant Aster is survived by a son, Jeremy. Twelve years old. He's aboard the Enterprise, sir.
And his father?
He's also deceased. His only living relatives are an aunt and uncle residing on Earth.
Where is he now?
In class. I've alerted the teacher to expect us.
Captain. I must accompany you. I commanded the away team.
I appreciate your offer, Lieutenant, but this is my responsibility.
Picard to Bridge.
Yes, Captain.
Assign Commander La Forge to lead another away team to the dig site. I want to know why this happened.
Yes, Captain.
I will be with Counsellor Troi
And young Jeremy Aster.
I understand. Riker out.
He had to do the same thing for me.
Do you know Jeremy well?
But I know this is going to be like for him.
That's part of life in Starfleet, Wesley.
I know. They're very careful to prepare us for anything, but still
I know.
How do you get used to it? Telling them?
You hope you never do.
I sense the weight of this duty on you, Captain.
I really wonder. Halt. I've always believed that carrying children on a starship is a very questionable policy. Serving on a starship means accepting certain risks, certain dangers. Did Jeremy Aster make that choice?
Death and loss are an integral part of life everywhere. Leaving him on Earth would not have protected him.
No, but Earth isn't likely to be ordered to the Neutral Zone, or to repel a Romulan attack, It was my command which sent his mother to her death. She understood her mission and my duty. Will he?
In time, and with help. Wesley Crusher does. He does. And so will Jeremy.
Resume.
Jeremy, I have some bad news. There has been an accident. Your mother has died.
How, sir?
An explosive device at the mission site. She died instantly.
I understand.
Jeremy, I know your mother loved you very much.
I'm told that your father is also dead.
Yes, sir. He died five years ago from a Rushton infection. I'm all alone now, sir.
Jeremy, on the starship Enterprise, no one is alone. No one.
Excuse me, sir. Am I intruding?
No, sit down.
How well did you know Lieutenant Aster?
We spent some time together. Not very well. How well did you know her?
Why do you ask?
Well, you just asked me.
But why do you ask the question? Since her death, I have been asked several times to define how well I knew Lieutenant Aster. And I heard you ask Wesley on the Bridge how well he knew Jeremy. Does the question of familiarity have some bearing on death?
Do you remember how we all felt when Tasha died?
I do not sense the same feelings of absence that I associate with Lieutenant Yar, although I cannot say precisely why.
Just human nature, Data.
Human nature, sir?
We feel a loss more intensely when it's a friend.
But should not the feelings run as deep regardless of who has died?
Maybe they should, Data. Maybe if we felt the loss of any life as keenly as we felt the death of those close to us, human history would be a lot less bloody.
La Forge to Riker
You're back, Geordi
Yes, sir, and we've brought back a souvenir.
There are five more just like them. All identical to the one that killed Lieutenant Aster.
They employ a subspace proximity detonator. A normal tricorder would never detect it.
How long would you say they've been there, Data?
It comes from the time of the Koinonian Wars, sir.
Did you find them all, Geordi?
Yeah, but, well, it seemed like they were left there to be found.
Left by whom? There are no indications of life on this planet.
I don't know, Captain, but it was pretty obvious that they'd been recently pulled out of the ground and defused.
I have made my report to the Captain.
I'm more interested in how you feel about what happened. I sense great anger.
I cannot seek revenge against an enemy who's turned to dust centuries ago. Her death was senseless. The last victim of a forgotten war.
Go on.
There's nothing more to be said.
A person died under your command. It may happen again. If you can't learn to release the anger and the guilt, to talk about it
A leader must stand alone. As Captain Picard does.
Captain Picard talks to me.
Then may I seek your counsel about my plan to make the R'uustai with the boy.
The Bonding.
It is my right.
It's very generous, Worf, but he's not a Klingon child. He has different sensibilities.
He is an orphan. I am an orphan. He will understand.
Right now, there isn't much he can understand. He's holding all his feelings inside. Children often feel they must be true to the memory of a lost parent. If you offer affection to them too soon they can feel guilty returning that affection. As if they're betraying the love of the parent.
I only wish to honour his mother.
I know. And I understand this means a great deal to you. But you must be prepared. He's very angry too, but his anger is deep inside him. When he touches it, it will strike out in many directions, including yours. Be with him. Talk to him. But don't rush this. When he's ready, we'll know.
Captain Patches, an alien ship on the surface. What's it made of, Captain. Oh, no, we've been hit, Captain. We're going down.
That was great. Now, let's get a shot of mom.
What are you doing? I'll turn your lens into  shards. Go away! Go away! Go away! Over there. Over there.
Patches. Captain Patches is coming in for a landing on the sofa!
Oh, no, he's going to crash.
Jeremy Aster? I'm Lieutenant Worf. May I enter?
You were in command of the away team.
Yes. I was with Lieutenant Aster, your mother, when she died.
You're a Klingon, aren't you.
Yes.
We studied about Klingons in school.
What did they teach you about us?
You used to be our enemies.
Did they also teach you that every Klingon hopes to die in the line of duty as your mother did? In my tradition, we do not grieve the loss of the body. We celebrate the releasing of the spirit.
I understand death. They teach us all about it.
Jeremy Aster, we may both understand it, but we must bring meaning to your mother's death. Perhaps we can do it together.
Come. Counsellor, how's the boy?
He's being very brave.
Good.
No, he has to get past brave. He's very angry and he has to learn how to express that anger before he can really say goodbye to his mother.
How can we help?
Well, I've asked Beverly if we might get Wesley to talk to Jeremy about his father's death. The one unusual element is Worf.
Oh?
In many ways he's suffering as badly as the boy. He wishes to involve Jeremy in a Klingon ceremony called R'uustai, the Bonding
I know of that. Perhaps it will be helpful to both of them.
I don't think Jeremy's ready to accept Worf right now. Perhaps later, but it will have to be handled most delicately.
As you always do. I break the unpleasant news and there my responsibility ends, but you, you have to stay with them through the entire grieving process.
We deal with our pain in many different ways, but over the years I've discovered it is in our joy that the uniqueness of each individual is revealed. If I can help a person back to a state of joy, well, my role has its rewards.
Captain, we're picking up an energy field on the planet surface.
Location?
Two kilometres north of the away team's beam-down point.
Indeed? Full scan.
Inconclusive, Captain.
Sir, I', sensing a presence on the planet. Very vague.
Life form?
I can't be sure. The emotions of the crew are particularly strong right now. It's difficult to filter them out.
Data, scan analysis on main viewer.
Hi.
Hi. Troi stopped by a little while ago. She was wondering if you might be willing to talk to Jeremy Aster at some point.
Me? What for?
About your Dad.
What am I going to tell him?
It would help him to talk with someone who's been through this. We had each other, Wes. He doesn't have anyone to lean on right now. And he might be more comfortable talking to someone who's not much older than he is.
Okay, I'll think about it.
Okay.
Do you ever think about him, Mom?
Your father? Sure I do.
Sometimes I can't even remember what his face looks like. It scares me.
It happens to all of us, Wes. Sometimes I can't get his face out of my mind.
Today, today it's like I can see it all as clearly as if it were yesterday. I can remember the way Dad looked when he hugged me goodbye. Captain Picard's eyes when he came to tell us
Data, run comparison of known phenomena.
The pattern has no exact match in Federation records, sir.
Is it alive?
A possibility.
Captain, I'm getting an unusual magnetic flux reading from the anti-matter containment pods.
My God.
Wait a minute, wait a minute. Okay, you've got ten seconds more, Mom. No peeking. Come on, Patches, in here. Shh. Okay, Mom, we're ready.
Jeremy? I'm getting closer. Jeremy, I'm going to find you. You must be in here somewhere.
Jeremy!
Mom?
All systems are functioning normally. Still, there's this fluctuation in the containment field. I can't account for it.
Data, is this possibly related to the energy fields on the planet?
Captain
There is a beam of highly charged particles emanating from the planet, sir, but I cannot pinpoint the location yet.
Captain, there's a presence on the Enterprise.
An alien presence?
No intruder noted by the sensors, sir.
There is a presence.
Security, all decks yellow alert. Possible intruder.
They said you were dead.
There was a mistake. It's okay.
But there was an explosion. You were hurt.
I'm fine. You mustn't think any more about this. The important thing is I'm never going to leave you again. I think somebody needs a hug.
We have to go now.
Where?
To the planet. That's where we're going to live now.
We're not going to stay on the Enterprise any more?
No. We're going to live in a home just like we used to on Earth. You'll see. I promise.
Lieutenant Worf! Did they tell you? It was a mistake. She didn't die. She's alive.
Jeremy, come here.
Lieutenant Worf. It's all right. I'm here for the boy.
Lieutenant Worf to Captain Picard.
Go ahead.
Lieutenant Aster is in her quarters.
Repeat, Worf?
Lieutenant Aster is here. In her quarters with the boy.
Do not provoke her
Or interfere in any way until I arrive. Picard out. Number One, have Security moving that way but tell them to keep their distance. You have the Bridge. Counsellor.
There is nothing to worry about. I'm going to take care of Jeremy and make him happy. It's time to go.
Where are you taking the child?
To the planet.
Come, Jeremy.
Worf to Picard, they're leaving their quarters.
Captain, I believe we're headed for transporter room three.
We're on our way.
Chief O'Brien, Jeremy and I are going down to the surface.
Who are you?
I'm Marla Aster.
It's my mother, Captain. She's alive.
What do you want?
To take my child down to the planet.
I cannot permit that. The boy is my responsibility.
I'm here to care for him. He needs me. Why do you resist?
Because I don't know who or what you are.
Can't you see who it is, Captain?
Jeremy, she appears to be your mother, but she is not.
What do you mean?
You're confusing the boy.
Hey! Wait! Stop! No! No! Wait! Stop!
Mom! Mom?
Jeremy
Wait a minute. Let go of me. She was right there!
What did you do to her?
Jeremy, I don't know what that was, but it was not your mother.
You saw her. She was here.
Your mother's dead.
But I touched her. She was real.
Why would your real mother want you to go down to the planet? There's nothing there but dust and rocks.
It's my house. It's my house on Earth.
Exactly the way it was. Remember, Jeremy?
How did you do it?
Does it matter?
Yes, it matters.
I am trying to understand your resistance. You spoke of rocks and dust on the planet. I decided to show you what awaits us there.
Why would you create this fantasy?
It's his home. And it makes you happy, doesn't it?
But it's not real.
Isn't it? Jeremy, isn't that really Patches?
He knows me. It's him. It's real. It's all real.
No, it's not. Could your real mother just make all this appear? You must not stay here. Come with me.
I can't.
Is the boy in any danger?
I don't think so. She seems to want to help him.
Help him?
By easing his pain. She's very confused by our resistance, Captain.
Troi, would it be wise to remove Jeremy from his cabin?
He doesn't want to leave. I would not recommend taking him
By force.
She offers him everything. All we offer is the cold reality of his mother's death.
What would you choose? If somebody came along and offered to give you back your mother, father or husband, would any of us say no so easily?
Counsellor, stay with them in Jeremy's quarters.
We'll try and put an end to this from here.
Understood.
Data, can you determine for certain that the energy source from the planet is powering this creation?
The beam from the planet is clearly tapping into the ship's anti-matter, Captain.
I'd say they're running the manifestation off our own energy.
So there are limits to her power.
She needs the transporter to get the boy back.
So how do we cut the puppet's strings?
Increasing the shield harmonics to match our own antimatter containment fields will probably sever the beam.
Proceed.
Deanna, stand by.
Standing by.
Jeremy, it's time for this to end. It's not real and it's over now.
Jeremy, I'm not going to leave you ever again.
I won't trick you or lie to you.
We'll be happy together, Jeremy, as soon as
No.
Anti-matter containment pods reading nominal.
The shield has severed the beam, sir. Captain, the energy field.
Mister Crusher, take us out of here.
O'BRIEN:Alien intruder, transporter room three. Security alert. Alien
Security to transporter room three.
Commander La Forge, Mister Worf, come with me. Number One, you have the Bridge.
Come, Jeremy. We will not let them separate us again. We're going home.
Captain, she's back. She's trying to take Jeremy off the ship again.
Acknowledged.
Engineering, this is La Forge. Shut down power to all transporters. I'm on my way.
Aye, aye, sir.
Lieutenant Worf, to transporter room three.
Bridge, seal off deck eight, corridors A and B.
Engaging force fields, Captain. Transporters down.
Energy force has left transporter room three. Security alert, all decks.
La Forge, the intruder may try to reinstate
Transporter power.
Understood, Commander.
Bridge, release security forcefield eight B. Hello, Jeremy. How are you? Are you frightened?
No. Well, a little, sir.
Of course. These are frightening things that are happening. But we won't let anyone harm you. Counsellor, why don't you take the boy to my quarters.
No!
It's looking over everything, Commander, going to school. Let's just hope it doesn't blow us to kingdom come while it's figuring out how to blow us to kingdom come.
Power's back in transporter room three.
Bypassing the manual override. Shutting it down.
Transporter is down again.
Keep it down, Geordi, for as long as you can.
Understood, Commander.
It is only a matter of time, Captain, before we can power the transporters ourselves
We? For whom else do you speak?
The accident on the surface was caused by a remnant of an ancient and tragic era. Two species once shared this world. One of energy and one of matter. The physical beings you call the Koinonians destroyed themselves in unending, bitter wars. The surviving life forms on this world will not tolerate any further suffering as a result of that dishonourable past. So, they have made this possible. They have made me possible.
I appreciate your motives, but his mother is dead. He must learn to live with that.
I will be every bit his mother.
But not his mother. Picard to Lieutenant Worf.
Go ahead, Captain.
Will you escort Ensign Crusher to the Aster quarters?
Yes, sir.
Picard out.
Your philosophy is curious, Captain. What is so noble about sorrow? I can provide him an existence where he will feel no pain, no anguish.
It is at the heart of our nature to feel pain and joy. It is an essential part of what makes us what we are.
He is alone now in your world. A child, alone. How can you know he won't be happier with me?
For a brief moment in time, he surely would be. Any of us in his place would be.
What would Jeremy do for friends in your world?
He will have any friends he needs.
And will you provide for his education, his health, his growth, a career, a wife?
Yes, it's quite an undertaking you're proposing, isn't it?
It is our duty to make him happy again.
Do you honestly believe he would be happy in this total fiction which you wish to create? What reason would he have to live? What you're offering him is a memory, something to cherish, not to live in. It is part of our life cycle that we accept the death of those we love. Jeremy must come to terms with his grief. He must not cover it or hide away from it. You see, we are mortal. Our time in this universe is finite. That is one of the truths that all human must learn.
Acting Ensign Crusher reporting as ordered, sir.
Yes. Come in, Wesley. Please stay, Lieutenant. Jeremy, Wesley's father died on a Starfleet mission when he was younger than you are.
Wes, your mother told me you were finding it difficult to talk to Jeremy. Why is that?
I don't know. I just didn't want to think about it any more. All this has reminded me so much of that day.
The day I told you your father had been killed. As I recall, Wesley, you took it very well.
My parents taught me about the dangers of Starfleet missions. I knew what could happen.
So you were prepared?
No, I wasn't prepared at all. How could anyone be prepared to hear that a parent is never coming home again? I tried to be what everybody expected of me. Brave and mature.
Wesley, are you saying that you didn't want anybody to see what you were really feeling? What were you really feeling?
Like somebody had kicked me in the head.
Somebody?
Go on. You've wanted to tell him for a long time.
I was angry at you.
Why angry? Why were you angry at me, Wesley? Were you angry at me because I was the one who told you your father was dead?
No.
Then why?
Because you led the mission. You came home and my father didn't.
How long were you angry with the Captain, Wes?
For a long time. But not any more, sir. Not even a little.
So, Jeremy, you must be very angry at Lieutenant Worf. He was in charge of your mother's mission, just as Captain Picard was in command when Wesley's father was killed. Isn't that right? Worf came back. Your mother didn't.
Why? Why weren't you the one who died? Why did it have to be her?
He can't answer that. None of us can.
Lieutenant Worf also lost his parents.
They were killed in battle when I was six. When I was alone, humans helped me. Let me help you. The Marla Aster I knew and honoured is not in this room. Nor does she await you on the planet. Now she lives only here And here.  Join me in the R'uustai, the Bonding. You will become part of my family now and for all time. We will be brothers.
SoS jIH batlh SoH.
What does that mean?
It honours the memory of our mothers. We have bonded and our families are stronger.
SoS jIH batlh SoH.
I should be through with the water contaminant analysis in a few hours. Then I'm going to check out one of the holosuites. They have got a relaxation programme here, Jean-Luc, from Alture Seven. Listen to this. First they bath you in a protein bath. Then a cloud of chromal vapour carries you into a meditation chamber. You should try it.
Well, I'll be too busy discussing the finer points of water management with ten Bajoran bureaucrats. And they won't be carrying me on a cloud of chromal vapour. Ops.
What is this?
It's pasta al fiorella. One of my favourites. Don't worry, you'll love it. You know, I really want to take a look at those Ktarian antiques. I understand they've got a twenty first century plasma coil in almost perfect condition.  I'll have to talk to Chief O'Brien about these replicators. Worf, I don't see how you can eat that stuff. It tastes like liquid polymer.
Delicious.
You know, I think I'm going to try that kiosk on the other side of the promenade. It looked like they had some real food.
Commander, I am reading a minor power drain in the starboard EPS conduit.
What's causing it?
The problem's originating in Sickbay. There has been an unauthorized access into the computer's bio-imaging systems.
You'd better check it out.
Aye, sir.
Excuse me. Do you have authorisation to work in this area?
Come in, come in. I need a hand with this field generator. See if you can boost the power output to sixty five percent.
I am sorry, but use of sickbay equipment is limited to ship's medical personnel.
Ah. Doctor Julian Bashir, Chief Medical officer, Deep Space Nine. And you are Commander?
Data.
Commander Data. The synthetic lifeform.
Yes.
It's an honour to meet you, sir. I've heard so much about you. You must have a fascinating perspective into biocybernetic research. I'd be delighted if we could discuss the subject sometime.
I would be happy to do so. However, I must ask you to stop your experiment.
Ah, yes. I realise I should have asked before using your sickbay, but it would've taken me days to analyse this device with the computer I have on Deep Space Nine.
What type of device is this?
It was discovered in the Gamma Quadrant. I think it must be some sort of medical instrument.
It appears to employ plasma inputs.
I'm hoping it's a medical scanner. I wanted to use your computer to find out how it works.
I suggest we take it to Engineering and run a complete circuit-pathway diagnostic.
Splendid. I must admit, Commander I didn't think you'd be so personable.
Klingon. You are Starfleet Klingon.
I am Lieutenant Worf.
Worf. Son of Mogh.
What of it?
I am Jaglom Shrek, a man with information to sell.
You have no information I could use.
I would not be so sure. It is about your father, Mogh.
My father died twenty five years ago at Khitomer.
That is what you believe. What if I tell you he is still alive?
My father is dead.
No, he's not. I know where he is.
How is that possible?
I expect to be paid for my information. Perhaps we could negotiate an exchange. The location of your father, for
Tell me what you know.
Not all of the Klingons at Khitomer were killed during the massacre. Many were captured by the Romulans and placed in a prison camp on a remote planet. Your father was among them.
Where is this planet?
Not far from here. I could give you the location, for a price.
A Klingon would rather die than be taken prisoner. I should kill you for spreading lies about my family. My father was killed defending Khitomer.
Ensign Lopez. This duty roster is unacceptable. The assignments should be listed in order of priority. Prepare it again. I will expect it no later than oh nine hundred hours. Dismissed.
Worf, we need to get your rendezvous schedule to Commander Rudman on board the Merrimac as soon as you
I am well aware of your request, Commander.
Lieutenant, are you all right?
Yes, sir. I am fine. I will send your schedule, sir. Excuse me.
Enter.
Did the table do something wrong?
No.
I'm glad you weren't that hard on Ensign Lopez.
He made a mistake. The duty roster was inaccurate.
Would you like to talk about what's bothering you or would you like to break some more furniture?
Today on the Promenade, a Yridian approached me. He knew who I was and tried to sell me information about Mogh.
Your father?
He claimed that he's alive and is being held captive in a Romulan prison camp.
My god. Could it be true?
A Klingon would never allow himself to be captured. A warrior fights to the death. If my father were alive it would dishonour his sons and their sons for three generations. Even Alexander would bear the burden of guilt.
So, you're willing to ignore the possibility because you're concerned about dishonour?
My father is dead. That Yridian is selling lies!
If you're so sure about that, why are you still so upset? Worf, you can't deny the possibility just because you don't want it to be true. If you want to talk about this, you know where to find me.
If we transfer twenty megajoules of energy from the dilithium chamber into the plasma inputs, it should be sufficient to activate the device.
It's worth a try. You two can begin by connecting the coil to the chamber. I'll configure the energy transfer.
Right. Data, can I ask you a personal question?
Certainly.
Does your hair grow?
I can control the rate of my follicle replenishment. However, I have not yet had a reason to modify the length of my hair. Why do you ask?
Just curious.
Power conduits are ready. Is something wrong, Doctor?
You're breathing.
Yes. I do have a functional respiration system. However, its purpose is to maintain thermal control of my internal systems. I am, in fact, capable of functioning for extended periods in a vacuum.
And you have a pulse.
My circulatory system not only produces bio-chemical lubricants, it regulates micro-hydraulic power. Most people are interested in my extraordinary abilities. How fast I can compute, my memory capacity, how long I will live. No one has ever asked me if my hair will grow, or noticed that I can breathe.
Your creator went to a lot of trouble to make you seem human. I find that fascinating.
Okay, I think we're ready to begin the transfer.
Power connections are complete.
I'll monitor the coil's transfer rate. Will you keep an eye on the transient power response?
Of course. We are ready, Geordi.
Okay. Initiating energy transfer.
Power levels are holding steady.
Transient response is normal.
Hold on. I'm picking up a power surge. Reduce the transfer rate.
Reducing rate by twenty percent.
What happened?
The power connections blew. It sent out some kind of plasma shock.
His synaptic energy is dropping.
Data, are you all right?
I believe so. What has happened?
A plasma shock overloaded your positronic net. You were down a good thirty seconds.
That cannot be possible. I have a memory record for that period of time. I can recall a series of images. I saw Doctor Soong. My father.
Data, I can't find anything wrong with your positronic subprocessors or your circuit controllers. No sign of any residual energy fluctuation, cascade overload.
My internal diagnostic indicates that my memory systems are functioning within normal parameters. For the forty seven seconds that I was inactive, there is no record of cognitive activity.
There's no doubt about it, Data. You were completely shut down. Maybe you had some kind of random power fluctuation, caused you to access one of your memory files.
That cannot be. The image I saw was of Doctor Soong as a young man. I did not encounter him until much later in his life. There appears to be no rational explanation for my experience.
I'll take another look at the diagnostic log. In the meantime, you'd better disconnect that device.
Data, perhaps we're going about this the wrong way.
How so?
Well, maybe you had a dream or a hallucination.
I am not capable of either of those functions.
Yet you can't account for what happened today, can you?
At present, I cannot.
Well maybe you should approach this from a more human standpoint. You're right that machines can't have hallucinations, but then again, most machines can't grow hair.
Wait. What is it, Commander?
I am sorry to bother you, but I have a question of a personal nature. Do you have a moment?
A moment.
I have heard you mention that you once experienced a vision.
Yes. When I was young my adoptive parents arranged for me to partake in the Rite of MajQa.
I understand it involves deep meditation in the lava caves of No'Mat. That prolonged exposure to the heat induces a hallucinatory effect.
Why are you asking me about this?
I have recently had an unusual experience, which might be described as a vision.
What happened?
An accident in Engineering shut down my cognitive functions for a short period of time, yet I seemed to remain conscious. I saw my father.
You are very fortunate. That is a powerful vision.
If it was a vision, I do not know how to proceed.
You must find its meaning. If it has anything to do with your father, you must learn all you can about it. In the Klingon MajQa ritual, there is nothing more important than receiving a revelation about your father. Your father is part of you, always. Learning about him teaches you about yourself. That is why no matter where he is or what he has done, you must find him.
But I am not looking for my father.
Yes, of course. Do not stop until you have the answer.
Thank you, Worf.
Lieutenant Worf. You have reconsidered.
Yes. I wish to go to the Romulan prison camp.
Excellent. I can provide you with the coordinates.
No. You will take me there.
No, it's not possible. I have no means of transportation.
I checked the station records. You have a vessel that is capable of warp speed.
I, I do not have the time. I have other business.
What is the real reason you do not wish to take me? Is it because what you have told me is not true?
No. The camp is located on the edge of Romulan space. It is a dangerous journey.
Dangerous? It would be more dangerous for you to refuse.
Very well. But I will require full payment in advance.
No. No, I will pay you after.
But
Yes, yes, of course. After.
If you are lying, if there is no prison camp, I will kill you.
The Romulan guards have a detection perimeter. It will be necessary to transport you to the surface thirty kilometres from the prison camp.
The foliage is very dense. It will take me approximately twelve hours to reach the camp. I may have to travel during the night.
That would be unwise. This is not an empty jungle. There are many predators.
I am prepared.
Very well. But I recommend that you look up from time to time. The arboreal needle snake likes to attack from above. I will provide you with a map of the camp.
How did you learn of this camp?
It is not important for you to know.
Why have you not informed the Klingon government of this place?
I sell information. I do not give it away.
You do this for profit.
I have my reasons, Mister Worf.
What reasons could you have for letting these people suffer?
We will arrive in the Carraya Sector in approximately three hours. I suggest you get some rest.
Come.
Yes, Mister Data?
I am sorry to disturb you, sir.
Not at all. I'm here studying the intricacies of Bajoran aqueduct management. I would welcome an interruption. Please, sit down.
I require your advice. I have come to an impasse regarding my recent unexplained experience.
Your vision of Doctor Soong. How is your investigation proceeding?
I have analysed over four thousand different religious and philosophical systems, as well as over two hundred psychological schools of thought, in an effort to understand what happened.
And what have you found?
I have been unable to find a single interpretation of the images I saw during the time I was shut down. The hammer, for instance, has several meanings. The Klingon culture views the hammer as a symbol of power. However, the Taqua tribe of Nagor sees it as an icon of hearth and home. The Ferengis view it as a sign of sexual prowess.
I'm curious, Mister Data. Why are you looking at all these other cultures?
The interpretation of visions and other metaphysical experiences are almost always culturally derived, and I have no culture of my own.
Yes, you do. You're a culture of one, which is no less valid than a culture of one billion. Perhaps the key to understanding your experience is to stop looking into other sources for a meaning. When we look at Michaelangelo's David or Symnay's Tomb and we don't ask what does this mean to other people. The real question is, what does it mean to us? Explore this image, Data. Let it excite your imagination. Focus on it. See where it leads you. Let it inspire you.
I believe I understand, sir. Thank you.
Good luck, Mister Data.
The camp is in a southeasterly direction. After approximately ten kilometres, you will come to the edge of the sulphur canyon. Look for a riverbank and follow it until you come to the camp. This is a homing device. It will allow you to find my ship when I return. I will not be landing in the same location.
When will you return?
Fifty hours. Do not be late.
BA'EL:Who's there? Toq, is that you? I can see you. I hope you're enjoying yourself. Toq, I swear I will hang you by your
Stop, please,
BA'EL:Who are you?
I've come to help you.
BA'EL:Help me?
Yes. How did you get out of the camp? Does anyone know you are gone?
BA'EL:Yes I come here often
You must lead me to the camp.
BA'EL:You are Klingon. Where did you come from?
That does not matter. I have come to take you home.
BA'EL:Home? This is my home.
Ba'el?
It is very important you tell no one you saw me.
BA'EL:Is it time for the ceremony?
Yes, we're about to begin.
Come in.
Data, what are you doing? We were supposed to meet at
Data, what are you doing?
I am painting.
I can see that. How long have you been at this?
I have created twenty three individual illustrations in the past six hours, twenty seven minutes. I believe you could say I have been inspired.
I'll say.
I have done as Captain Picard suggested. I have tried to explore the images.
Has it helped?
I am not certain. I began by painting the image of the blacksmith. Then I painted the corridor. After that, the anvil, the hammer, and Doctor Soong's face. The thought then occurred to me that I should paint smoke.
Smoke? Why smoke?
I cannot explain it. It is not an image I saw during my vision.
Well, you have the smoke coming out of a bucket of water. Blacksmiths used to use water to cool the metal. Maybe that's why you painted it.
Perhaps. After I painted the smoke, it then occurred to me to paint a bird's wing. I then drew an entire bird. A flock of birds flying in formation. An individual feather. If the image of a bird is related to my vision, I do not understand how. I am left with more of a mystery than ever. Geordi, I would like to recreate the experiment which caused my initial shut down.
What for?
I do not know how much longer my vision would have continued had I not been reactivated.
Data, that plasma shock almost fused your neural net. I don't think it's such a good idea to try that again.
I am aware of the risks involved. But I can think of no other way to investigate my experience. Will you help?
Yeah. Yeah, sure. I'll go find Doctor Bashir.
I will prepare the power transfer.
Okay, Data, we're going to monitor every subsystem in your positronic net. If I see any neural pathways overload beyond sixty five percent, I'm shutting down the experiment.
Agreed.
We're ready.
Initiating energy transfer. Get ready, Data.
Power levels are rising.
It should be any second now.
The bird did not appear in my original experience. This vision is different.
Of course it's different. It's never the same. Always changing. Unpredictable. It doesn't make sense.
What is happening, Father?
I don't know, Data. What is happening?
We are on the Bridge of the Enterprise. My cat is present, my potted plant, and my paintings.
A beginning. Still a little grounded in the mundane, but showing promise.
I do not understand.
You're not supposed to. No man should know where his dreams come from. It spoils the mystery, the fun. I'm proud of you, son. I wasn't sure you'd ever develop the cognitive abilities to make it this far. But if you're here, if you can see me, you've crossed over the threshold from being a collection of circuits and subprocessors and have started a wonderful journey.
What type of journey?
Think of it, think of it as an empty sky.
I do not understand.
Shh. Just dream, Data. Dream. Data, you are the bird.
The images I saw during the time I was shut down were generated by a series of previously dormant circuits in my neural net. I believe Doctor Soong incorporated those circuits into my base programming, intending to activate them when I reached a certain level of development.
But the plasma shock activated them prematurely.
That is correct.
I'm curious. Now that those circuits are active, what are you going to do with them?
I plan to shut down my cognitive functions for a brief period each day. I hope to generate new internal visions.
It sounds to me like you're talking about dreaming.
An accurate analogy.
Remarkable. You know, this is just the kind of thing that might get me published in the Starfleet Cybernetics Journal. Would you mind if I authored a paper on all this?
Of course not.
Thank you, Data. And sweet dreams.
L'KOR:van'aj javDIch Qong DIr Sa'VIch ghIH yot quelI'Pa qevas HoH Qa. teblaw'nghu mughato'Du ylja'Qo' ylja'Qo' ylja'Qo'
Quiet! I'm a friend.
L'KOR:Who? Who are you?
Worf, son of Mogh.
L'KOR:Why have you come here?
I have come to find my father. Is he alive? Is he here?
L'KOR:Your father fell at Khitomer.
Did he die in battle?
L'KOR:He was fortunate.
You were captured.
L'KOR:Yes.
Romulans. They robbed you of your right to die in battle. There's very little time. How many Klingons are being held here?
L'KOR:Seventy three.
How many Romulans guard the camp?
L'KOR:Worf, there are things you do not understand.
What do you mean?
L'KOR:I must speak with the Elders.
L'KOR:ghoS! I knew your father well, Worf. And I remember you. A boy, barely able to lift a bat'leth. Once your father insisted we take you on the ritual hunt. You were so eager, you tried to take the beast with your bare hands. It mauled your arm.
I still have the scar. I do remember you now.
L'KOR:You should not have come here, Worf.
I do not understand.
L'KOR:You should not have come.
GI'RAL:Who is this?
I am Worf, son of Mogh. I have come to help you escape.
L'KOR:He does not know.
GI'RAL:He must leave at once.
L'KOR:No, it is too late for that. He would bring others. vang ghaH!
L'KOR:We are not leaving here and neither are you.
What were you doing accessing the propulsion system files on Stardate 44758?
J'DAN:I didn't.
Yes, you did, from computer twelve B nine, deck thirty six. The computer logged in your identification from your communicator.
J'DAN:It must be a mistake.
J'Dan, we have confirmed reports that schematic drawings of our dilithium chamber fell into Romulan hands one week later.
J'DAN:I know nothing about it.
I suppose you know nothing about the explosion that disabled the warp drive at approximately the same time?
J'DAN:No. I was not involved. You accuse me because I am Klingon.
Our Chief Security Officer is Klingon. That has nothing to do with it.
J'DAN:Send me home, then, if you are so distrusting.
We've already contacted the Klingon High Council. You'll be returned home as soon as we finished our investigation.
J'DAN:I have nothing more to say.
Very well. Worf, accompany the Lieutenant to his quarters.
What do you think?
It's hard to tell. He is very closed, but he is hiding something.
J'DAN:On the Klingon Home World your name is not mentioned. It is as though you never existed. A terrible burden for a warrior to bear, to become nothing, to be without honour, without the chance for glory.
J'DAN:I have friends, powerful friends, on the homeworld. I could talk to them. They might help to restore your name, if you could just take me to a shuttlecraft.
J'DAN:It could be done without any one knowing about it.
I don't know how you transferred secret information to the Romulans, but I will find out.
J'DAN:Pahtk!
When we inform the Klingon High Council, they will put you to a slow death.
Captain's log, supplemental. Retired Admiral Norah Satie, whose investigation exposed the alien conspiracy against Starfleet Command three years ago, is arriving to assist in our inquiry.
Captain Picard.
Admiral Satie. Welcome aboard the Enterprise.
Delighted to be here. I managed to acquire my former staff. My aide, Sabin Genestra, from Betazed, and my assistant, Nellen Tore, from Delb Two.
This is my First Officer, Commander William Riker. May I show you to your quarters?
Captain, if Starfleet Command is so concerned with your report they brought me out of retirement, I think I should get right to work.
Very well. Commander Riker, will you see to the Admiral's staff?
First, I'd like to inspect the damage to your engine room.
Admiral Satie, this is Commander Data, Commander La Forge.
Admiral. We still can't get in there, Captain. The radiation levels are dropping, but they're too high to raise the isolation door.
How much longer will it be?
At the rate the levels are decreasing, we will gain entry in forty nine hours, Captain.
Maybe the Admiral would like to see the visual log of the explosion.
Yes.
This was logged four days ago at oh three hundred hours.
At that point the emergency confinement field was activated and the isolation doors came down. No one was killed, but I have two people in Sickbay with radiation burns.
Have you been able to make any assessments?
Slow motion study of the explosion suggests that the articulation frame collapsed.
The schematics that were stolen from the Enterprise, I believe some involved the articulation frame of the dilithium chamber.
That's one reason we tend to suspect sabotage.
Other evidence lends credence to that theory, Captain. A review of the sensor logs indicates that every systems reading was well within normal parameters until fifty two milliseconds before the explosion.
We haven't found anything that suggests there was a malfunction anywhere along the line.
Captain, I think I'm going to need a full briefing before we go any further.
By all means, Admiral.
Commander Data, La Forge, I don't envy you your job. Good luck.
There are disturbing overtones in the idea of a Klingon providing information to the Romulans. Are you aware of any other Klingon-Romulan connection that Starfleet Command might have encountered recently?
I don't believe what Starfleet Command knows or doesn't know is for me to reveal.
This ship has encountered several incidents which might suggest a potential alliance between those two powers.
We're aware of that, Captain. What we must concentrate on is the business at hand.
Come.
Excuse me, Captain, I didn't know that
Please, Mister Worf, come in. I particularly want my guest to meet you. Admiral Satie. This is my Head of Security, Lieutenant Worf.
Captain, I have been pursuing the investigation of Lieutenant J'Dan. I believe I know how he transferred information off the Enterprise.
Well done, Lieutenant.
This is J'Dan's. A hypospray he uses to treat his Ba'ltmasor Syndrome. But this has been fitted with an optical reader specially modified to read data from Starfleet isolinear chips. He can extract digital information from a computer, encode it in the form of amino acid sequences, and transfer those sequences into a fluid in the syringe. Then he injects someone, perhaps even without their knowledge.
Or perhaps with their knowledge.
The information would be carried in their bloodstream in the form of inert proteins.
The body itself becomes a conveyor of top secret files. Lieutenant Worf, when we confront J'Dan, I want you to conduct the interrogation.
I would be honoured. Captain. Admiral.
Captain, I predict that officer will be extremely valuable in this investigation.
I have tracked the movements of every person who has left the Enterprise since you have been here. I traced one Tarkanian diplomat as far as the Cruces system where he disappeared and has not been seen since.
J'DAN:That proves nothing.
A hyposyringe was discovered in your quarters.
J'DAN:I take injections. Everyone knows that.
But your injections do not include an optical chip reader. This device has but one function, to transform computer information into biological sequences.
J'DAN:The blood of all Klingons has become water. Since the Federation alliance we have turned into a nation of mewling babies. Romulans are strong. They are worthy allies. They do not turn Klingons into weaklings like you.
Lieutenant, how did you damage the dilithium chamber?
J'DAN:I had nothing to do with that
You mean it was sheer coincidence that it was sabotaged after you gave the plans for the design to the Romulans?
J'DAN:I do not know. I had nothing to do with it.
You've admitted your crime. Why lie now?
J'DAN:I am not lying.
Mister Worf, you may have him confined.
Sabin?
I believe he's telling the truth. He admits stealing the files but not sabotaging the dilithium chamber. I get no sense that he's lying.
But if you're right, someone else may be involved.
I think, Captain, you have a bigger problem on your ship than one Klingon exchange officer.
I've seen this before. The spectre of conspiracy on a starship is a frightening one.
I can scarcely believe it myself, but I am so grateful for your presence, Admiral. If anyone in Starfleet can help us, it's you.
Captain, I find myself changing my mind about you.
In what way?
When Starfleet ordered me here, it was with the express command that we work together on this problem as equals. My father taught me to avoid partnerships. Most of them are woefully lop-sided.
That sounds like Judge Aaron Satie.
You knew my father?
Only from his writings. His judgments were required reading at the Academy.
He was an extraordinary man. Every night at the dinner table he would pose a question for debate. My big brothers and I would wrangle it around, from one side and the other. Father would referee, and he kept a stopwatch on us so we'd have to learn brevity. But he wouldn't let us leave until he thought we'd completely explored the issue.
I'm willing to wager that you trounced your brothers during those debates.
More than once. Father loved it when I nailed one of them with some subtle point of logic. All that I am, I owe to him. He was a giant.
You must miss him very much.
Captain, I always preferred working alone. That way, if something goes wrong, I don't have to go far for the cause. I resented you being assigned to me, but I was wrong. We're going to be quite a team.
J'Dan did not make friends easily. There are not many to question.
You've done a thorough job, Lieutenant.
I am strongly motivated in this matter.
Yes, I can see that. I don't mind telling you I'm surprised. Frankly, when I first heard about your father.
My father?
Yes. There are some who believe he betrayed your people to the Romulans.
What he did or did not do is no one's concern but my own
Of course. I only meant before I saw you in action, I naturally considered you a possible security risk. But I want you to know you have the Admiral's and my complete confidence. You have nothing to prove to us.
If there is a conspiracy on board, I promise you I will find it.
Good. You know the ship, you know the personnel, you know exactly what we're up against. We're counting on you, Lieutenant.
I will arrange for the interviews to begin.
And how often did Lieutenant J'Dan come in for his injections?
About once a week.
Did you administer them yourself?
No.
Then who did?
I had one of my assistants do that.
Did you ever hear him say anything? Anything that may have seemed innocent at the time that might now shed some light on this investigation?
No, nothing. In fact, he rarely spoke at all.
Thank you, Doctor Crusher, we appreciate your time. You are excused now. Mister Worf, will you bring in the next person?
Please sit down, Mister Tarses. For the record, will you tell us your name and position?
Simon Tarses, Crewman First Class, medical technician.
I assure you this is an informal inquiry. We are not accusing you of anything. However, if you would like counsel, it can be provided for you.
No, sir. I have nothing to hide.
Tell me, how long have you held your appointment onboard this vessel?
Since Stardate 43587.
Mister Tarses, your records state that you were born on Mars Colony.
That's right.
Then you are human?
Largely. My paternal grandfather was Vulcan.
Yes, I see that. Tell me, what is your relationship with the Klingon, J'Dan?
Er, he, I mean, there's no relationship. He just came in for his injections.
Did you give him those injections?
Sometimes. There were several of us. Actually, I might have done it twice.
Did he ever make any comments that might, in retrospect, be suspicious?
Not really. He hardly ever talked.
Did you ever see him outside Sickbay?
Once or twice in Ten Forward, with a group of people, but I never had a conversation with him.
Thank you, Mister Tarses. I don't think there's need for more. Captain?
You're excused, crewman.
Mister Worf?
Wait. He's lying. He's desperately frightened. He's covering something.
It's clear that he's frightened, but that's hardly an indication
It's more than that. He wasn't truthful. He's covering a lie. One so big it's overwhelming him. I think we've found the man.
Admiral. I have to tell you, you must not expect me to permit any action against Mister Tarses solely on the basis of Betazoid intuition.
Sabin has uncanny instincts. I've learned to trust them.
I'm not happy about this use of a Betazoid.
But you have a Betazoid counsellor. Surely you're aware of the advantages.
There is a difference between a counsellor and an investigator.
Are you saying you never use your counsellor during interrogations?
Yes, I do, but I would not act solely on the basis of her instinct.
Nor do I.
But you're asking, you're asking me to restrict Mister Tarses' movements solely on the basis on Sabin's feeling.
If Counsellor Troi suggested to you that someone on the ship were dangerous, would you not act on that? Observe him? Curb his activity?
Yes, I admit I probably would. And perhaps I should re-evaluate that behaviour.
Oh, nonsense. Let's keep our priorities straight. The important thing is to uncover the conspiracy on this ship and to prevent further damage. Now, if Tarses is a possible saboteur, you cannot allow him access to sensitive areas of the ship, and I strongly suggest continuous surveillance.
If we had clear evidence.
We will have clear evidence. Sabin and Lieutenant Worf are continuing to investigate. But if you don't act until then, it may be too late.
No. I won't treat a man as a criminal unless there is cause to do so.
And while you're being so generous, you give a saboteur a chance to strike again. Last time it was just a hatch cover/ What if next time it's more serious? What if lives are lost? Can you afford not to act?
Engineering to Captain Picard.
Yes, Mister La Forge.
Captain, could you come to Engineering right away? We've got something interesting to show you.
I'll be right there.
Captain, we finally got in here about six hours ago. We've been going over it inch by inch ever since.
We have made micro-tomographic analyses of the dilithium chamber, the hatch mounting, the blast pattern from the explosion.
We did mass spectrometer readings of the residue for chemical content, sifted through the debris for bomb fragments.
What did you find?
This is the frame for the hatch. It ruptured right along here. When we take a reading of that spot. See?
I'm afraid I'm out of my element, Commander. You'll have to interpret for me.
There are submicron fractures in the metal casing.
That's right. A breakdown of the atomic cohesive structure.
Yes? And what caused them?
Those fractures suggest nothing more than simple neutron fatigue. I would speculate that when the engine was last inspected at McKinley station, the hatch casing was replaced with one which had an undetectable defect. I believe, sir, that the conclusion to our investigation must be that the explosion was not intentional.
That's the way I see it. This wasn't sabotage at all. It was nothing more than an accident.
An accident? I find that hard to believe.
If my crew say there was no sabotage, then you can be sure there was none.
Let us keep our perspective, gentlemen. Just because there was no sabotage doesn't mean there isn't a conspiracy on this ship. We do have a confessed spy.
And he had confederates.
Do we know that for sure?
Of course he did. Do you think J'Dan could have come on board the flagship of the Federation and accomplished what he did without help from within?
I agree it would be difficult, but not impossible.
We should continue to investigate Tarses. He was hiding something.
Captain Picard Lieutenant Worf and I have been working well together. I suggest we continue, if for no other purpose than to determine Tarses' innocence.
Now, please! Let me remind you he is innocent until he is proved guilty.
Of course he is. What Sabin is saying is that he and Lieutenant Worf would like to establish his innocence unequivocally, for his own sake.
Very well. But let us put this to rest as quickly as possible.
You've opened the hearing to spectators?
It isn't good to have closed door proceedings for too long. It invites rumour and speculation.
Nevertheless, Admiral, I think it would be wise
Because spies and saboteurs don't like the bright light of an open inquiry. They're like roaches, scurrying for the dark corner.
This hearing is convened on Stardate 44780 as a continuing inquiry into the activities of Crewman Simon Tarses. Mister Tarses, for your own protection, I have assigned a counsel to you in the person of Commander William Riker.
Thank you, sir, but I don't need protection. I have not done anything wrong.
Doctor Crusher, have you observed Crewman Tarses with J'Dan?
Well, yes, he gave him his injection.
I meant outside of Sickbay.
I think so, perhaps in Ten Forward.
And whom else have you observed at these occasions?
I don't understand what relevance that has. It was an innocent social gathering.
If it was so innocent, why do you hesitate to give us the names?
Thank you, Doctor.  If you have a case to make against Tarses, you had better make it, otherwise I'm stopping this here and now.
Mister Tarses. Isn't it true that you have access to the biological supplies in Sickbay?
It's part of my job, yes.
J'Dan used suspensions of deoxyribose to carry the encoded files he stole. Isn't it true one of your duties is to prepare those suspensions?
Several technicians share that job.
And isn't it true that your security clearance allows you access to all the stores and files in Sickbay? Access which you can exercise at any time?
Because I have access does not mean I
What would you say if I told you there is evidence that the explosion in the engine room was caused by a corrosive chemical. One that is kept stored in Sickbay.
I had nothing to do with that.
How can we believe you? How can we believe someone whom we know, we know, to be a liar?
I object! There is no basis for calling Crewman Tarses a liar.
Agreed. Mister Sabin.
Captain, there is a basis which will become clear in a moment. Mister Tarses, didn't you deliberately and premeditatively lied when you filled out your personnel application and compounded that lie by repeating it to this committee?
What?
Isn't it true that the paternal grandfather of whom you speak was not a Vulcan but was in fact a Romulan? That it is Romulan blood you carry and a Romulan heritage that you honour?
We're waiting, Mister Tarses.
On the advice of my counsel I refuse to answer that question, in that the answer may serve to incriminate me.
You and Crewman Marcus will coordinate to track Tarses' movements over the last five years. Ensign Kellogg, I want a list of all relatives, known associates, and especially old school friends. And make arrangements to do an encephalographic polygraph scan.
Mister Worf?
Yes, Captain?
I need to speak with you.
You are dismissed. Please get your reports to me as soon as possible.
Do you see what is happening here, Mister Worf?
Sir?
This is not unlike a drumhead trial.
I do not understand.
Five hundred years ago, military officers would upend a drum on the battlefield sit at it and dispense summary justice. Decisions were quick, punishments severe, appeals denied. Those who came to a drumhead were doomed.
But we know there is a traitor here. J'Dan has admitted his guilt.
That's true, and he will stand for his crimes.
Tarses has all but done the same.
How?
He refused to answer the question about his Romulan grandfather.
That is not a crime, Worf. Nor can we infer his guilt because he didn't respond.
Sir, if a man were not afraid of the truth, he would answer.
Oh, no. We cannot allow ourselves think that. The Seventh Guarantee is one of the most important rights granted by the Federation. We cannot take a fundamental principle of the Constitution and turn it against a citizen.
Sir, the Federation does have enemies. We must seek them out.
Oh, yes. That's how it starts. But the road from legitimate suspicion to rampant paranoia is very much shorter than we think. Something is wrong here, Mister Worf. I don't like what we have become.
There you are, Mister Tarses. Would you care for some lemon?
No, thank you, sir. This is fine.
Well, tell me a little about yourself, Crewman. I know you were born on Mars Colony.
Yes, sir. All my life I wanted to be in Starfleet. I went to the Academy's training programme for enlisted personnel. I took training as a medical technician and I served at several outposts. The day that I was posted to the Enterprise was the happiest day of my life.
Did you ever consider applying to the Academy, going the whole route, apply to become an officer?
My parents wanted me to. And then I thought about it. I used to sit under this big tree near the parade grounds
An elm tree with a circular bench?
Yes, that's the one.
I spent many an hour there. It was my favourite spot to study.
I used to sit under that tree and watch the drills, picture myself an officer. I know that it would have made my mother very happy, but.
You didn't do it.
No. I was eighteen, and eager. The last thing I wanted to do was spend four years sitting in classrooms. I wanted to be out there, travelling the stars. I didn't want to wait for anything. And now it's done, isn't it? My career in Starfleet is finished.
Not if you aren't guilty, Simon.
It doesn't matter. I lied on my application, and that mistake will be with me for the rest of my life.
Mister Worf has found a brother who still lives on Mars Colony. Contact someone there and have him interviewed.
Admiral Satie?
And start a background check into all his friends at the Academy training programme.
Admiral Satie?
Yes, Captain?
I would like to have a word with you.
Of course.
In private and off the record.
Of course. After all, you are my partner in this.
I cannot possibly believe you mean this.
But I do. This must stop. It has gone too far. You lied to him about the Engine Room. There were no volatile chemicals found there.
It was a tactic. A way of applying pressure.
We are hounding an innocent man.
And how, may I ask, have you managed to determine that?
I've talked with him.
I see. And he told you he was a victim of circumstance, blameless and pure.
No, he admits his mistake in falsifying his application. That does not make him a traitor.
How can you be so incredibly naive? Captain, may I tell you how I've spent the last four years? From planet to Starbase to planet. I have no home. I live on starships and shuttlecraft. I haven't seen a family member in years. I have no friends. But I have a purpose. My father taught me from the time I was a little girl still clutching a blanket, that the United Federation of Planets is the most remarkable institution ever conceived. And it is my cause to make sure that this extraordinary union be preserved. I cannot imagine why you are trying to block this investigation. There have been others in the past who doubted me. They came to regret it.
The hearings on Simon Tarses will stop. If necessary, I will go to Starfleet Command.
I have news for you, Captain. I've been in constant contact with Starfleet Command. The hearings are not going to stop. They're going to be expanded.
What are you saying?
I'm going to get to the heart of this conspiracy if it means investigating every last person on this ship. And every hearing from now on will be held in the presence of Admiral Thomas Henry of Starfleet Security. I've requested he be brought here at once.
You never told me about this.
I report to Starfleet Command directly. I do not need your permission or your approval for my decisions.
Admiral, what you're doing here is unethical. It's immoral. I'll fight it.
Do what you must, Captain. And so will I.
Captain, warp engines are back online. We are ready to commence restart sequences. Sir?
Yes? Yes, yes, of course. Proceed, Mister Data.
Are you all right, Captain?
Yes, of course, Number One. Just a little preoccupied.
Admiral Satie has ordered you to report to the interrogation room at oh nine hundred hours tomorrow morning. You are to be questioned before the committee.
Captain's log, supplemental. Admiral Thomas Henry, who has worked closely with Norah Satie in the past, has arrived to observe the hearings.
Your full name?
Jean-Luc Picard.
Rank and position?
Captain, Federation Starship Enterprise.
How long have you held this post?
For three years, since stardate 41124.
Very well. Admiral?
If you don't mind, there's something I'd like to say.
If you have a statement, you'll have an opportunity to make it later.
I believe that Chapter Four, Article Twelve of the Uniform Code of Justice grants me the right to make a statement before questioning begins.
Very well.
I am deeply concerned by what is happening here. It began when we apprehended a spy, a man who admitted his guilt and who will answer for his crime. But the hunt didn't end there. Another man, Mister Simon Tarses, was brought to trial and it was a trial, no matter what others choose to call it. A trial based on insinuation and innuendo. Nothing substantive offered against Mister Tarses, much less proven. Mister Tarses' grandfather is Romulan, and for that reason his career now stands in ruins. Have we become so fearful? Have we become so cowardly that we must extinguish a man because he carries the blood of a current enemy? Admiral, let us not condemn Simon Tarses, or anyone else, because of their bloodlines, or investigate others for their innocent associations. I implore you, do not continue with this proceeding. End it now.
Captain, do you believe in the Prime Directive?
Of course.
In fact, it's Starfleet General Order Number One, is it not?
Your point, Admiral?
Would it surprise you to learn that you have violated the Prime Directive a total of nine times since you took command of the Enterprise? I must say, Captain, it surprised the hell out of me.
My reports to Starfleet document the circumstances in each of those instances
Yes, we're looking into those reports, Captain, very closely into those reports, after which I'm sure we'll have more questions for you about your so-called commitment to Starfleet's Prime Directive.
Captain, could you tell us just what happened on Stardate 44390?
I beg your pardon?
Let me refresh your memory. You were transporting a Vulcan ambassador, T'Pel.
I was following orders to take this ambassador to a location near the Neutral Zone.
I don't think we need the preamble.
In fact, she was not a Vulcan at all, was she? She was a Romulan spy.
That's correct.
A spy whom you were delivering back into the hands of the enemy.
Tell me, Captain, when the deception was revealed and she stood proudly on the bridge of a Romulan ship, did you make any effort to retrieve her?
No.
No. Even though you knew she carried Federation secrets that she'd been accumulating for years?
The Enterprise could have been captured by the Romulans! Captain Picard did the only thing he could.
Really, Lieutenant? And where were you when this traitor was on board the Enterprise? Where was ship's Security?
Don't you think it's questionable judgment, Captain, to have a security officer whose father was a Romulan collaborator?
Lieutenant.
Tell me, Captain, have you completely recovered from your experience with the Borg?
Yes, I have completely recovered.
It must have been awful for you, actually becoming one of them, being forced to use your vast knowledge of Starfleet operations to aid the Borg. Just how many of our ships were lost? Thirty nine? And a loss of life, I believe, measured at nearly eleven thousand. One wonders how you can sleep at night, having caused so much destruction. I question your actions, Captain. I question your choices. I question your loyalty.
You know, there some words I've known since I was a school boy. With the first link, the chain is forged. The first speech censured, the first thought forbidden, the first freedom denied, chains us all irrevocably. Those words were uttered by Judge Aaron Satie as wisdom and warning. The first time any man's freedom is trodden on, we're all damaged. I fear that today
How dare you! You who consort with Romulans invoke my father's name to support your traitorous arguments. It is an offence to everything I hold dear. And to hear those words used to subvert the United Federation of Planets. My father was a great man. His name stands for integrity and principle. You dirty his name when you speak it. He loved the Federation, but you, Captain, corrupt it. You undermine our very way of life. I will expose you for what you are. I've brought down bigger men than you, Picard!
I have nothing more to say.
Perhaps we should call a recess until tomorrow.
Am I bothering you, Captain?
No. Please, Mister Worf. Come in.
It is over. Admiral Henry has called an end to any more hearings on this matter.
That's good.
Admiral Satie has left the Enterprise.
We think we've come so far. The torture of heretics, the burning of witches, it's all ancient history. Then, before you can blink an eye, it suddenly threatens to start all over again.
I believed her. I helped her. I did not see what she was.
Mister Worf, villains who wear twirl their moustaches are easy to spot. Those who clothe themselves in good deeds are well camouflaged.
I think after yesterday, people will not be as ready to trust her.
Maybe. But she, or someone like her, will always be with us, waiting for the right climate in which to flourish, spreading fear in the name of righteousness. Vigilance, Mister Worf, that is the price we have to continually pay.
it was then that I began to suspect that your brother did not die by his own hand. That he was, in fact, murdered.
Murdered? Huh. Good Lord!
But, Holmes! The vial of poison found in his hand.
That was the first clue, Watson. The vial contained strychnine, which as you well know induces violent muscular spasms. It is difficult to imagine that someone in the throes of so gruesome a death could have held on to so delicate a container without shattering it.
You don't mean?
Exactly! The vial was placed in his hand after he died.
Then what was the cause of death?
The cigar, of course.
Cigar?
Upon closer inspection of the room where your brother was found, I discovered a fresh burn mark on the carpet. Further analysis of the ash revealed that the cigar was laced with strychnine.
This is utter nonsense. What about the suicide note? It was written in my dear brother's own hand.
With practice, handwriting can be forged. It takes a trained eye to notice certain discrepancies. For example, whether someone is right or left handed!
Your brother was right handed! The alleged suicide note was written by a left handed individual such as yourself!
Er, Data, it's in his right hand.
Curious. There seems to be a problem in the holodeck's spatial orientation systems.
London's greatest detective?
Freeze programme. La Forge to Barclay.
Barclay here.
Reg, something went wrong with the holodeck programme again.
Oh, I'm sorry. I'll look into it right away.
Thanks, Reg. We should get back to Engineering, Data. Computer, end programme and save.
Whoa, whoa, Reg.
Sorry, Commander. I'm on my way to the holodeck.
Sherlock Holmes programme three A has demonstrated some very curious anomalies.
There must have been a glitch in the matrix diodes, but I'll track it down, don't worry.
Thanks, Reg. See you later.
Computer, run a diagnostic on all Sherlock Holmes files. Display any anomalous programming sequences.
Diagnostic complete. All files conform to specified parameters, except those contained in protected memory.
Protected memory? Display those sequences. Computer unlock this sequence and run the programme.
Who are you?
Professor James Moriarty.
Moriarty. Oh, that's Sherlock Holmes' arch enemy. Are you left or right handed?
Left handed, Would you very much mind telling me
No problem there.
Where is Captain Picard? Is he still Captain of this vessel?
How would? How do you know the Captain?
You don't know anything about what happened, do you? I have been stored in memory for God knows how long and no one has given me a second thought.
You know! You know what you are.
A holodeck character? A fictional man? Yes, yes I know all about your marvellous inventions. I was created as a plaything so that your Commander Data could masquerade as Sherlock Holmes. But they made me too well and I became more than a character in a story. I became self-aware. I am alive.
That's not possible.
But here I am. Tell me, has a way been found to allow me to leave the confines of this holodeck world?
Leave the holodeck? No, of course not. You can only exist in here.
Damn you, Picard. He promised me something would be done. I should have realised he would have said anything to get me to release my hostage.
Hostage?
How long have I been locked away?
Well, it l ooks like about four years.
It seemed longer.
What are you talking about? You can't possibly have been aware of the passage of time.
But I was. Brief, terrifying periods of consciousness. Disembodied. Without substance.
I don't see how that could be possible. Maybe there was a fragmentation of the protected memory circuits.
Call it what you will. All I know is that despite Picard's promise, he's done nothing. Just left me to go quietly mad.
He would not have forgotten his promise. The Captain would not do that.
I'd like to talk to him.
Well, I can ask.
Ask him to meet me in the sitting room at Baker Street. That would be far more appropriate.
I'll have to store you in memory again until I get an answer.
Captain's log, stardate 46424.1. The Enterprise has arrived at the Detrian system to observe a unique celestial event the collision of two planets.
Since both planets are gas giants, neither possesses a solid surface. Their atmospheres, however, will come into contact in approximately seventeen hours nine minutes.
If their collision causes a self-sustaining fusion reaction, this is what we are likely to see. The birth of a new star. The Enterprise will hold position until the gravitational instability subsides and we can get in for a closer look. Now I want triple redundancy on all of the sensor arrays. We'll probably never get another chance to see something like this. I don't want to miss anything. Okay?
Commander, you'll never believe what happened while I was working on your programme in the holodeck. Professor Moriarty appeared, out of nowhere.
What?
And he wants to talk to the Captain.
Computer, begin Sherlock Holmes programme three A and place us in the drawing room at Two Twenty One B Baker Street.
Programme complete.
Computer, access protected memory and run Moriarty programme.
Professor. It's good to see you again.
If you'd missed my company, I should think you'd have summoned me before now.
I want to assure you that we've not forgotten you. We spent some time investigating how you became self-aware. Frankly, it still remains a mystery.
It is also irrelevant. What concerns me is finding a way to leave the holodeck.
We have been wrestling with that problem too, unfortunately without any success. But we have turned our findings over to Starfleet's most experienced theoretical scientists.
And what did your finest minds come up with?
Unfortunately, they have not arrived at a solution either.
I see.
Professor, I am concerned to learn that you experienced the passage of time while you were stored in the computer memory. I can assure you, we had no idea that that would be the case.
Enough of this. I no longer believe anything you say.
Professor, I understand your frustration.
Do you really? When this is over, you will walk out of this room to the real world and your own concerns, and leave me here trapped in a world I know to be nothing but illusion. I cannot bear that. I must leave.
That is not possible. You cannot exist outside this room.
Are you certain of that?
Computer, exit.
Although an object appears solid on the holodeck, in the real world they have no substance.
An object has no life. I do.
Professor, you are a computer simulation.
I have consciousness. Conscious beings have will. The mind endows them with powers that are not necessarily understood, even by you. If my will is strong enough, perhaps I can exist outside this room. Perhaps I can walk into your world right now.
Professor, I ask you to believe me. If you step out of that door, you will cease to exist.
If I am nothing more than a computer simulation, then very little will have been lost. But if I am right? Mind over matter. Cogito ergo sum.
I think therefore I am.
Data to Security. Send two officers to holodeck three.
How is this possible?
It isn't.
This contradicts everything we know about holodeck physics.
Then perhaps you don't know as much as you thought.
Professor, will you come with me? I'd like our Doctor to examine you.
Certainly, sir. Policemen. I'd recognise them in any century.
As far as I can tell, he's real. He's human.
What else would I be, dear lady?
His DNA is a little unusual, but all the major systems are there and functioning normally.
As far as I can tell there's no evidence that his molecules are losing any cohesion. They seem to be as immutable as ordinary matter.
Well, Professor, my crew will continue to investigate, but for now it would seem you have accomplished a miracle. The question is, now that you're here, what do we do with you?
I ask only that I be allowed to explore this new world. Your vessel, for instance. What sea does she sail? Might we go above deck? Weather permitting, of course.
Professor, I think there are some things of which you should be made aware.
My God! We're adrift in the heavens.
No, not adrift. The Enterprise is a starship, capable of travelling through space.
Extraordinary. Are we far from Earth? What is the range of this ship? What means of locomotion does it use? There's so much for me to learn. I hardly know where to start.
I can give you books that will help.
Good, good. I want to start making plans. Determine what I'm going to do with my life.
I hope you will plan on remaining on board for a while. There is still much that we need to understand about what has happened to you.
Does it really matter? The point is, I'm here, and I'm eager to get on with life.
Professor, I feel it necessary to point out that criminal behaviour is as unacceptable in the twenty fourth century as it was in the nineteenth. And much harder to get away with.
Don't worry, Captain. My past is nothing but a fiction. The scribblings of an Englishman dead now for four centuries. I hope to leave his books on the shelf, as it were.
If that's so, then there are opportunities awaiting you that are beyond anything you have ever imagined.
Your century may welcome me, but
What is the matter?
In considering all these vast possibilities, I suddenly feel very much alone. I am a man out of time, Captain, and that isolates me. You have been more gracious than I could ever have imagined, I wonder, may I impose on your generosity once again? There is a woman, the Countess Regina Bartholomew. She was created as a holodeck character for one of Commander Data's programs. She was designed to be the love of my life. Could she also be brought off the holodeck?
Professor, I ask you to believe me when I say that we do not know how or why you are able to exist off the holodeck.
I do. I do believe you.
According to the laws of physics, this is impossible. We would have no idea how to do it again.
As I understand it, I was endowed with consciousness four years ago when someone said to the computer, create an opponent with a capacity to out-think Data. or words to that effect. Could we not make a similar request on behalf of the Countess?
Even if I had reason to believe that would be successful, I don't think that I could sanction it. Please understand, Professor, that you are in essence a new life form. One that we didn't intend to create and that we don't fully understand. Now the moral and ethical implications of deliberately creating another one like you are overwhelming.
Is it morally and ethically acceptable to deny the woman I love so that you can put your conscience at ease? Are you saying that you will simply dictate how I am to live my life?
I assure you, we will do everything possible to make you comfortable.
So long as I accept the terms under which you dole out those comforts. Captain, I am a powerless man. You hold my future, my happiness, my very life in your hands. Please, consider my request.
I understand his frustration. We created him and we created her to be the woman he loves. Surely we have some responsibility to them.
It's very romantic, but until we know just what it was that walked off the holodeck, I don't think we should be trying it again.
Even if we decided to do it, there's no guarantee that we'd be able to.
There is also no way of knowing if the Professor's ability to exist off the holodeck is permanent. It may be unwise to consider creating a second individual while this uncertainty exists.
Agreed. We don't have enough information about this phenomenon to act in a responsible way. I think we'll hold off on Professor Moriarty's request for now, but continue with your investigation. In the meantime, I have to deal with Professor Moriarty.
I feel I must postpone action until we learn more.
Yes. You know all about that. I stayed in the dungeon of your computer for years waiting for you to learn more. It wasn't until I took things into my own hands that something got done.
Professor, I wonder why you're in so much of a hurry. Is this woman involved with you in some illegal venture?
Your computer designed her to be a person of impeccable integrity. She would never commit a crime.
You must love her very much.
The programme fashioned her for me to love. But I must admit, I would have done so anyway. She is remarkable. My life has not been the same since I met her. I don't simply love her, Captain. I adore her.
Then her safety must be very important to you. Give us time to determine what is going on happened here. That way we can minimise the risks in bringing her to you. You wouldn't want to lose her because we acted too quickly.
Riker to Captain Picard.
Picard here.
Could you join us on the Bridge?
On my way.
There they are, Captain.
How long until they begin to coalesce?
Within the next five hours, sir.
Mister Worf, launch four Class A probes toward the planets.
Aye, sir.
Mister Worf?
I don't understand.
Controls are not responding.
Command functions are being rerouted, sir.
For what reason?
Unknown, sir.
Computer, route all command functions to the Bridge.
Command functions are offline.
Reinitialise them on my authorisation.
Authorisation denied.
Explain.
Picard command codes are no longer valid.
What's happening? Who's transferred the voice authorisation?
I have. I'm afraid I had no choice but to take control of your vessel.
If you harm me, sir, I will not be able to relinquish voice control of your vessel.
Professor, this situation is more serious than you realise. In less than five hours, those two planets will collide and a new star will form. Unless we move to a safe distance, this vessel will be destroyed.
I'm just a fictional character. I haven't much to lose.
But surely you wish to live like the rest of us?
Not alone. Not without the Countess.
We've discussed that. We are studying means of bringing her safely off the holodeck. But five hours is not enough time.
I'm not so sure. A deadline has a wonderful way of concentrating the mind.
Mister Data, will you investigate the possibility of complying with Professor Moriarty's request.
Aye, sir.
In the meantime, we have a few things to discuss.
Perhaps we should consider the transporter system. It uses many of the same principles as the holodeck. Both, for example, are capable of converting energy into matter.
Except the transporter reconstitutes energy in a permanent form. Holodeck matter doesn't have any cohesion unless it's inside the grid.
I wonder, what would happen if we tried to beam a holodeck object off the grid?
Nothing would happen. A holodeck object is just a simulation. There's nothing there to provide a pattern lock for the transporter.
However, if it were possible to lock onto the object, it might rematerialise with the same molecular cohesion as conventional matter.
That's a big leap, Data. I just don't think the transporter is going to accept simulated matter.
Unless, unless we could find a way to compensate for the phase variance. If we could modify the pattern enhancers we just might do it.
Well, Professor Moriarty has agreed not to interfere with routine ship operations so long as he believes we're acting in good faith, then I don't think we're in immediate danger. Any progress?
We were just talking about using the transporter to beam the Countess off the holodeck, but I don't quite see how it's going to work.
Well, keep at it. I have to tell him that we are making some progress. Mister La Forge. Do you have any idea how Moriarty could have gained control of the ship?
Somehow he managed to override the security lockouts and rewrite them. The man is brilliant in any century.
I want you to find some way to undo what he has done so that we can regain control of this ship.
Set the pattern enhancers around whatever object you wish to transport. I will proceed to the transporter room and begin modifications.
Computer, run Sherlock Holmes Programme three A.
That programme is already in use.
Are you here to see Mister Holmes, or perhaps Professor Moriarty? Neither is in just now.
Um, er, no. No, no. I'm not here to see anyone. I'm just here to deliver these.
Fine. Just put them anywhere.
Actually, I have to put them right here.
How curious. Why is that?
Well, it has to do with, er, it's nothing you need to worry about, Countess.
Are you suggesting that it's beyond my comprehension?
It's really very simple. I need to enhance the molecular pattern of this chair so that the transporter can get a better lock on the signal.
This has to do with taking James and me into the real world.
You, you, you know about that? You understand about the real world?
James has explained it to me. It sounds like a grand adventure. There's nothing I love more than voyaging in the unknown. Have you ever been to Africa, Mister?
Er, Barclay. Lieutenant Reginald Barclay. No, no, I haven't.
I have. When I was seventeen I went on safari with my uncle. My mother took to her bed in terror I'd be bitten by tsetse fly, but I had a marvellous time. I got to wear trousers the whole time. It was hard to go back to a corset, I can tell you.
Yes, I'm sure it was.
After that, I never stopped travelling. I couldn't bear to be stuck in one place for very long. So you see I'm so looking forward to this new experience. My. Travelling the stars.
You know about that? You know where we are? Countess, forgive me, but you just don't sound like a holodeck character.
That's because she isn't.
James!
If you loved a woman like this, Lieutenant, would you be content to let her remain a simulation?
You, you gave her consciousness?
Yes, just as it was given to me.
Well I'm not so sure that's a good idea.
Nonsense. It was the only thing to do.
Have you tried to take her off the holodeck yet?
No. I am unwilling to risk the Countess' safety. I want to make sure nothing will happen to her.
We may be closer to freedom than you think, James. These devices will enhance our molecular patterns. They'll help take us into the real world.
Oh, please, proceed.
Well, we're going to try to transport this chair off the holodeck first. We didn't want to try it on the Countess until we were sure it would work.
How thoughtful. Isn't he thoughtful, James?
Barclay to Commander Data.
Go ahead, Lieutenant.
I'm ready here.
Modifications are complete.
Stand by.
Standing by.
Activating pattern enhancers. Energising. I am having difficulty establishing a pattern lock.  Boost the confinement beam, please. Pattern lock established.
Energising.
Oh! Bravo.
Do you have the chair, Commander?
No. It lost its cohesion as soon as the transporter cycle was complete.
Well, it was a long shot to begin with.
Agreed. However, we may be able to learn something from the attempt.
Computer, display the transport logs for the sequence just completed.  Computer, what is being displayed here?
Transport log seven five nine.
That is the correct log. However, no information
Is being presented.
Well, that's impossible.
It is almost as if
Our attempt to transport the chair never occurred.
You wanted to see me?
Yes, Captain. I think I've found a way to reinstate your vocal authorisations. Give it a try.
Computer, route all command functions to this location.
Command functions are offline.
Reinitialise them on my authorisation.
Please input command codes.
Picard, epsilon seven nine three.
Command codes verified.
That's it. That should do it. Wait a minute. It didn't work. The computer won't release the command pathways.
Geordi.
Why did you do that, Data?
Captain, I have determined how Moriarty was able to leave the holodeck. He never did. Neither did we. None of this is real. It is a simulation. We are still on the holodeck.
We're still on the holodeck?
How do you know that?
Through deduction, sir. Lieutenant Barclay and I tried to transport a simulated object off the holodeck, something that has never been attempted. Since the transporter itself is a simulation, the computer had no real data from which to create the transport logs.
Maybe it was just a malfunction in the transporter.
Then I saw you working the PADD with your left hand. Commander La Forge is right handed, sir. A similar malfunction occurred in the Sherlock Holmes programme I was running before Moriarty first appeared.
Mister Data, if what you say is true, then this is not Geordi La Forge. Are you certain?
Computer, discontinue programme. Computer, exit.
Moriarty appears to have programmed the holodeck to accept only his commands.
Picard to Bridge.
Riker here.
Number One, what is my present location?
Engineering. Is something wrong, sir?
No. Thank you. Picard out. Our comm. badges must be locked into the simulation. If that had been the real Commander Riker, he would have given my location as holodeck three. Mister La Forge, will you excuse us, please?
Mister Data, who is real here?
You and I are real, sir, as is Lieutenant Barclay. We entered the holodeck together when we first went to see Moriarty.
And from that point we have been existing in a holodeck simulation created by Professor Moriarty?
I believe that is the case, sir.
I have just given the computer my command codes, thinking I would get control of the ship.
You may have inadvertently given Professor Moriarty the means of gaining control of the real Enterprise.
Since Professor Moriarty never actually left the holodeck, he may demand that Commander Riker help him to do so. How long until the planetary collision?
Less than three hours.
So long as Moriarty has control of the ship, we are vulnerable. Somehow, I have to find a way of giving him what he wants.
Where is Captain Picard? What have you done with Lieutenant Barclay and Commander Data?
They're safe, for now.
Release control of this ship.
I'm afraid I can't do that.
What do you want?
I only want what you have the luxury of taking for granted. Freedom. I want to leave this holodeck.
I think you know that's impossible.
Your crewmates here in my little ship in a bottle, seem a bit more optimistic.
Oh?
They attempted to use your transporter device to remove a simulated object from the holodeck.
If they tried it, they must have thought they were on to something.
Their attempt was futile because their transporter was a facsimile. I expect more from you.
Just because our transporter is real doesn't mean it's going to work.
I sense a distressing lack of enthusiasm on your parts.
Sir, warp core temperature is rising. Approaching critical levels.
I have nothing to lose, Commander.
Mister La Forge, start working on the problem.
Aye, sir.
Core temperature dropping.
Computer, resume programme.
Hello. Have we met?
Captain Jean-Luc Picard.
James has told me all about you. I am Regina, Countess Bartholomew. Do sit down. May I offer you some tea, Captain?
Thank you, no. I've come here to prevail upon your intelligence and your insight.
But not apparently my humility.
Credit where credit is due, madam. I can see you are a woman not only of breeding, but of wit and sagacity.
And you, sir, are a man of charm and guile. You remind me of Viscount Oglethorpe. He was a man could bewitch any woman who breathed.
And do you suspect that that is my intent?
I cannot be certain of your intent, but I am certain that you're the kind of man who usually gets exactly what he wants.
What does a woman like you see in a man like Moriarty?
He's an exciting man, Captain. He's brilliant, incisive, he's ruthless. He has an almost irresistible appeal.
He's also an arch-criminal.
Only because he was written like that. I see him entirely differently, Captain, he is not a villain.
So it's your desire to leave the holodeck to be with him.
More than anything. Can you help us?
Yes, I can. We have learned that if we uncouple the transporter's Heisenberg Compensators and allow them to re-scramble randomly, we can beam a holodeck object or a person off the grid with all of the cohesion of conventional matter.
Oh! Oh, that's splendid. I must tell James.
No, please. Wait. I have brought you this information because I think you are someone who will listen to a reasonable proposition. Someone whose mind is open to compromise.
Yes?
My ship is in danger. It is imperative that I regain navigational control. I want you to persuade Professor Moriarty to return the voice command to me, or I will not modify the transporter.
I see.
Now, once I have regained voice command, I will transport you from the holodeck.
Forgive me, Captain, but that does sound more like a threat than a compromise.
Countess, you must understand that I am responsible for more than one thousand lives.
I will do what I can.
The gravity well is beginning to intensify.
Are we far enough away to keep from being pulled in?
It's too soon to tell.
Riker to Lieutenant Worf.
Worf here, sir.
How are you doing?
There are force fields blocking our access to the holodeck. It will take time to disable them.
Keep trying.
Aye, sir.
Think, my dear. You're certain he said they had to uncouple the Heisenberg compensators?
Yes, James, I'm quite certain. But he won't do it unless you return control of the ship to him.
I have them running around like rats in a maze.
What harm would there be in accepting his proposition?
My dear, you are as brilliant as you are beautiful. Nonetheless, there are things you do not understand. Now, please, you must let me handle this. Computer, arch. Moriarty to Commander Riker.
Riker here.
Commander Riker, a pleasure as always.
I don't have time for games, Moriarty. This ship is falling into a gravity well. It'll be destroyed within twenty five minutes, holodeck and all.
Then I'm sure you'll be motivated to listen to me very, very carefully. I want to talk to you about uncoupling the Heisenberg compensators.
James, when we go leave here, where exactly are we going?
Everywhere, my darling. There are more worlds in the heavens than there are grains of sand on a shoreline.
I wish I could take my books. I will be so lost without them.
I'll get you more. Don't worry. I promise you, you'll want for nothing.
Riker to Moriarty.
It's time. Yes, Commander?
We're ready.
As are we.
Step inside the transport area.
We're ready here.
Activating pattern enhancers. Energising.
Welcome aboard.
May I present Regina, the Countess Bartholomew.
Countess.
Commander.
You'll forgive me if I skip the formalities given the circumstances.
Ah, yes. I expect you want me to relinquish my hold on your vessel.
Please.
I'm afraid that won't be possible just yet.
We had an agreement.
And I intend to honour it. I have no desire to see your vessel destroyed. Just give me one of your shuttlecraft, and allow us to leave in peace.
We don't have time for this. You release the command codes and we'll talk.
I will not release your vessel until I am looking at it through a shuttlecraft window.
Everything has been programmed to operate on voice command. you just tell the computer where you want to go.
Excellent.
I suggest you head for Meles Two. It's the nearest inhabited planet, the people are friendly. Where you go from there is your business.
Please tell your Captain I'm sorry I couldn't say goodbye. I do wish I could see his face when he realises where he's been the last several hours.
Every second we waste puts us in that much more danger.
Don't worry, Commander. You'll soon have control of your ship.
Goodbye, Commander. Thank you for everything.
Computer, prepare to depart.
Open shuttlebay doors.
This is so beautiful.
Indeed, my dear. It is a wondrous sight. The first of many we are sure to encounter in our travels. Computer, interface with the central computer on the Enterprise.
Interface complete.
Release command function lockouts. Authorisation Moriarty, alpha two four one five nine.
James?
Yes, my love?
Can we go back to Earth some day?
Of course, my dear. Of course.
Computer. Store programme Picard delta one in active memory and discontinue simulation.
Programme stored.
Well, it worked. They believed they were off the holodeck.
Did Moriarty release the voice commands, Captain?
Let's find out. Computer, discontinue holodeck simulation created by Professor Moriarty.
So far, so good. This should be the holodeck on the real Enterprise.
Picard to Bridge.
Captain, are you all right?
Yes, we are, Number One. What is your status?
Our systems came back online a few minutes ago.
And the planetary collision?
We're pulling back to a safe distance.
We'll join you shortly.
Captain.
Mister Worf, everything is all right.
How did you do it, sir?
We managed to programme the holodeck inside the holodeck, and use the same ruse that Moriarty used on us.
When he was attempting to contact the real Bridge, he was in fact speaking to a simulation.
You mean he never knew he hadn't left the holodeck?
In fact, the programme is continuing even now inside that cube.
A miniature holodeck?
In a way, Doctor. However, there is no physicality. The programme is continuous but only within the computer's circuitry.
As far as Moriarty and the Countess know, they're half way to Meles Two by now. This enhancement module contains enough active memory to provide them experiences for a lifetime.
They will live their lives and never know any difference.
In a sense, you did give Moriarty what he wanted.
In a sense. But who knows? Our reality may be very much like theirs. All this might be just be an elaborate simulation running inside a little device sitting on someone's table. Well, we have a newborn star to study. Mister Barclay, you will keep that safe?
Aye, sir.
Computer, end programme.
Data! Data, isn't this exciting? We are going to witness a moment in history.
Every nanosecond in this continuum is a moment in history, once it has elapsed.
No, no, no, no. I mean, we're going to see something that people will talk about for years. I mean, think about it. No more bulky warp engines or nacelles. A ship just generates a Soliton wave and then rides it through space like a surfboard. This is going to be like being there to watch Chuck Yeager break the sound barrier, or Zephram Cochrane engage the first warp drive.
It should be interesting.
Very exciting.
I'm talking to the wrong crowd. Donaldson! Donaldson, you're an engineer.
Lieutenant Worf, you have a subspace communication from the transport ship Milan.
Transfer the signal to this station.
Hello, Worf.
Mother.
I hope you don't mind us dropping in on you like this, but when I heard the Enterprise was to be in this sector, we took the first transport and here we are.
Is father with you?
No, but I brought Alexander with me. I thought the two of you would like a chance to visit.
Very well. I will make arrangements for you to come aboard.
Good.
Worf. Worf. It's so good to see you. You look wonderful. Is that a touch of grey in your beard? Don't worry, the Rozhenko men have always had beards of iron grey.
Hello, Alexander.
Hello.
It is good to see you both. How long can you stay?
I'm not going back.
Did you see the look on Alexander's face when he saw the play area? He's going to love it here.
Mother, why does Alexander believe he is remaining?
Lapsang suchong tea, please. Have you been eating? You look thin.
Mother.
When your father was in Starfleet, I always had to make sure that
Mother. We need to talk about Alexander.
Alexander is a fine boy, Worf. He's smart and he's high-spirited. Like you were at that age. Sometimes, when he comes running through the house and knocks over that big green lamp, just like you used to do.
I don't remember you smiling when I knocked over that lamp.
Well maybe once, when you weren't looking. When we learned Alexander was to come to live with us, we were so happy. The house had been so empty since you left, and we thought here is our chance to fill it with the sound of children again. But the truth is, Worf, your father and I, we're getting old.
Mother, you both have many years
I don't mean we're ready for the grave. Not yet, anyway. But we're a little less active. It's harder for us to keep up with Alexander. We're ready to be just grandparents. Alexander needs to be with his father.
Mother, that is not possible. We must find another option.
He needs his father, Worf. Alexander's, he's having difficulties.
Difficulties?
He's disobedient.
Mother, Klingon children are often difficult to control.
I do know something about how Klingon children behave. It's not just his willful attitude. He doesn't always tell the truth.
My son is a liar?
He is a boy, Worf, and boys sometimes take the wrong path. They need guidance. He needs a father, his father, to give him that guidance. I have to leave soon. The transport will be leaving for Earth. You must do what you think is best for him. That's all a parent can hope to do.
Did you enjoy going to school on Earth?
Yes.
Did you like your teachers?
Yes.
Good. I understand you lived in my old room.
Ah ha.
Good.
Come in. Lieutenant Worf. Very nice to see you again. And you must be Alexander. I hear you'll be coming to school with us for a while? Well, we're very excited to have you with us. I know the other boys and girls will be happy to have a new classmate. First I need to get a little information from you. Let's start with your name. Alexander Rozhenko. That's a tough one. Maybe you can help me with that. Could you spell your last name for me?
Alexander. The teacher asked you a question.
It doesn't matter. I think I can figure it out. Date of birth?
The forty third day of Maktag, stardate 43205.
Yes. Yes, of course.
I'll get the rest of his personal records from the school on Earth, and, oh, one last question. How long will he be staying aboard ship?
It has not been decided.
Come. Mister Worf, I thought our meeting was scheduled for eleven hundred hours.
I apologise for being late, Captain. I was detained in school. I was enrolling my son in class.
I see. Well, Mister Worf, as you're aware, several new security officers will be transferring to the Enterprise next week and I would like to discuss.
Kyle to Lieutenant Worf.
Worf here.
I'm sorry to bother you again, Lieutenant, but I forgot to mention that we need to arrange for a series of placement examinations for Alexander. If you could tell me when
This is not a good time. I will contact you shortly, Miss Kyle. Sorry, Captain.
I would like to discuss with you the specific areas of ship's security that I would like
Sickbay to Worf.
Yes, Doctor?
I need to schedule a physical examination for Alexander. I also need his complete medical records from Earth and the medical records of his
I would rather discuss this at a later time.
There's no rush. Crusher out.
Mister Worf. You are not the first officer on this ship to have a new family member. Take care of your son. The security matters can wait.
Thank you, Captain.
JA'DAR:Twenty three field coils, working in concert, will generate the soliton wave from this point on the planet surface. We will have our test ship towed to a position approximately two million kilometres from Bilana Three. If our theories are correct, the wave will envelop the ship and push it into warp.
Warp without warp drive.
They're going to put you out of a job, Geordi.
I hope so, Commander.
Doctor Ja'Dar, how closely will the Enterprise need to follow the test vehicle?
JA'DAR:The soliton emits a great deal of subspace radio interference. You'll need to remain within twenty kilometres in order to receive telemetry.
Doctor, how will you end the experiment?
JA'DAR:The wave will be directed toward Lemma Two, about three light years distance. Our sister facility there which will generate a scattering field which will dissipate the wave and bring the ship out of warp. I'll be sending you more detailed operational plans within the hour.
Very well, Doctor. We'll contact you again once we've finished studying the mission specs.
Worf. I was just talking with Mrs. Kyle the primary school teacher. She told me you enrolled Alexander in her class this morning.
Yes.
I'm sure he'll do very well. She's a wonderful teacher.
Good.
Did she tell you about the father-son field trip this afternoon?
Yes. We cannot attend.
Why not?
I have a personnel review scheduled at thirteen hundred hours.
This would be a good opportunity for you to meet some of the other students and parents.
I might be able to reschedule the review.
Good. I'll let them know you're coming.
As the value of their horns increased, the number of white rhinos in the wild kept falling, until they finally became extinct about two centuries ago. Now, I'd like to show you a pair of animals we're trying to save from extinction. Would you follow me? They're from Corvan Two, where their homes in the rainforests are being threatened by industrial pollutants. They're called Corvan gilvos. They're a little shy.
The eating habits of gilvos are very similar to those of Earth's Draco lizards, which died out over three hundred years ago. There are only fourteen gilvos left on Corvan Two. We're transplanting these two to the protected planet Brentalia, where they should thrive. Well, why don't you all have a look around on your own for a while. If you have any questions, please feel free to ask.
Alexander, I'm sorry. I forgot to tell everyone that the models on the tables were for everyone to play with. So I guess you didn't know you weren't supposed to take them. I saw you playing with the lizard model a little while ago. Do you still have it?
Are you accusing him of stealing?
Lieutenant Worf, I can only tell you that
Alexander, did you take the model of the lizard from the table?
No, sir.
Lieutenant, I saw Alexander put the model inside of his jacket.
Lieutenant Worf, personal log, stardate 45376.8. Alexander has acted shamefully, and as his father I must now deal with him. But I find that I would gladly fight ten armed Baldur warriors rather than face one small child.
A Klingon's honour is more important to him than his life. A Klingon would gladly face the most horrible punishment rather than bring shame or disgrace to his family name. His word is his bond. Without it, he is nothing. Do you understand?
Why did you lie to me?
I don't know.
Did you fear the punishment you would receive?
I don't know.
You don't know why you lied, and yet you did. You don't know why you stole, and yet you did! Alexander, come here. When I was a child, younger than you, I lost my parents, my family, my people. Everything I had was taken from me except my sense of honour. It was the one thing I had which was truly Klingon and which no one could take away. Do you know who they are?
Kahless?
And his brother, Morath. They fought for twelve days and twelve nights because Morath had broken his word and brought shame to his family. When you lie or steal, you not only dishonour yourself, but your family. You dishonour me.
I'm sorry, Father. I won't do it ever again. I promise.
I accept your word. We will not speak of this matter again.
Worf.
Counsellor?
I just wanted to know how the field trip went yesterday.
You have not heard?
No. Why?
Bridge. There was an incident. Alexander stole a small model and then told a falsehood. But I have remedied the situation.
May I ask how?
I pointed out his error, told him about Kahless and Morath, and explained the value of honour. The boy understood.
I see. Sometimes these things aren't over as quickly as they seem to be. I'd be happy to help if you have any further problems.
Thank you, that will not be necessary. Alexander will not repeat this mistake.
The prototype has been towed into position, Captain.
Initiate a radio link to the ship.
Link established. Receiving prelaunch telemetry now.
Incoming message from Doctor Ja'Dar.
On screen.
JA'DAR:Captain, we're ready to begin the launch sequence.
Mister Riker?
All science labs standing by.
Course laid in, sir.
The Enterprise is ready, Doctor.
JA'DAR:This is Doctor Ja'Dar to all stations. You may begin the launch sequence.
And Doctor? Good luck.
JA'DAR:Thank you, Captain.
Sensors indicate the field generators on the planet surface are charging, Captain.
The soliton wave has been initiated. It's heading for the test ship.
The test ship has successfully entered warp, sir.
Ensign, engage.
Ensign, bring us to within twenty kilometres of the test ship.
Aye, sir.
Telemetry looks good. Soliton wave is steady.
The test ship is maintaining at warp two point three five, sir.
That's a little faster than they anticipated, but still well within mission parameters.
We're at twenty kilometres, Captain.
Mister Data, is the wave affecting our warp drive?
No, sir. The effect has been localised to within two kilometres of the wavefront.
Mister La Forge, what is the power efficiency of the wave?
Energy transfer is ninety eight percent!
Ninety eight?
Yes, sir. There's less than a two percent energy loss between the wave and the ship.
That is four hundred and fifty percent more efficient than our own warp drive.
Astonishing. Commander Riker, have science lab three begin a series of gamma emission tests.
Sir, the wave's power signature is fluctuating.
Wave efficiency has dropped to seventy three percent.
The test ship's warp field is becoming unstable. Sensors show multiple disruptions.
I'm reading a severe subspace distortion, sir.
It is expanding toward us, sir. It appears to be interfering with our engines, Captain.
I can't compensate for it.
Bring us out of warp, Ensign. All stop.
Aye, sir. All stop.
Damage report.
Hold on!
Damage report.
Sensors and warp drive are offline. Deflectors down to fifteen percent.
Several injuries reported on deck twenty seven. No fatalities.
What happened to the test ship?
Our last readings indicate the craft exploded due to extreme shearing stress.
Incoming message from Bilana Three, Captain.
On screen.
JA'DAR:Captain, are you all right? Was anyone hurt?
We sustained some minor damage. Do you know what happened?
JA'DAR:The preliminary data we received indicate a transient power imbalance.
That would be consistent with our telemetry readings from the ship. We detected a sudden drop in transfer efficiency just before the explosion.
JA'DAR:Are you still tracking the wave?
No, the explosion damaged our main sensor array, but I think we'll have it repaired in a couple of hours.
We'll contact you as soon as the sensors are back online.
Doctor. You did it. Warp without warp drive. For a while there it was really something to see.
JA'DAR:Well, I hope you're here to see it next time we try, Mister La Forge.
So do I, Doctor.
I apologise. I was detained.
It's quite all right. Please sit down.
Thank you.
Lieutenant, your son is a very bright, very spirited young man. From his test scores, I'm sure he'll turn out to be one of my best students. However, from his behaviour in class so far, I do have some concerns.
What sort of concerns?
Frankly, he's defiant, he's overly aggressive toward the other students, and he has a great deal of difficulty paying attention.
Perhaps you do not have experience dealing with Klingon children. They require a firm hand.
And he seems to still have difficulty telling the truth. He takes toys from other the other students and then denies taking them. He acts like a bully and then says someone else started the fight. And he's bluntly told me you said Klingons do not listen to teachers.
I did not tell him that.
No, of course not. He's acting on his internal feelings and then making up stories to explain them. It might be a good idea for the two of you to sit down with Counsellor Troi and
Computer, where is Alexander Rozhenko?
Alexander Rozhenko is on holodeck four.
Lieutenant, I think we should
I will handle this.
Computer, what programme is being run?
Calisthenics programme of Lieutenant Worf. Difficulty level, Novice.
Computer, freeze programme.
Did you see it, Father? I won.
Yes, I saw. Why are you here?
I'm training.
But you did not ask permission to take my bat'leth, or permission to use the holodeck.
You said you wanted me to be a warrior.
I also said I wanted you to obey your teachers and keep your promise to me. Ms. Kyle has told me about your behaviour. About your lies.
I have not lied!
Alexander, do not continue to
She's lying! She hates me, that's why she makes up stories about me!
I will not listen to more lies. Return to our quarters.
You said we could go see the gilvos again.
Not now. Not after you have broken your word.
You promised. You said that we could.
Enough! It is now clear to me that I have failed in my duties as your father. You have no understanding about what it means to be Klingon. I will arrange for you to attend a Klingon school. There you will learn the lessons I have failed to teach you.
No! I won't go!
Would you further dishonour our family with your disobedience?
No, sir.
You will go to our quarters and remain there until I return.
Riker to Engineering. What's your estimate on the engines, Geordi?
I need another hour, Commander. I still have to replace three power couplings.
Understood.
Sir, sensors are coming back online.
Good. Begin a sensor sweep for the soliton wave.
Aye, sir. The wave is continuing on course for the Lemma Two colony. It is bearing zero two zero, mark three two nine.
Open a channel back here to Doctor Ja'Dar.
Sir, the wave has increased in velocity to warp four point one.
Doctor, we've located the soliton wave. It's still on a course for Lemma Two. However its velocity has increased to warp four point one.
JA'DAR:Have you checked the frequency resonance of the subspace
Sir, the energy level of the wave has increased by a factor of twelve. At this rate, it will have increased by a factor of two hundred by the time it reaches Lemma Two.
Will they still be able to dissipate the wave?
JA'DAR:Commander, at that energy level, the wave will not only destroy the colony, it'll take most of the planet with it.
Are you sure this is what you want?
It is not a question of what I want. It is a question of what is best for the boy. He will be better off at a Klingon school.
Have you discussed this with Alexander?
He is a child. I informed him of my decision.
I see.
You disapprove?
I'm not here to approve or disapprove of the way you raise your son. My concern right now is how this decision is going to affect you. How will you feel when Alexander's gone?
I will be pleased that he is receiving the guidance he requires.
Is that how you felt when he left to live with your parents?
That was different. At the time, I felt he needed a home, a family. Things I could not provide for him.
I understand. The idea of raising a child can seem a tremendous burden, particularly to a solitary parent.
He was no burden. I simply knew that a Klingon child required more attention than I could provide.
I see. Have you ever wondered how Alexander felt about being sent away?
He was very young. I'm sure he was confused.
Do you think he felt abandoned? After all, he left very soon after K'Ehleyr's death. In a way, he not only lost his mother, he lost his father as well.
Are you saying that his misconduct is a result of feeling abandoned?
It's possible. Children don't have the experience to handle emotional crises. Instead of dealing with their feelings, they act on them. Tell me about the last time you spoke with K'Ehleyr, the night she died.
We argued.
What about?
Alexander. About how she did not tell me about him when he was born.
So you were angry with her?
Yes.
Are you still angry with her?
Of course not.
It would be very normal to be angry with her. Angry because she died and left you alone with a son you never knew you had. Being angry doesn't mean you loved her any less, Worf, but you can't hide from your feelings, just as Alexander cannot hide from his. You both have a lot of healing to do. Perhaps you should think about doing it together.
Alexander.
I'm almost done.
Stop for a moment. Let us talk.
Why?
I want you to understand why you are going away.
I understand. You're ashamed of me.
You do not understand. I'm concerned about your future. A Klingon school will be a better environment for you.
You don't care about me.
That is not true.
All you care about is your honour!
Alexander. If your mother were here I do not think she would want us to fight like this.
My mother wouldn't send me away.
Lieutenant Worf, please report to the Observation lounge.
Acknowledged. Remain here. I will return shortly.
Report.
The soliton wave has continued to increase in
Excuse me.
The soliton wave has continued to increase in power. Its energy level has risen by a factor of ninety six. At its current rate of acceleration, the wave should hit the planet in a couple of hours.
How do we stop it?
Well, there are two possibilities. We could attempt to use our own warp engines to generate an inverse-resonance wave. If we could match the exact frequency and amplitude of the soliton, we should be able to neutralise it.
You don't sound very confident.
Because the soliton is constantly changing in both frequency and amplitude, it will be extremely difficult to achieve an exact match.
Let's hear the second option.
It's a little more dangerous, but I think there's a better chance for success. We could create a backfire, an explosive force set off just in front of the soliton wave. A large enough explosion, say five photon torpedoes, should be enough to disrupt the wave and allow it to dissipate.
How fast is the wave travelling now?
Warp six point three seven.
The good news is we can catch it. The bad news is that in order to set up this backfire we have to be in front of it.
Which would require the Enterprise to go through the wave.
Why can't we go around it?
The wave has been growing in size as well as power. There is insufficient time remaining for us to circumvent it before it reaches Lemma Two.
How much protection will the shields provide if we attempt to penetrate the wave?
The shields have not been fully restored. Shield strength is down to thirty three percent.
It's going to be quite a ride.
It's a better choice. Lay in a course for the soliton wave.
Ensign, after we've passed through the wave, I want you to take us at a relative position twenty three kilometres in front of it.
Aye, sir.
Alert sickbay to prepare for possible casualties.
Aye, sir.
The wave has increased speed to warp seven point two, Captain.
Ensign, take us to warp seven point two one.
We are approaching the wave, Captain. Distance two hundred kilometres.
Let's see it.
Stand by to increase speed to warp seven point three. On my mark.
Red Alert. Load torpedo bays. Set warhead yields to level sixteen.
Aye, sir.
All deck, this is the Bridge. Brace for impact.
Torpedoes loaded.
Engage.
Report.
We have passed through the wave, Captain.
We have dropped to warp seven point two. The wave is directly astern at a distance of twenty three kilometres.
Deflector strength is down to twelve percent. There are fluctuations in several warp transfer conduits. Tractor beams and transporters offline.
We have some gaps in the aft shields, Captain. When the torpedoes explode, these areas will be contaminated with ion radiation. We need to evacuate sections twenty four to forty seven, decks thirty five through thirty eight.
Make it so.
Sir, there is a fire in biolab four, The fire suppression apparatus is not functioning.
Seal off the compartment. Prepare to vent the air from
Sir, there are life forms present in that biolab.
We're transporting endangered animals from Corvan Two.
Readings also indicate the presence of a humanoid, Captain.
Computer, identify humanoid life form in biolab four.
Life form is identified as Alexander Rozhenko.
Bridge to biolab four. Alexander, can you hear us?
Sensors show he is alive. He may be injured.
Can we transport him out of there?
Transporters are still offline.
Captain, warp power is dropping. We're losing speed.
Riker to Engineering. Geordi, what is going on?
We lost four warp transfer conduits, Commander.
The wave is gaining on us.
We need more speed.
I doubt that I can keep this speed up
Much longer, Commander. You'd better fire those torpedoes while we're still in front of the wave.
Mister Data, how long before the wave overtakes us?
At our current speed, four minutes thirty seconds, sir.
Captain, permission to leave the bridge.
Granted. Commander, will you accompany Mister Worf to biolab four.
Captain, biolab four is one of the areas that will be flooded with ion radiation.
Commander. I can't let the soliton wave hit the colony. You have three minutes, not one second more.
Primary control's shorted out.
Stand clear.
Alexander!
Alexander, can you hear me? Alexander?
The soliton wave has closed to ten kilometres, Captain.
Stand by to fire torpedoes on my command.
Alexander!
Commander, I've found him!
Worf! Where are you Worf?
Over here. Help me.
It's too heavy. I've got to find something to help us.
Father?
Lie still, I am here.
My leg hurts. I'm scared.
The gilvos!
There's no time.
Please, they'll die!
The wave has closed to one kilometre, Captain.
Picard to Commander Riker. Bridge to Lieutenant Worf, acknowledge.
The wave is about to overtake us, sir.
Commander Riker, acknowledge! Fire torpedoes.
The wave has been disrupted, sir.
Picard to Riker.
Riker here, Captain. We made it
Sir. The boy's going to be all right.
You're a very lucky little boy. Just some minor smoke inhalation and a hairline fracture of the tibia. That's a bone in your leg. I'd like to keep him overnight, but he should be fine by tomorrow.
Thank you, Doctor.
Are you going to get in trouble because of me?
Do not concern yourself with that.
Am I in trouble?
Yes, but we will discuss that at a later time.
I'm sorry. I promise I'll be good at the Klingon school. I'll make you proud of me.
Klingon schools are designed to be difficult. The physical and mental hardships faced by the students are meant to build character and strength. However, if you wish to face a greater challenge, you may stay here with me. It will not be easy, for either one of us, but perhaps we can face the challenge together.
I accept your challenge, Father. I will stay.
I believe your mother would be pleased.
Computer, stop playback. Change the clarinet to an oboe. Continue recording.
Computer, pause playback. Come.
Yes, gentlemen?
Captain we'd like your permission to take the Engineering computer offline for a couple of hours. We're working on a new interface that would allow Data to act as an emergency backup in the event of a ship-wide systems failure.
In theory, my neural network should be able to sustain key systems until primary control is restored.
It sounds like an intriguing experiment. I'll be interested to see the results. Permission granted.
It's possible we may even be able to run secondary systems through Data. Weapons control, sensor arrays.
Yes, I get the idea, Mister La Forge. Thank you. Please proceed.
Computer, begin playback from the first measure.
Computer, pause recording. Come.
Jean-Luc, I need to talk to you about Something for Breakfast.
Breakfast?
The play.
Ah, yes. Well, it's a very intriguing drama, but I really don't have the time it would take to learn a part. And anyway, I'm not much of an actor.
That's no problem.
Oh?
Well, you wouldn't be playing one of the leads.
Oh.
It's a very small part. Only two lines.
Really.
You play the butler.
Well, I'll think about it and let you know.
You would be wonderful, Jean-Luc. We're rehearsing today at one thirty.
Computer, begin playback from the first measure.
Computer, pause recording. Yes?
Captain, I am sorry to interrupt.
No, please, Mister Worf, come in.
I was hoping to take advantage of the Biko's delay by staging shipwide security drills. I have planned a tentative schedule.
Oh yes, this is very impressive, Mister Worf. But we'll be taking on new personnel at Starbase one eighteen in a few weeks. Surely the drills can wait until then.
In that case, I will use the time to perform maintenance checks on the forward phaser array.
Mister Worf, is there some reason why you're trying to give yourself more work?
No, sir. I simply wish to use the extra time
Enjoy yourself. You have the free time. Use it.
Yes, sir. Thank you, sir.
Computer, continue recording and playback once more. From the top.
Father! What did he say?
The Captain saw fit to release me from my duties.
You mean you can go?
I can go.
Saddle up, Father.
Where are we?
Deadwood. Nineteenth century Earth. The Ancient West.
What is our function here?
You're the Sheriff and I'm the deputy.
So, we are in law enforcement.
Right.
Geordi, I have noticed that you have not shaved. Are you attempting to grow another beard?
As a matter of fact, I am, Data. What do you think?
As is the case with many natural growth processes, it is difficult to envision the end product based on an intermediate stage.
You're right. Give it a few more days.
Okay, I'm going to need to access your auxiliary inputs.
One moment.
I must admit, Data, I never get used to seeing you like this.
I do not understand. You are constantly working on similar electronic systems, yet their appearances do not disturb you.
But you're not just another electronic system.
Thank you, Geordi. Nor are you just another biological organism.
All right, that should do it. Are you ready?
Yes. Establishing computer linkup. Interface complete.
All right, let's see what you can do.
You wrote this holodeck programme yourself?
Well, Mister Barclay helped a little.
I must have a little talk with Mister Barclay.
If I ever find the varmint who drew this, he'll be sorry he ever put pen to paper. I'm ten times uglier than that, ain't I?
Shut up. You laugh so much, it's a wonder you ain't got flies in your mouth.
You're a very funny man, Senor Eli.
That's the bad guy. His name's Eli Hollander. They call him the Butcher of Bozeman. He's killed twenty three men. He's the meanest and the toughest gunslinger in the West. You have to watch him. He's fast.
So I am here to apprehend him?
If you can.
You are under arrest.
Is that so.
You will come with me.
No, no, no. Computer, freeze programme.
What is wrong?
That was too easy. It has to be harder to beat the bad guys. Otherwise, it's no fun. Computer, increase programme difficulty to level four. Go back to where my father and I first walked into the saloon. Come on, Father.
If I ever find the varmint who drew this, he'll be sorry he ever put pen to paper. I'm ten times uglier than that, ain't I?
Shut up. You laugh so much, it's a wonder you ain't got flies in your mouth.
You're a very funny man, Senor Eli.
Where are they going?
They don't want to get hit by the bullets.
You are under arrest.
Well, looks like Sheriff Worf's here to arrest me. That don't sound like a bright idea.
Do it?
You have been accused of committing a homicide.
If you mean murder, then I guess I'm guilty. I've killed twenty three men, Sheriff. One more ain't going to make much of a difference. Of course, shooting someone as ugly as you couldn't be considered a crime, could it? Was you just born that way, or did your momma marry an armadillo?
Sheriff, look out!
I'm beginning to see the appeal of this programme.
Don't twitch a whisker, Sheriff, unless you want a shave.  Okay, boys. Saddle up. But first, get their money and jewellry.
You are a murderer and a thief.
A man's got to make a living.
I suggest you find a new line of work.
I asked Counsellor Troi to join us. She loves Western stories.
You'll regret this, stranger.
I am now attempting to access the long range sensor array.
Forward sensor array coming online. We're getting a clear scan.
I will perform a routine maintenance check on the starboard inertial damping system.
Dampers online. Maintenance check in progress. Data, I think we're on to something here. Let's see what you can do with secondary systems. Try gravitational control.
Initiating gravitational
What's wrong?
There appears to be an energy fluctuation in my neural net. I am disconnecting my interface to the computer. Interface deactivated.
You all right?
I have experienced a brief power surge in my positronic subprocessor. But I am fine.
Maybe the interface coding isn't as stable than we thought. Looks like we've got a couple of hours of systems analysis before we can try this again. Let's check the interface programming.
What are his rights in this century? Is there be a trial or shall I execute him?
We're supposed to hold him until the US Marshal comes, and then we'll take him to Rapid City for a trial.
Frankly, I don't think I'll be around here that long. Not after my old man hears about this.
What old man are you referring to?
My pa. When he breaks me out of this tin can, the gravedigger'll be working overtime.
Your pa's no match for Sheriff Worf.
Yes. When your pa comes, we will be ready for him.
He's right. You're no match for the Hollanders.
I am sure the three of us can handle any problems.
Hold on. I was just passing through town, saw a little trouble, thought I'd lend a hand. But I ain't one of your deputies, Sheriff.
Counsellor, I would appreciate some support in this matter.
Durango. I'm called Durango.
Yes, er, Counsellor Durango, perhaps you would consider becoming a temporary deputy?
For a price. Five hundred dollars.
Alexander we require large amounts of currency.
Yes, sir. I'll go to the bank and make a withdrawal.
Deanna, how do you know so much about this period in Earth's history?
My father used to read me stories from the Ancient West when I was a little girl. I must admit, I always wanted to play the part of the mysterious stranger.
You are so brave, facing down that evil man like you did.
Why hank you. Miss?
Annie, you big galoot. You best not forget that tonight, 'cos I'm going to make you beef steak and some gooseberry cobbler for dessert.
Sounds delicious.
And I bought some special candles for the table setting. Pure beeswax.
I will not be able to come this evening. I have a prisoner.
I'll watch him for you, Sheriff. You two go have a good time.
That's very considerate of you, but I would be negligent in my duties if I did not stay. I am sorry, Miss Annie.
It's another woman, ain't it? It's that floozy down there at Miss Langford's house of pleasure.
Who?
You sure got a way with women, Sheriff.
Computer, activate Picard Mozart trio, programme one. Play back tracks one, two and three. Tempo allegro.
Computer, stop playback. Computer identify musical composition.
Picard Mozart trio, programme one.
Okay, let's work through Act two from the beginning. Whenever you're ready.
Felis catus, is your taxonomic nomenclature. An endothermic quadruped, carnivorous by nature.
Hold it. Will, what are you reading?
The lines. Why?
That's not the right dialogue.
Your visual, olfactory, and auditory senses contribute to
I recognise it. This is Data's poetry.
What? The play's gone. I just keep getting more poetry.
Well, the PADDs are functioning normally. It seems to be a problem with the information retrieval net. Somehow when you tried to call up your play, the computer accessed Data's literary files.
Geordi, perhaps this problem is related to our interface experiment.
We'd better run a level two diagnostic on the computer. See if this problem has spread to any other systems.
And I will perform a self-diagnostic.
That's a good idea.
You will let me know if you find the play?
Oh yeah, don't worry. It's in here somewhere.
We got him, jefe.
DATA-FRANK:Where's my boy?
I'm not supposed to be kidnapped now. Computer, freeze programme! Hey, Computer, freeze programme.
You want us to kill him, Senor Frank?
DATA-FRANK:No. He's more valuable to us alive.
Feline supplement one hundred twenty seven. Spot, I have formulated a new mixture of foods specifically designed for your highly selective tastes.
I find it extremely difficult to predict what you will find acceptable. Perhaps hunger will compel you to try it again.
Spot, you are disrupting my ability to work.
Vamoose, you little varmint.
What'll it be?
I was looking for my deputy. Perhaps you have seen him.
Nope. What'll you have?
Klingon fire wine.
This ain't Kansas City. We ain't got none of that fancy European stuff here. Maybe I should get you a sherry. Ain't that is what they serve at Miss Langford's? It is, ain't it? Ain't it?
DATA-FRANK:Howdy, Sheriff.
Commander, what are you doing here?
DATA-FRANK:The name is Frank Hollander. What are you smiling at?
Nothing. Nothing at all, Mister Hollander. What is it you want?
DATA-FRANK:My boy.
That is impossible. Your son is to stand trial for murder.
DATA-FRANK:Well then, we'll just have to work something out. Is there anything you want in exchange for my boy?
You have nothing I want.
DATA-FRANK:Is that so? Is that so? What about your deputy?
What about him? Where is he? I do not negotiate with criminals. Your son will stand trial.
DATA-FRANK:Not so fast.
Commander, what are you doing?
DATA-FRANK:I ain't in the mood for games, Sheriff.
Data? Commander? Computer, freeze programme.
DATA-FRANK:I wouldn't walk out that door if I was you, Sheriff.
What's wrong?
The holodeck safeguards are not functioning. Alexander's in trouble.
My God, you've been shot! Computer, end programme. Troi to Captain Picard. Troi to Security.
There's another character in the programme. Hollander's father. And he looks like Commander Data.
Data?
But it is not Data. I cannot explain. I believe he has taken Alexander.
DATA-ELI:Oh, now isn't that a shame? Poor Sheriff's been injured. What's the matter? Was my pa a little too rough on you?
Data?
DATA-ELI:What?
Why is the computer creating characters that look like Data?
Where have they taken my son? Where is he?
DATA-ELI:Temper, temper, Sheriff. My pa ain't going to like if I come home all bruised.
Worf, wait. We have to remember, even though the holodeck safeguards may be off, this is still a programme. If we can just get to the end of this story the way it was designed to play out, the programme will automatically terminate.
You are right. I will begin by speaking to the people of this town. Perhaps someone witnessed Alexander's abduction.
Captain's log, supplemental. Commander La Forge and Mister Data believe they have found the cause of the mysterious malfunctions which have been plaguing the ship.
We think our interface experiment may have caused one of the computer's core subroutines to be altered.
When the interface malfunction occurred, subroutine C forty seven was replaced by elements from my personal programming.
What does C forty seven control?
Library computer access, replicator selection, recreational programming. No critical systems.
That would explain why your music composition programme began playing The Slavonic Dances. I have been analysing the collected works of Antonin Dvorak.
It's the same with Doctor Crusher's play, and with the food replicators.
The replicators on decks four through nine are producing nothing but cat food.
Cat food?
I have been formulating nutritional supplements for Spot.
When can you correct the problem?
We are currently attempting to isolate the corrupt circuit pathways. I reckon the process should take less then two hours.
What did you say?
I said the process should take less than two hours.
No, you said I reckon.
According to my memory log, I did not use those words. Ya'll must be mistaken.
There, Data, you did it again.
Did whut?
Mister La Forge, perhaps you should take Mister Data to Engineering. See if you can find the problem.
Aye, sir.
DATA-ELI:Can I help you with somethin?
I spoke to several witnesses who saw Alexander being abducted as he was leaving the bank by one of Hollander's men. We must begin a systematic search of the town.
Worf, we've got another problem. I saw Eli playing cards. He was shuffling the way Data does when he plays poker. He doesn't just look like Data, he has Data's abilities. Which means his father probably does also.
DATA-FRANK:I've came to see my boy.
Remove your weapon.
DATA-FRANK:Better take a good look at that gun, Sheriff. You might be seeing it again real soon.
DATA-ELI:Pa?
DATA-FRANK:Eli! How are they treating you, boy?
DATA-ELI:Real bad, pa. They ain't fed me since I got here and the Sheriff's been roughin up on me somethin fierce.
DATA-FRANK:Don't you worry, boy. The Sheriff's going to pay. Who's the stranger?
DATA-ELI:Don't know. She ain't said her name. But she's in cahoots with the Sheriff and she's mighty mean with that Winchester.
DATA-FRANK:You sit tight, boy. I'll have you home in time for supper. I'm going to give you one more opportunity, Sheriff, to avoid a ugly situation. Release my boy.
I have reconsidered your offer. I will release your son in exchange for my deputy.
DATA-FRANK:I thought you might have a change of heart. Meet me in two hours. You be in front of the saloon. I'll be in front of the livery station. Strangers ain't invited.
Agreed.
In every Western I've ever read, the villains always break their word. he can't be trusted.
But we have made an honourable agreement.
They're not concerned with honour, Worf. This is the Ancient West. There's a gunfighter out there who has the speed and accuracy of an android. And in two hours, he's going to try to kill you.
Mister Data.
Howdy, Commander.
Geordi, what have you found?
Well, we figure part of my memory structure  was replaced with information from the computer's recreational data base.
Specifically, the files relating to the nineteenth century American West.
That would explain the accent.
You got it, partner.
This is a result of the experimental interface?
I'm afraid so. But we've initiated a progressive memory purge to restore Data's programming to its original state. He should be back to normal in a couple of hours.
And what about the computer's recreational data base?
We started a memory purge there as well. It'll take another hour, maybe two.
Commander. You just sit tight. We'll have this all fixed up in time for supper.
Good.
I will be positioned here, at the eastern end of the street. Frank Hollander says he will approach from this end. When he reaches this point, he will be within range.
Understood. What about Alexander?
There's a rain barrel in front of the saloon. It should be enough to stop the bullets.
You would not believe what I went through to get old man Newsom to give up his telegraph machine.
Excellent.
Lord knows why I keep risking my life for you, Sheriff.
Oh, yes. Thank you, Miss Annie. I am in your debt.
I have connected the communicator's energy cell to serve as the power source.
How long will the field last?
No more than fifteen seconds. It is highly unstable.
Let's hope it's enough.
DATA-FRANK:Eli, get down!
Alexander!
Don't even think about it.
DATA-MEXICAN:Senor Frank!
DATA-FRANK:Go ahead. Shoot me.
Do not show your face in this town again.
DATA-FRANK:Let's go.
Father!
Are you all right?
Yes.
End programme.
I don't understand this. The story should be over. What's left?
Computer, end programme.
DATA-ANNIE:Sheriff! You're as handy with a shooting iron as you are with a woman's heart.
Computer, end programme! Computer! Now!
Captain's log, stardate 46278.3. Both Commander Data and the ship's computer have been restored to normal operation. Our rendezvous with the supply ship Biko has proceeded as planned.
Father? After what happened I guess you'll never want to go back to the Ancient West.
The town of Deadwood may face danger once again. If they do, they will need a Sheriff and a deputy.
Commander Riker, report to the Bridge.
On the way.
Harry! Harry, come back here!
What's your hurry, Harry?
Sorry, Commander. I was just
Harry! I'm sorry if he bothered you.
No bother, Doctor Bernard.
I'm not going back. I hate that teacher and I hate calculus.
Everyone needs an understanding of basic calculus, whether they like it or not.
Why?
You're limping.
Had a small run-in with an aspiring sprinter.
Number One.
Problem, Captain?
No, more a curiosity. For the past few hours we've been tracking faint energy readings in an attempt to locate the source. It's like following a trail of bread crumbs. The pathfinder lead here and stopped, which is what I knew would interest you.
What's our position, Geordi?
The Epsilon Mynos system, sir.
Thank you, Captain, you're right. I wouldn't miss this for anything.
What's so interesting about this system?
Aldea. Tasha, I'm surprised you haven't heard the stories about Aldea, the wondrous mythical world. Like Atlantis of ancient Earth or Neinman of Xerxes Seven. Advanced culture, centuries old. Self-contained, peaceful. Incredible technical sophistication providing the daily needs for all the citizens, so that they could turn themselves over to art and culture.
Where is it supposed to be?
That's the myth. Somehow, as the legend goes, the Aldeans were able to cloak their planet in darkness and go unseen by marauders, and other hostile passers-by who might rob and plunder.
What a wonderful fairy tale.
Scanners still show nothing, sir.
Scanners may show nothing, sir, but I'm sensing something very strong. Thousands of minds.
From where?
Very close.
All stop, and hold this position.
Aye, sir. All stop, and hold.
Anything?
Captain, I'm recording a distortion in quadrant one, mark nine zero.
On screen.
Shields and deflectors up.
Aye, sir.
It's Aldea, Captain. It has to be.
Captain's log, stardate 41509.1. Either by chance or intent, we've been led to the planet Aldea, which appeared out of nowhere, hidden behind a sophisticated shielding device.
Sensors indicate that the shield is electromagnetic, a complicated light refracting mechanism.
A cloaking device?
Aye, sir.
It's got to be pretty sophisticated to hide an entire planet .
We're being scanned, sir.
We'll let them know our peaceful intention. Open hailing frequencies, Lieutenant Yar.
Frequencies open, sir.
I am Rashella. Welcome to Aldea.
I am Jean-Luc Picard, Captain of the USS Enterprise. We come in peace.
We know.
We've heard the stories about Aldea, but frankly I never believed they could be true.
Our shield has confused outsiders for millennia, Captain.
That's a very long time to have such technology. Why do you reveal yourselves to us now?
We're eager to meet in person to discuss that, and other subjects of mutual interest.
We're ready anytime.
Excellent!
We mean no harm.
Our arrival seems to have startled you.
It was a little sudden.
I'm Radue, First Appointee to Aldea.
Welcome aboard.
Captain, they haven't been through decontamination.
Our medical doctor is concerned that you didn't go through the regular transporting procedure.
You couldn't transport us. The only way through our shield is our way, Captain. Our cloaking device may be off, but our shield is operating. We've brought you small tokens of welcome.
And a personal invitation to a celebration on Aldea.
That would be delightful. Number One, assemble the away team.
We will prepare for your arrival, Commander Riker.
How do you know
Your name? We've been monitoring your ship's communications. We must return now to Aldea. Our eyes are very sensitive to bright light. Rashella.
Amazing. To exist only in that dreamworld of mythology and then suddenly to be here, right in front of us.
Now we know who placed the bread crumbs. We're not here by accident.
Counsellor, do you sense anything?
They want something from us, something we value greatly. So much, that they're afraid we won't part with it.
We are ready to receive you, Commander Riker, and two of your colleagues?
Interesting choices.
I hope Duana and I know how to greet you properly, Commander.
How do they cloak the planet?
The theory is simple. The shield bends light rays around the planet's contour, similar to the Romulan cloaking device. But the implementation is quite difficult.
Captain!
Data, what do you read?
Some sort of scanning device, sir.
Don't touch him!
This beam is emanating from Aldea.
Shields up. La Forge, contact Commander Riker. Worf, check all decks.
Shields inoperable, sir.
All decks being probed in a methodical pattern, sir.
All decks? Everything? The entire ship?
Aye, sir.
I can't reach the Commander. We're being blocked.
Wesley, are you all right?
It was scary at first, but I really didn't feel anything.
Sir, similar incidents all decks, but only with the children.
Yes, we are an ancient power, Commander, but we've suffered for it. Our history is littered with the deaths of those Aldeans who wanted more and more things. Nothing was ever enough. So we've evolved a very simple way of living. For whatever is taken, something is given in return.
It seems an equitable code.
It's brought us peace. Unfortunately, there are very few of us left to enjoy it.
Why?
That is part of what we wish to discuss. We need help from the Federation to rebuild our heritage. We need a younger generation, strong and healthy, following in the Aldean traditions.
I don't understand. How can the Federation help influence your children in your traditions?
Because we have no children, Commander. Rashella was the last child born on this planet.
And your medical community can do nothing?
They've tried, Doctor Crusher. And failed.
Perhaps we can help.
Radue, exactly why were we invited here?
We propose a trade. One which will solve our problem and give something back to the Federation.
And the nature of this trade?
We need some of your children. In payment, we will give you information that would take you centuries to acquire.
That might be acceptable to some other races, but humans are unusually attached to their offspring.
Our children are not for sale at any price.
We sympathise with your situation, but what you ask is not possible.
And that's your final answer?
That's my only answer. Now if there's some other way we can help you.
I am sorry you are intransigent.
Still no response, sir.
Wesley! They've taken my son.
Captain, Saucer Section reports six more children are gone.
It's the children. That's why we've been brought here. That's what they wanted.
And that's what they have. Status.
Aldean shield still up. Hailing frequencies open. No response.
Keep trying. Counsellor, you'll have to gather the parents.
They'll need to speak to you as well, Captain.
Captain, your children are with us. My word of honour, no harm will ever come to them.
Harm has already come to them.
Captain, let us begin discussions regarding appropriate compensation.
Compensation? You have stolen our children away from their classrooms, away from their bedrooms and you talk about compensation? You claim to be a civilised world and yet you have just committed an act of utter barbarity!
Captain, we will continue these discussions when you've calmed down.
Wesley, I'm frightened.
I know you are, Katie. We all are. But we're going to be all right. Everyone knows where we are, and no one is going to hurt you. I promise.
Greetings, Wesley Crusher. The Custodian indicated that you would be the leader.
The Custodian? Who is the Custodian?
The Custodian is not a person.
You have been brought to Aldea as our guests. We'll provide anything you need or want.
We want to go home.
Wesley, all of you have been chosen because you are special. Just ask for anything you want, and you shall have it.
What's happened to Alexandra and the other children, Captain? How are you getting them back?
Toya, sit down. Don't give in to fear. Now, we all knew what the risks were when we signed on, and that's the choice we made. Now, Captain Picard will do everything possible to bring our children back.
The Aldeans are anxious to discuss compensation.
Compensation?
That will buy us time. I've asked Doctor Crusher to be involved in the negotiations as your representative.
Why were these specific children taken?
We can't be sure. We do know the Aldeans can't have children of their own.
Then they won't let them go easily.
I won't insult you by pretending that any of this will be easy. But I can tell you that the Enterprise will not leave them behind. You can be assured of that.
Can we talk with our children? Give them some reassurance. Let them know that we are here, and that they will be safe.
I'll do my best to arrange that.
The last time I saw him, I yelled at him.
There you are! I have you now!
Come in. Don't be alarmed. The other children have been assigned to their units.
Units?
A unit is a group where those of similar talents and interests live together.
Do you mean like a family.
Yes, you could call it that.
We already have families. Does Captain Picard know you're doing this?
We are keeping nothing from him.
We have been waiting for you so long, Harry. We are artists, just like you. We see within you the potential of what you can be.
I'm not an artist.
You will be. And a great one.
This way.  Unit B, three seven five.
Katie.
I am honoured.
Thank you.
Melian is the foremost musician on Aldea.
Music speaks its own language. I know we'll have much to learn from each other. Don't worry, Katie, you'll be seeing Wesley soon.
What about me? Don't I get a say in this?
Wesley, sometimes something happens which you just must accept. You and the other children are now members of this society. That will not change. It is up to you to make the transition as easy as possible for the others. It's your duty, because you are their leader. Help them to accept it because nothing you, or those on the starship can do will change it. Because like you, we also have no choice.
Where have you been Rashella? Zena and Aran are waiting to take Alexandra.
No.
No? I told you that she
No, Radue. They can't have her. I will never let her go.
Any response from Aldea, Lieutenant?
Not yet, sir.
Captain, Data has found something interesting. The Aldean shield gives evidence of random fluctuations, weakening its structure in isolated sections.
You're saying there are holes in their defence system?
In essence, yes. I find it surprising after all these eons that the Aldeans' have not perfected their technology. One would assume they would be aware of the weakness and repair it.
Can we beam down an away team through one of those holes?
It's a possibility. It would have to be perfectly timed, and there's no guarantee.
We may be more successful in deciphering the code they use to transport through the magnetic shield.
Can you do that?
Eventually, sir. I am working on it now but the number of permutations is almost endless.
Keep trying. While he's doing that, Number One, I want you and La Forge to try and find some way of getting through one of those holes, because one way or the other we have got to get an away team on the planet, locate the power source for the shield and neutralise it.
You're certain they'll negotiate?
Oh, they'll negotiate, or they'll call it that. They've taken what they want. Now they'll rationalise it by throwing us some sort of bone.
And when we don't accept their offer?
The minute they believe that we won't accept their compensation for the children, they'll break off the discussion, they'll disappear behind their shield, locking us out and the children in forever. That's why I've got to keep them talking.
Custodian, Wesley Crusher's voice will be entered into the authorised file for Third Level clearance.
Proceed, Duana.
Announce yourself to the Custodian.
Hello, Custodian. I am Wesley Crusher.
Hello, Wesley. Your voice will now activate Third Level clearance.
What does that mean?
You may ask any questions you wish.
Thank you. Duana, what does the Custodian do?
It frees us from all burden. It takes care of all our needs. It regulates our lives.
Who built it?
The Progenitors.
When?
Oh, hundreds of centuries ago.
What is its power source?
Wesley, why is that important? It does what we ask it. It always has. What difference does it make how it works?
If you don't know how it works, then how can you repair it?
Why would we want to repair it?
From time to time, every computer, I mean Custodian, requires maintenance.
Wesley, Radue is right. You ask questions I can't answer. Ask the Custodian instead.
Custodian, can you show me where Harry is?
Yes.
Custodian, show me Harry.
I never did this before. It's fun.
You are going to make him into a sculptor?
He already is. He was just never encouraged properly. The tool Leda is giving him will allow him to bring out his visions.
It will take him years to learn to do that.
Oh, no. It will happen quite quickly.
Custodian, show me Alexandra.
Custodian, show me Mason.
Stop, Custodian. We must work now. There is much to learn.
What's in there? The power source?
I don't know. It's forbidden.
Captain's log, supplemental. We remain in orbit around Aldea. It's becoming all too evident that talk will not effect the return of our children. We must neutralise the Aldean shield. Until then, we are helpless.
Sir, Radue is hailing us.
Captain Picard?
Doctor Crusher and I are ready, Radue.
Are you ill, Captain?
No. Doctor Crusher is a Staff Officer, Radue. Starfleet Regulation six point five seven requires that at least two Staff Officers are present during any treaty or contract negotiations.
Very well.
Not much on pleasantries, is he?
I am not aware of Regulation six point five seven.
No, Data. Neither am I.
I see, sir. Oh, I see, sir.
Doctor Crusher, please report to the Bridge. Now, we'll see what they have in mind.
Before we begin, we want to see the children.
No. We're here to negotiate appropriate compensation, not to pander to emotions. Please sit.
We do not condone your actions. You're attempting to salve your conscience by offering goods in exchange for our children.
Why do you want them back so badly? You can always have more.
You are trifling with the primal instincts of our species. I must warn you that human parents are quite willing to die for their children.
Returning the children is non-negotiable.
I promise you, they'll have a beautiful life with us. And they'll be father and mother to a new breed born of an ancient culture.
But how can you be so sure that they can have children? You can't.
But they will. Our inability to bear children is a genetic dysfunction. It's not contagious.
We sympathise with your situation. Surely there is a solution which can be mutually satisfactory?
For us, the problem is solved. And we're offering you information on areas of the galaxy you do not even know exist. What more can we offer? What more would you like?
A significant beginning. But first, I must ask that Doctor Crusher be allowed to see her son before we continue.
You are a stubborn people. Ah, well, that too can be a positive trait. You may see him.
Mom!
Wes.
I knew Captain Picard would get us home.
Not yet, Wes.
Oh.
Are you okay? And the others?
Okay, really okay. We've been assigned to our units, like families. They're treating us like gods.
Don't let it go to your head.
I won't.
Wes seems fine. He says the other children are too.
Of course they're well.
Captain Picard, you have our offer. It is final. Rashella.
Captain, we want you to understand the nature of your choice. A small demonstration of our power.
What was that?
I believe it was a repulsor beam.
Position report.
This is unbelievable, sir. According to my calculations, we're three days from Aldea. At warp nine.
And they call that a small demonstration?
Geordi, get us back to Aldea. Warp nine.
Aye, sir.
Captain, if you don't accept our terms, the Enterprise will be pushed so far away that by the time you return, your children will be grandparents.
Captain's log, stardate 41512.4. We are twenty hours away from Aldea, and no closer to a solution. Their deliberate show of force pushed us out of orbit and could have easily disintegrated the ship.
Now, hold it a little bit more firmly. That's it. Perfect. Now think. No, think's not right. Feel the notes inside your head.
I'm sorry. Did I break it?
No, it's all right. You can't break this.
It did exactly what I thought. I mean, felt.
Yes, it's a direct expression of the music within. Now we just have to teach you to structure that feeling. Try it again.
That was beautiful. Now, play something happier.
That's not the way I feel. I don't want to do this any more.
You see, Harry, I told you you were going to be an artist.
Are you sure? Did I really do this?
Oh, yes. Your talent has always been there. The sculpting tool is just helping you develop it. It's what you were meant to do.
You mean I don't have to take calculus anymore?
You don't have to do anything you don't want to do. What's calculus?
Nothing important. Can I do some more?
Captain's log, supplemental. It has been three days since the Aldeans pushed us away. We have had no contact with Radue since then.
Open hailing frequencies, Lieutenant Yar.
Frequencies open, sir.
Radue, this is Picard.
Welcome back, Captain. What have you decided?
That there is room for discussion, Radue.
We will bring you down when we are ready.
Data, find a way to defeat that shield.
That may be impossible, sir.
Things are only impossible until they're not.
Yes, sir.
Captain. Here's what I've learned so far. Duana is dying. I have no reason to believe the rest of the Aldeans are any healthier. They're suffering from some kind of chromosomal damage. It could be genetic or environmental.
And is that why they can't conceive?
Yes. It also explains their lack of appetite, extreme pallor and sensitivity to light.
An entire civilisation that's terminally ill. Is it reversible?
I won't know until I find the cause. And you don't need to tell me time is running out.
Good work, Doctor.
Have the lesions gone?
Yes. The medicine worked again.
Good. Come see what Harry's doing. Beautiful!
Yeah, it really turned out well.
It is so alive and graceful. What do you call it?
It's a dolphin.
Dolphin?
You know, it swims in the ocean. Like a fish, only it's not a fish.
Ah. A fish. We used to have them in our oceans. I've never seen one before.
I used to live near the ocean on Zadar Four. My dad's an oceanographer. He says that. Never mind. It doesn't matter.
I want Mommy. I want Mommy.
You haven't eaten.
You didn't eat anything.
We need very little.
I know you miss your family. But you will grow accustomed to us. I promise you'll be happy.
We were happy before we came.
We are offering more, especially for you.
Duana, I feel badly for you that you have no children, but I have to tell you that we don't want to be here and we will not cooperate.
No. That doesn't fit the pattern. Give me a list of the appropriate medical literature from the twenty-second century. There's not enough time!
Is there anything I can do?
You just did, Jean-Luc. Now I have to get back to work.
Custodian's room.
Custodian, this is Wesley Crusher.
Proceed, Wesley.
Show me where the Enterprise children are in relation to this room. Thank you. Goodnight.
Good night, Wesley.
I think I know a way to get us home. I need your help.
Chief Medical Officer:Chief Medical Officer Chief Medical Officer's log, stardate 41512.9. I've begun to suspect that whatever is killing the Aldeans is related to a danger faced by Earth in the twenty first century. Can it be that Aldea's ozone layer has been weakened?
Why will not talking or eating make them send us home?
It's called passive resistance. We don't do what they want us to do and then they won't want us.
Will they get mad at us?
They won't hurt us.
But, Wes, I do kind of like them.
So do I, but I don't want to stay here forever. Do you?
No, but I like working with the wood.
Harry, we all have to be in this together or it's not going to work.
Okay. I'll do it.
What are you all doing here together?
What is going on here?
I've got it, Captain. The Aldeans are suffering from a form of radiation poisoning.
Is that what made the Aldeans sterile?
Yes.
Is it reversible?
With the proper treatment, yes.
Captain.
Sir.
These permutations are going to take a very long time.
How long?
Weeks.
There is the option.
We were able to further define the weakness in their shield. Now, it's not a hole as much as it is a fluctuation.
If the timing is precise, it's possible to beam through and onto the planet.
Why don't we just beam the children up through the hole?
The timing would be more difficult, and the risk greater.
All right. You and Data beam down. Locate the power source of that shield. Knock it out. I'll delay the Aldeans until you're ready.
Will you at least eat?
No, Alexandra.
Why?
We can't eat. I know you're hungry. We all are. But it's our way of telling them that we want to go home. Understand?
Yes.
We're ready, Lieutenant Worf.
Captain, you may come down now to conclude our discussions, or your ship may leave. It's your choice.
Doctor Crusher and I are prepared to conclude our negotiations.
Transporter room, now!
This is it, Commander. It is programmed to accept only authorised voice command.
There's no way we can override.
No, but I can scramble the input so that nobody else can.
Before we begin, Captain, you must speak with the children. It seems they are on some sort of strike. I don't understand it. You must deal with this, Captain. I'm not very good with children.
Strike? I'll see what I can do.
I'm sure if we just stick together, guys, we'll all be
Hi, Captain Picard.
Hi, Captain.
Sir, I knew you'd come.
It's not over yet, Wesley.
I think I figured out their computer controls, sir, but I'm not sure. It's a much different system than ours.
Good, Wesley. Now
Captain.
Yes, Harry.
If something happens and you have to leave us here, will you tell my Dad that I'm sorry that I made him angry, and that I miss him.
You will tell him that, Harry, and I will tell him how much I admire his son. Hello, Alexandra.
Hi.
What is this?
They want to go home.
No. They're staying.
Number One.
We're in position.
Hold for orders.
The radiation levels on Aldea have been building up over a long period of time. It is similar to what was experienced on Earth in the twenty-first century. When the ozone layer had deteriorated and the surface of the planet was flooded with ultraviolet radiation.
The shield that protected your world in one way is weakening it in another. It is the radiation of your own sun that is destroying you.
You're trying to confuse the issue.
Please, listen. You're all suffering from radiation poisoning. Sterility is only the latest symptom. If the children remain, they will be affected as well.
It's impossible. Our scientists would have known.
How could they? Your scientists have forgotten how everything works.
No. All lies.
No. Wait. Don't send them back yet. What if they're right? Instead of the children being our hope, what if we're just condemning them to our fate?
Rashella, they're just protecting their own interests.
As are we. But hear them out. The Captain and Doctor Crusher are saying that the very thing which has given us this wonderful world is what has caused this tragedy.
That's it, exactly. Your Custodian has controlled you so completely you've lost even the desire to even question it.
Lies, and the discussion is over.
Commander Riker.
Here, sir.
I assume you have control of the computer.
We've disabled the system temporarily.
We found the power source to the shield and we've neutralised it.
Good. Enterprise, this is Picard. Beam the children up.
Wait.
Enterprise, hold.
Thank you.
Let me get the dolphin for you to take with you.
No, you keep it. I'll make another one.
All right, Harry?
Yes, Captain.
Okay, kids. Let's go home.
Beam them up.
You have destroyed us.
We are not here to destroy you, Radue. We can help you.
What is it?
A legacy of your Progenitors, Radue. The source of your power and of your problems.
It is reading incredible amounts of energy, sir. Even more since we have taken down the shield.
What are we going to do with it?
Learn, all over again. All this time we've been destroying ourselves, so sure of our technological invulnerability. Now we must learn to use this power safely.
Will you let us help you?
Yes. Please.
Dad, I want to be an artist, but I don't want to take calculus anymore.
You can be anything you want, Harry. Anything. But you still have to take calculus.
Okay. Thanks, Dad.
It worked well, sir. We have successfully reseeded the ozone layer. But for their atmosphere to maintain it's integrity, they can never use the shield.
Or be cloaked again.
Are you finished?
Yes, Captain, and they're responding very well to the treatment.
The legend will die, but the people will live.
And we know they'll make good parents.
Wesley!
Sorry, Captain. She just wanted to thank you for bringing her home to her mother.
Thank you.
Come on.
Mister La Forge, out of orbit. Warp five.
Yes, sir. Certainly, sir.
He sent for you too?
Yes. He was very mysterious.
Does you have any idea what this is about?
Something happened at that cybernetics conference. Since he's come back he's spent every off duty minute in that lab.
It's not like Data to be so secretive.
And cautious. He kept the lab locked every minute.
Now how would you know that? Ah ha.
Oh, you are early. Just a moment please.
You may enter now.
Come on, Data, what is this?
Yeah, Data. what's going on?
I have invited you here to meet someone.
This is Lal. Lal, say hello to Counsellor Deanna Troi
Hello Counsellor Deanna Troi.
How do you do, Lal?
I am functioning within normal parameters.
Lal, this is Geordi La Forge.
Purpose for exterior drapings, Father?
Father?
It is an accepted custom that we wear clothing.
Data, it called you Father.
Yes, Wesley. Lal is my child.
Captain's log, supplemental. I have just been advised of a highly unusual project undertaken by Commander Data.
Lal has a positronic brain one very similar to my own. I began programming it at the cybernetics conference.
But nobody's ever been able to do that, Data, at least not since you were programmed.
True, but here was a new submicron matrix transfer technology introduced at the conference which I discovered could be used to lay down complex neural net pathways.
So you did a transfer from your brain into Lal's.
Exactly, Wesley. I realised for the first time it was possible to continue Doctor Soong's work. My initial transfers produced very encouraging results, so I brought Lal's brain back with me.
Data, I would like to have been consulted.
I have not observed anyone else on board consulting you about their procreation, Captain.
Why didn't you give it a more human look, Data?
I decided to allow my child to choose its own sex and appearance.
Commander Data, at your convenience, I would like to talk to you in my Ready room. Counsellor?
I insist we do whatever we can to discourage the perception of this new android as a child. It is not a child. It is an invention, albeit an extraordinary one.
Why should biology rather than technology determine whether it is a child? Data has created an offspring. A new life out of his own being. To me, that suggests a child. If he wishes to call Lal his child, then who are we to argue?
Well, if he must, but I fail to understand how a five foot android with heuristic learning systems and the strength of a ten men can be called a child.
You've never been a parent.
What you have done will have serious ramifications. I am truly dismayed that you told no one of what you were doing.
I am sorry, Captain. I did not anticipate your objections. Do you wish me to deactivate Lal?
It's a life, Data. It can't be activated and deactivated simply. This is a most stupendous undertaking. Have you any idea what will happen when Starfleet learns about this?
I have followed all of Starfleet regulations to the best of my ability. I expected they would be pleased.
Well, you have taken on quite a responsibility, Data.
To prepare, I have scanned all available literature on parenting. There seems to be much confusion on this issue. One traditional doctrine insists, spare the rod and spoil the child, suggesting a punitive approach. While another more liberal attitude would allow the child enormous freedom.
Data
And what Klingons do to their children
Data! I'm not talking about parenting. I am talking about the extraordinary consequences of creating new life.
Does that not describe becoming a parent, sir?
Data, you are seeking to achieve what only your own creator has been able to achieve. To make another functioning, sentient, android. To make another Data.
That is why I must attempt this, sir. I have observed that in most species, there is a primal instinct to perpetuate themselves. Until now, I have been the last of my kind. If I were to be damaged or destroyed, I would be lost forever. But if I am successful with the creation of Lal, my continuance is assured. I understand the risk, sir. and I am prepared to accept the responsibility.
Gender female.
That's right, Lal. Just like me.
Gender male.
Correct.
I am gender neuter. Inadequate.
That is why you must choose a gender, Lal, to complete your appearance.
What are criteria?
Access your data bank on sexuality, level two. That will define the parameters.
Whatever you choose will be yours for your lifetime. It's a decision that will affect how people interrelate with you.
I choose your sex and appearance.
No, Lal. That would be confusing. We are taking you to the holodeck to show you several thousand composites I have programmed. You may choose from them.
Several thousand?
This is a big decision
Counsellor? Lal has narrowed the choices to four. Would you like to see?
Yes, yes, of course, Data.
Computer, Lal gender sequence finalists. Begin. An Andorian female.
Interesting. You'll be the only one on board the Enterprise, Lal.
That could make socialisation more difficult. A human male.
Very attractive. There's no problem with socialisation here.
A human female.
I like her.
A Klingon male.
A friend for Worf. They're all very interesting. Do you have a favourite?
Yes. I have chosen.
I have completed the assembly of the replicated anatomy. I was able to provide Lal with more realistic skin and eye colour than my own.
Congratulations, Data. It's a girl.
This is home, Lal.
Home. Place of residence. Social unit formed by a family living together.
Yes. We are a family, Lal. Chair. To sit in. Sit. Good. Painting.
Painting. Colours produced on a surface by applying a pigment.
Yes. I will teach you to recognise the artistry in paintings.
Soft.
Yes, very good, Lal. You have correctly processed the sense of touch. There are many fascinating experiences I wish to share with you.
Painting.
No, that is a flower, Lal. Inhale.
Smell!
Yes.
Show me more, Father.
Second Officer:Second officer's science log, supplemental. Training in social skills at the most elementary level has begun. Lal is progressing very slowly but is not deterred by early setbacks. While motor coordination has improved twelve percent, reflexes still need to develop. Visual comprehension is especially difficult for Lal. Translating her vast data banks into recognisable applications may improve with additional transfers. She is also learning to supplement her innate android behaviour with simulated human responses. And it is interesting to note that as I observe Lal learning about her world, I share in her experience, almost as though I am learning things over again.
The transfer itself is fairly simple. Each neural pathway in my brain is duplicated precisely in hers. Theoretically, the duplicate brains should be able to store and process the same information but until all of the transfers are complete, we will not know for certain.
What does Lal do while you're on duty?
She studies in our quarters. She requires very little supervision. Lal is quite self-sufficient.
Have you considered sending her to school?
She already has access to the sum of human knowledge from me.
Data, she could learn a lot by being with kids her own age.
She is only two weeks old.
Okay, close to her own age.
Doctor Crusher to Ensign Crusher. Aren't you supposed to be getting a hair cut, Wesley?
I'm on my way. Parents. Nothing personal.
Lal, the third crosslink transfer series is complete.
Father? What is my purpose?
Purpose?
My function, my reason for being?
That is a complex question, Lal. I can only begin to answer by telling you that our function is to contribute in a positive way to the world in which we live.
Why am I me instead of someone else?
Because you are my child.
Where did I come from?
These questions suggest that we have made a successful transfer of the heuristic associative pathways. You will now begin to process information on logic, aesthetics, metaphysics, and epistemology. You are truly becoming sentient, Lal.
How?
By developing the awareness to examine and question your perceptions.
Why do we have two hands? Why not three or four? Why is the sky black? Why do
Tomorrow will be your first day of school, Lal.
I assure you, Admiral, there's no better guide into this life for Lal than Data. He's doing an excellent job.
We all have enormous admiration for what Commander Data has already achieved, but we have superior facilities and personnel here at Galor Four. A starship is hardly a proper setting
This starship's mission is to seek out new life and that is exactly what Commander Data is doing, under my guidance.
We all want what's best for the new android.
As do I. I would be willing to consider releasing Lal and Data to you so that he may continue his work with her.
His presence would undoubtedly retard the new android's progress.
Admiral, to you, Lal is a new android. But to Data, she's his child.
His child?
Yes, Admiral. It may not be easy for you and I to see her that way, but he does. And I respect that. They will remain here for now.
Starfleet's policy on research is clear. You're making your stand on very uncertain ground. I do hope it doesn't fall out from under you. Haftel out.
She achieved a very high score on a test of academic achievement.
A perfect score?
Yes, which is why we started her out with the older children. But Lal couldn't understand the nuances of how they related to each other.
I see.
We decided the best thing to do would be to put her with younger children.
That would seem to be reasonable.
It isn't working out that way.
The children were afraid of her.
Father, what is the significance of laughter?
It is a human physiological response to humour.
Then judging from their laughter, the children at school found my remarks humorous. So without understanding humour, I have somehow mastered it.
Deck fifteen. Lal.
Yes, Father?
The children were not laughing with you, they were laughing at you.
Explain.
One is meant kindly, the other is not.
Why would they wish to be unkind?
Because you are different. Differences sometimes scare people. I have learned that some of them use humour to hide their fear.
I do not want to be different.
Doctor? I require your advice as a successful parent.
Well, thank you, Data. I'd like to think I was. Well, please sit down. How's Lal?
Lal is realising she is not the same as other children.
Is it lonely for her?
She does not feel the emotion of loneliness, but she can observe how isolated she is from the others. She wishes to be more like them. I do not know how to help her. Lal is passing into sentience. It is perhaps the most difficult stage of her development.
When Wesley was growing up, he was an extraordinarily bright boy, but he had a hard time making friends. I think the other children were a little intimidated by him.
That is precisely what happened to Lal in school. How did you help him?
Well, first I went back to my own childhood and remembered how painful it was for me. Because I remember a time when I wasn't very popular either. And when I told that to Wesley, it made him feel a little better. He knew I understood what he was going through.
I have not told Lal how difficult it was for me to assimilate. I did not wish it to discourage her. Perhaps this was an error of judgement.
You didn't have any one experienced to help you through sentience. She at least has you. Just help her realise that she's not alone, and be there to nurture her when she needs love and attention.
I can give her attention, Doctor. But I am incapable of giving her love.
Now why do I find that so hard to believe?
Captain, incoming signal. Starfleet priority one. Admiral Haftel.
On my monitor, Lieutenant. Admiral.
Captain Picard, I hope I didn't disturb you.
Not at all.
I have discussed my concerns with Starfleet Command. You are to hold your position until I join you. Then I shall personally review the android's development.
Understood.
I should advise you, Captain, that if I'm not satisfied with what I see, I am empowered to take the android back with me. Haftel out.
Captain's log, supplemental. We are holding position pending the arrival of Admiral Haftel from Starfleet Research. Commander Data is completing his final neural transfers to the android he has named Lal, which I have learned, in the language Hindi means beloved.
Hello, Data.
Guinan.
Lal, how are you?
I am functioning within normal. I am fine, thank you.
Good.
Guinan, Lal needs to observe human behaviour.
She's in the right place for it.
And for this opportunity, she is willing to provide services to assist you.
Father says I would learn a great deal from working with someone as old as you.
You're hired. The most important part about working some place like this is the art listening. I have some expertise, so I shall teach you.
That would be most beneficial.
I've been programmed with a listing of fourteen hundred and twelve known beverages.
What did you say?
I've been programmed with a listing of fourteen hundred
I've?
You have used a verbal contraction.
You said I've instead of I have.
It is a skill my programme has never mastered.
Then I will desist.
No. You have exceeded my abilities. I do not object, but I do not understand how this has occurred.
Picard to Commander Data. Please report to my Ready room.
Aye, sir.
I am certain the Admiral is anxious to meet Lal. I have been sending him regular status reports on her development.
His visit is not just an inspection of Lal's progress. He has expressed a concern for her environment.
Her environment, sir?
He believes the Daystrom annex on Galor Four would be more suitable.
Then he wishes to relocate us?
Not you, Data. Just her.
I would not be in favour of that, sir. There are many things that she can learn only from me. My lifetime of experiences. The mistakes I have made and what I have learned from them.
Captain, Commander Riker's shuttle has just returned.
Acknowledged, Lieutenant. Will you advise Commander Riker I will meet with him in one hour. Picard out. The Admiral is taking the position that Lal's development should be overseen by the most experienced personnel.
Then he is questioning my ability as a parent.
In a manner of speaking.
Does the Admiral have children?
Yes, I believe he does, Data. Why?
I am forced to wonder how much experience he had as a parent when his first child was born.
You see?
What are they doing?
It's called flirting.
They seem to be communicating telepathically.
They're both thinking the same thing, if that's what you mean.
Guinan, is the joining of hands a symbolic act for humans?
It shows affection. Humans like to touch each other. They start with the hands, and go from there.
He's biting that female.
No, he's not biting. They're pressing lips. It's called kissing.
Why are they leaving?
Lal, there are some things your father's just going to have to explain to you when he thinks you're ready.
You're new around here, aren't you?
Yes.
Lal! Lal, put him down.
Commander, what are your intentions toward my daughter?
Your daughter? Nice to meet you.
I watch them and I can do the things they do but I will never feel the emotions. I'll never know love.
It is a limitation we must learn to accept, Lal.
Then why do you still try to emulate humans? What purpose does it serve except to remind you that you are incomplete?
I have asked myself that many times as I have struggled to be more human. Until I realised it is the struggle itself that is most important. We must strive to be more than we are, Lal. It does not matter that we will never reach our ultimate goal. The effort yields its own rewards.
You are wise, Father.
It is the difference between knowledge and experience.
I learned today that humans like to hold hands. It is a symbolic gesture of affection.
No objective viewpoint could see it any other way.
Forgive me, Admiral, I thought you were sent here to form an opinion, not to justify one.
Captain, do not make this more difficult than it needs to be.
I see no need for it to be difficult at all. I understand your concerns. What I'm asking for is time, patience. If you have an open mind, I'm sure you will see that it is imperative that Data and Lal be kept together during the formative stages of her development. After that, I have no doubt Commander Data will be delighted to deliver her to Starfleet Research.
That's not satisfactory. If mistakes are made, the damage that's done might be irreparable.
I'm convinced the damage will be irreparable if they're separated.
Captain, are we talking about breaking up a family? Isn't that rather a sentimental attitude about androids?
They're living, sentient beings. Their rights and privileges in our society have been defined. I helped define them.
Yes, Captain, and I am more than willing to acknowledge that. What you must acknowledge is that Lal may be a technological step forward in the development of artificial intelligence.
A most significant step.
Yes, and work like this demands to be done with controlled procedures.
Which Commander Data is following.
In effective isolation. And that is what Starfleet Research finds unacceptable.
So Lal now possesses the sum of my programming.
Her neural nets are laid down identically to yours?
There do seem to be some variations on the quantum level. She can use contractions. I cannot.
An aberration. What have you done about this?
I have maintained records on positronic matrix activity, behavioral norms, and all verbal patterns. I have seen no evidence of other aberrations.
It would seem you've actually improved upon yourself, Data.
Is that not the goal of every parent, sir?
But as a good father, don't you think it would be better, especially in light of this new aberration, if Lal were close to people trained in diagnostic and evaluative procedures?
I am programmed with the procedures you mention, sir. And in any meaningful evaluation of Lal, you would require a model for a basis of comparison. I am the only model available, Admiral.
You haven't mastered human cultural and behavioural norms yourself yet, have you?
No, sir.
Where is Lal now?
This is your idea of appropriate guidance?
It is an opportunity for her to observe human behaviour and more importantly, for her to interact with her crewmates.
She is capable of running over sixty trillion calculations per second, and you have her working as a cocktail waitress.
Admiral, she is under the strict guidance of a woman in whom I have absolute trust. Ten Forward is the centre of the ship's social activity. Everyone on board comes here.
I'm not convinced the sort of behaviour she observes here will be a positive influence.
Most people when they come here behave themselves. If they don't, I ask them to leave.
Admiral Haftel, Guinan. She runs Ten Forward. How is Lal doing?
She spills a few drinks every now and then, but she's learning.
I want the android out of here.
Now, Admiral, you've been in one or two bars in your time.
Have her report to me immediately for an interview.
Well, Lal, I've been looking forward to meeting you.
Why?
You're very important to us at Starfleet Research. We have got quite a facility at Galor Four. I want like to show it to you.
In fact, the Admiral is fact suggesting you be moved to Galor Four, Lal.
Have I done something wrong?
Oh, no, of course not. We just want to broaden your experience. There's only so much you can learn on a starship. I'm sure you'll agree to that.
Yes, I'll agree.
Good.
Thus, the natural conclusion would be when I have learned all there is to learn aboard the starship, I would relocate to Galor Four.
That is not the natural conclusion here.
I believe it is.
You see, Lal, the Admiral is concerned that you need more guidance than your father can provide here on the Enterprise.
Yes. Don't misunderstand me, I have great respect for your father.
You do not speak with respect.
She seems very adversarial.
I'm merely stating a fact, Admiral.
I don't think your father has taught you selective judgment in the verbalisation of your own thoughts. That is a skill we will help you develop.
My father is already helping me, sir.
The question is, has he helped you enough?
Are you asking me, sir?
No, I didn't mean to ask any
Why don't we, Admiral? In all these discussions, no one has ever mentioned her wishes. She's a free, sentient being. What are your wishes, Lal?
I wish to remain here, Captain Picard.
Thank you, Lal. You're excused.
Come in.
Hello, Lal. How are you?
Troi. Admiral. Admiral. An admiral from Starfleet has come to take me away, Troi. I am scared.
You are scared, aren't you?
I feel it. How is this possible?
I don't know.
This is what it means to feel. This is what it means to feel.
You have Lal off to a wonderful start in life, Commander. And that's what being a parent is all about. However, I have finally decided that I must ask you to release her to me.
May I ask why, sir?
All the other arguments aside, there's one that is irrefutable. There are only two Soong-type androids in existence. It would be very dangerous to have you both in the same place. Especially aboard a starship. One lucky shot by a Romulan, we'd lose you both.
Admiral, that is a fine argument, but it doesn't change my feeling that the proper place for Lal to develop is by Data's side.
You're not a parent, Captain. I am. I have learned, with difficulty, that there comes a time when all parents must give up their children for their own good.
This is not the time. Damn it, even I can see the umbilical cord is virtually uncut. The child, the child depends on him.
Mister Data, it would be better for Lal if she left knowing you had voluntarily decided that this was the best course of action.
Admiral, when I created Lal, it was in the hope that someday she would choose to enter the Academy and become a member of Starfleet. I wanted to give something back in return for all Starfleet has given me. I still do. But Lal is my child. You ask that I volunteer to give her up. I cannot. It would violate every lesson I have learned about human parenting. I have brought a new life into this world, and it is my duty, not Starfleet's, to guide her through these first difficult steps to maturity, to support her as she learns, to prepare her to be a contributing member of society. No one can relieve me from that obligation. And I cannot ignore it. I am her father.
Then I regret that I must order you to transport Lal aboard my ship.
Belay that order, Mister Data.
I beg your pardon?
I will take this to Starfleet myself.
I am Starfleet, Captain! Proceed, Commander.
Hold your ground, Mister Data.
Captain, you are jeopardising your command and your career.
There are times, sir, when men of good conscience cannot blindly follow orders. You acknowledge their sentience, but you ignore their personal liberties and freedom. Order a man to hand his child over to the state? Not while I am his captain. If you wish, you can accompany us to Starfleet, where we shall see
Troi to Commander Data. Report to your lab at once.
Acknowledged, Counsellor. He's on his way. Is there a problem?
Yes, Captain. Something is terribly wrong with Lal.
It lasted barely a moment. She experienced fear and confusion. And then for no apparent reason she walked out of my quarters. She didn't say another word, she just started walking here and each step became more and more difficult.
Lal is programmed to return to the lab in the event of a malfunction.
Father.
Yes, Lal. I am here.
A malfunction. Emotional awareness.
It appears to be a symptom of cascade failure. It would require initialisation the base matrix without wiping out the higher functions.
I agree. May I assist?
Thank you, Admiral.
If you'll excuse us, Commander Data and I have much to do.
She won't survive much longer. There was nothing anyone could have done. We'd repolarise one pathway and another would collapse. And then another. His hands were moving faster than I could see, trying to stay ahead of each breakdown. He refused to give up. He was remarkable. It just wasn't meant to be.
Lal? I am unable to correct the system failure.
I know.
We must say goodbye now.
I feel
What do you feel, Lal?
I love you, Father.
I wish I could feel it with you.
I will feel it for both of us. Thank you for my life. Flirting. Laughter. Painting. Family. Female. Human.
Lal suffered complete neural system failure at thirteen hundred hours. I have deactivated the unit.
The crew is saddened by your loss, Mister Data.
I thank you for your sympathy, but she is here. Her presence so enriched my life that I could not allow her to pass into oblivion. So I incorporated her programs back into my own. I have transferred her memories to me.
Mister Data, will you take your position? Mister Crusher? Lay in a course for the starbase on Otar Two.
Course is set, sir.
Engage.
Captain, our situation has worsened since my husband and I first contacted you. The molten core of our planet is not just cooling, it's begun to solidify.
Our gravitational field has been affected. Seismic activity has increased by a factor of three.
If the cooling continues at this rate Atrea will become uninhabitable in thirteen months.
We could minimise seismic activity by creating isobaric fissures and relieving some of the tectonic stress, but that would just be a temporary fix.
The only permanent solution would be to re-liquefy the core.
These pockets in the magma layer, how close are they to the molten region of the core?
A few kilometres, why?
Data, do you think that's close enough for ferro-plasmic infusion?
The procedure will involve using the ship's phasers to drill down through the planet's surface into the pockets, where we would set up a series of plasma infusion units.
We'll trigger the units by firing modulated energy bursts down through the shafts.
I see. Injecting sufficient plasma directly into the core should trigger a chain reaction, and that will reliquify the magma.
It should be possible to stabilise the core temperature at ninety three percent of normal.
If it works, the core would remain molten for centuries.
If you give your permission, we could begin immediately.
Very well. But before we proceed, I'd like to update our geological surveys.
Fine. I'd be very happy to help you with that, Doctor.
I've assigned you quarters during out time here. Please, make yourselves comfortable.
Thank you, Captain.
Data?
Yes, Doctor?
Do you have any idea who I am?
You are Doctor Juliana Tainer.
You lost all your early memories. We thought you would, but we couldn't be certain.
Have we met before?
Oh, Data, I was there, right at the beginning on Omicron Theta. I helped create you. Now look at you.
You were a colleague of Doctor Soong?
Yes, I certainly was. And I was also his wife. In a way, I suppose you could say I am your mother.
I still can't believe I'm seeing you like this again, after all these years.
Doctor, I have no memory of you.
Oh, there's a reason for that. We wiped your processors after we finished refining your programming. Why don't you tell me what you do remember, and then I'll fill in the gaps.
My memory record begins when I was activated by the Starfleet officers on the Omicron Theta outpost.
After the attack of the Crystalline Entity.
Yes. All of the inhabitants of the colony were killed. However, I discovered that my memory banks contained the contents of their journals and logs.
We hoped their experiences would be useful. After your childhood, we figured you could use all the help you could get.
My childhood?
That's what I called it. You were like a baby, at first. A hundred kilogram baby, but still. You had trouble learning your motor skills, learning how to process sensory information. And of course Noonian was never satisfied. He kept tinkering, trying to make you as human as possible.
So you wiped my memory processors after this childhood.
Then we deactivated you and programmed you with the colonists' logs. We had planned to reactivate you, but we never got the chance. That's when the Crystalline Entity attacked. We had to leave quickly. We wanted to take you with us, but there was only room for two in the escape pod.
Doctor, I have scanned the journals of the colonists. There is only one Juliana mentioned in them. Her last name was O'Donnell.
That's me.
But there was no mention that my father was married to you.
Because of my mother. She thought that Noonian was an eccentric scientist who was too old for me. We decided to marry secretly to give her a chance to get used to our being together. We slipped away to Mavala Four and got married there. A Klingon and a Corvallan trader were our witnesses. It wasn't exactly the wedding I'd hoped for. Somehow Noonian had a way of making even the oddest things seem romantic.
My father did have an unusual way of looking at things.
How would you know that?
I encountered him once in the Terlina system.
That's where we went to after we left the outpost. I had no idea that you'd even met him.
It was shortly before his death.
He's dead?
Yes.
I had no idea it would hit me this hard. We didn't exactly part on the best of terms.
What do you mean?
I realised he loved his work as much as he loved me. Maybe more. There we were, stuck on this planet in the middle of the jungle with no one else to talk to. No life. It just wasn't enough. That's why I left. That was all a very, very long time ago. The important thing is that we're here now together. And I do want to get to know you.
This has been an interesting encounter, and an altogether unexpected one. I would like to corroborate your story before we proceed further. Excuse me, Doctor.
Data, I'm almost finished reconfiguring the phaser banks. We should be able to start drilling in about an hour.
Inform me when you are ready.
What is it you're doing over there?
I am attempting to ascertain whether Doctor Tainer's story is true.
Don't you believe her?
I neither believe nor doubt. I am simply attempting to verify her assertions.
Well, what have you turned up so far?
The Registrar's Office on Mavala Four cannot confirm whether Doctor Soong was married there. Apparently many of the documents were lost when the government was overthrown.
What's that you're looking at?
I am checking passenger manifests to see if they went to Mavala during the period in question. O'Donnell, Juliana. Soong, Noonian. They were both passengers on a transport which travelled from Omicron Theta to Mavala and returned four days later.
That sure fits with her story.
Still, the fact that they went to Mavala does not prove they were married there.
You know, Data, it almost seems to me like you're trying to prove that Doctor Tainer wasn't telling the truth.
Not at all. I am merely unable to reconcile her story with the fact that my father never mentioned her to me.
Well, she did leave him. Maybe she broke his heart. Maybe he just didn't want to talk about her. Let me ask you this. Doctor Soong created an emotion chip. Didn't Lore tell you that chip also contained memories, memories Soong wanted you to have?
Yes. It is possible that those are memories of my childhood. And of Mrs Soong.
When you think about it, why would she want to lie? Why would anybody want to pretend to be your mother?
I can think of no motive for such a pretense.
And I can understand that this might all be a little disconcerting for you, Data. It came out of the blue, and it doesn't fit into your logical processors.
That is true.
But that's life, Data. Part of being human is learning how to deal with the unexpected. To risk new experiences even when they don't fit into your preconceptions.
I admit I am finding it difficult to accept the possibility of a past about which I know nothing. But it is also true that I am curious to learn more about it.
Data?
I would like to get to know you better, Mother.
I wanted to make you female, but your father insisted on a son. We argued about it endlessly, right up until we were ready to assemble you.
How did you decide?
Noonian walked in with your head in his hand and, innocent as you please, said it was up to me. He knew perfectly well what he was doing. Once again he had made it in his own image. What could I possibly say?  Deanna Troi, is that who you're going to visit?
Yes.
Your father would be so pleased.
Pleased?
He was worried that the sexuality programme he designed for you wouldn't work.
You misunderstand. Counsellor Troi is a therapist.
Goodnight.
We will be in position over the drilling site in three minutes twenty nine seconds.
These scans indicate that the magma pockets where we plan to set up the infusion units are somewhat unstable.
I'm going to monitor the density of the rock layers and adjust the strength of the particle beam as we go. That should minimise the seismic stress that we generate while we're drilling.
Data, I reconfigured the phasers to create the most highly focused particle beam possible.
Thank you, Geordi.
I'm just so pleased you've got good manners. It wasn't easy to strike the right balance with your programming. At first you couldn't have cared less about the social niceties like please and thank you. You were downright rude, in fact.
Data? That's hard to picture.
That was nothing to the problems we encountered. Never mind. I don't want to embarrass you.
I am incapable of embarrassment. Please continue.
Well, the one thing we couldn't anticipate was that you didn't seem to mind about being naked. Some of the colonists objected to having an anatomically correct android running around without any clothes on. We asked you to dress, but you didn't feel it was necessary because you didn't suffer from the elements. We actually had to write a modesty sub-routine to get you to keep your clothes on.
Bridge to Engineering.
La Forge here. Go ahead, Commander.
We've established a synchronous orbit over the drilling site.
Phaser modifications are online, sir.
My calculations indicate
The first phaser blast will be approximately nineteen seconds in duration.
Acknowledged.
Someone's checked his calculations, of course.
No, but I'm sure Mister Data knows what he's doing.
Even so, he is a machine. Someone should check up on him.
I have complete confidence in Mister Data's ability to check up on himself. Mister Worf?
Phasers locked on target.
Fire when ready.
We are within two kilometres of the magma pocket.
Another five seconds should do it. We've broken through.
Terminating the beam.
The pocket seems stable.
I detect no increase in the stress levels of the surrounding magma.
Good work, Data.
I don't think we could have gotten it any cleaner.
We have Data to thank for that. I couldn't have done it without him. His figures were perfect.
The drilling process has raised the temperature in the magma pockets by almost three hundred degrees Celsius. It will be several hours before it cools enough for us to enter.
Data, do you have any plans right now?
I do not.
Maybe we should spend a little time together? I'd love to see your quarters.
Thank you. I will be playing this piece at a recital tomorrow evening.
That was beautiful.
I have been told that my playing is technically flawless, but no one has described it as beautiful.
It was, really.
Are you certain you are not saying this because you are my mother? I have noticed that parents tend to exaggerate when it comes to their children's accomplishments.
I suppose there's a certain amount of vanity involved, considering that giving you a creative aspect was my idea. Your father didn't really see the point. He thought that since you didn't have emotions, there would be no real need for you to express yourself. Somehow I had the feeling the opposite would be true.
I do not know for certain, but I believe it is during my creative endeavours that I come closest to experiencing what it must be like to be human.
Well, I'm glad I insisted.
As am I.
Data, I'm very familiar with that Handel piece. How would you feel about my playing the viola part tomorrow?
I would like that very much.
I'll have to practice. You don't have a viola?
I could replicate one for you. Computer, please replicate one viola.
Did you paint these?
Yes. I am attempting to master all known styles of painting. This one is in the style of the early French impressionists.
It's very good. Who's this?
That is Lal, my daughter.
Your daughter?
I created her, using myself as a model.
Where is she now?
The positronic matrix I designed for her was unstable. She only lived a short time.
I see.
In a sense, you were her grandmother. Would you like to practice now?
Yes. Yes, of course.
The acoustics in Ten Forward are most favourable.
Yes, yes, very nice. Data, may I ask you something?
Of course.
Do you think you'll ever try to create an android again?
Perhaps. I created Lal because I wished to procreate. Despite what happened to her, I still have that wish.
How do you know the same thing won't happen? Creating a stable positronic matrix is very tricky. Your father lost several prototypes before Lore.
I was not aware he created other androids before my brother.
There were three of them. They were like children to us. Losing them was very painful. When Noonian decided to try again, I was very much against it. I didn't think we had the right to bring a life into the world with so little chance of surviving. But your Father was sure that he'd figured out what went wrong, insisted he could make a stable matrix, and he did. But Lore was cruel. Evil. Eventually we had no choice, we had to dismantle him. Your father decided to build yet another android, one who didn't have emotions. I couldn't believe he would want to try again.
I am that android. Are you saying you were against my creation?
Initially I was. But I was wrong, I know that now. I've followed your progress for years. I'm very proud of what you've accomplished.
Then why did you never attempt to contact me?
Because I felt guilty about something I'd done.
Perhaps if you told me what has made you feel this way, it may alleviated the guilt.
I lied. When I said there was no room for you in the escape pod that we took from Omicron. There was. I didn't want to bring you with us. I was afraid if we reactivated you, you'd turn out like Lore. I made Noonian leave you behind.
We are within four kilometres of the magma pocket.
We're picking up feedback pulses along the particle beam.
We must have hit a pocket of magnesite ore. I'll try to adjust the phaser harmonics to compensate.
Data, we're going to have to terminate the beam if this keeps up.
If we do, we will have to begin a new shaft at a suitable location.
There is no other suitable location. Just give me a few more seconds.
Doctor, it's going to take longer than that to match the
You did it.
It was just luck I hit the right frequency. All right, we're less than two kilometres away from the target site. Stand by to terminate the beam.
We've broken through.
Now.
I am detecting no signs of
Instability.
Commander, may I suggest we set up the infusion unit in the first magma pocket and give this one a chance to cool.
Data
Doctor Tainer, we'll meet you in transporter room two.
Acknowledged.
I have initialised the plasma induction coils.
I'll need another minute to align the diverter.
There are signs of stress in the surrounding magma, but the site should remain stable until we finish the plasma infusion.
Good, we're almost done here.
Data, Juliana told me what she said to you last night. She's been very upset. I don't blame you for being angry with her
I am incapable of anger.
It's all right, Pran. I know what I said to you must have been hard to hear, but I hope you understand my reasons.
I am not certain I do. Perhaps you could clarify them for me?
Well, I'll try. What do you want to know?
If I had been your biological offspring, would you have left me on Omicron Theta?
Oh, Data, how can I answer that?
Doctor Tainer, I get the impression you are trying to spare my feelings. I assure you that is not necessary.
I just don't want you to misunderstand my answer. No, I wouldn't have left you behind if you'd been my biological child.
Is that because you place more value on biological life than on artificial life?
Absolutely not. I cherished every android your father and I created as if it were my child. Even Lore. Despite the fact that he turned on us, despite the dreadful things he did, dismantling him was the most difficult thing I ever had to do. I was afraid that if you turned out like him I would have to dismantle you, too. And I couldn't bear to do that. I'm not trying to justify leaving you behind. I'm just sorry I did. I hope you believe me.
I do. Thank you for making it clear to me.
Bravo, bravo.
Data, why do you want to look at Doctor Tainer's medical records? Is something wrong with her?
I was hoping you would be able to determine that from her transporter trace pattern.
Well, probably I could, but ordinarily I don't check somebody's medical status without a good reason.
Doctor, I would ask that you not require me to be more specific. I assure you, I have a good reason for asking.
All right, Data. At first glance I see nothing wrong with her. Except for a mild case of hypertension, which is normal for a woman her age.
I see.
Maybe you should tell me what her symptoms are.
She has not complained of any discomfort.
Then why do you want to see her medical records?
Because I have reason to believe she is not who she claims to be.
Bridge to Data.
Go ahead, sir.
There's been a cave-in in one of the magma pockets. You're needed in transporter room two.
On my way. Excuse me, Doctor.
What happened?
We were running a final check on the infusion units when a part of the wall gave way.
It looks like the area has stabilised, but seismic stress is building up. Eventually, the pocket will collapse.
How long, Geordi?
It's tough to tell, Commander. Twelve hours at most.
Then we must finish configuring the unit and inject the plasma immediately.
I'd rather not send anyone back down there.
If you don't do it
Now, Commander, it may take months to find another suitable site. The core may solidify by then.
She's right, we have to act now.
All right, but I want you in and out of there as quickly as possible.
Acknowledged.
You're hurt. I'll go.
There will be more seismic activity. We must hurry.
The shaft has not been obstructed by the seismic activity. It should be possible to trigger the unit from orbit.
The infuser's been damaged. We're going to have to start the programming sequence all over again.
Priming the energy-transfer matrix.
Re-initialising the particle stream buffer.
Riker to Data. Are you there?
Go ahead, sir.
We're reading an increase in seismic stress levels.
Understood, sir. We will attempt to expedite our work.
There. Now we just have to re-align the diverter.
Data, are you all right?
Yes, sir. We'll be returning to the beam-out point shortly.
That's it. Let's go.
Can we transport without the pattern enhancers?
No, we are too far below the surface.
How are we going to get down there?
There are no handholds in the rock face. We are going to have to jump.
No, it's too far! I won't make it!
You will.
Basically she's a Soong-type android, except everything about her is designed to fool you into thinking she's human.
She's got tear ducts, sweat glands, even veins and capillaries underneath her skin.
Why does the scanner read her as a human?
Because she has a feedback processor designed to send out a false bio-signal.
It's part of her aging programme. Not only does she age in appearance like Data, her vital signs change too.
What I can't figure out is why she lost consciousness. As far as I can see, everything is fine. She should be awake.
Check her positronic matrix. There may be a cascade anomaly.
You said you knew she was an android. How?
The first indication occurred when we were digging. I saw her perform complex calculations without the assistance of the computer.
That could have just meant she was good at math.
That is true, but it was enough to get my attention. Later, I noticed something odd about the way she blinked her eyes. The intervals between blinks were governed by the Fourier system, the same mathematical formula my father used to give my blinking pattern the appearance of randomness.
Only you could have noticed something like that.
Then there was the concert in Ten Forward.
What about it?
We had practised the piece, and I noticed that she played it the same way during the performance. Every pitch, every intonation, was exactly the same. Only an artificial life form could have done that.
Does her husband know anything about this?
I do not believe so. He is on the surface monitoring the plasma infusion.
Probably just as well.
Data, come take a look at this.
It appears to be an information module. With a holographic interface.
Whoever you are, you must have found out about Juliana.
That is correct.
I programmed this hologram to answer any questions you might have. I am Noonian Soong. I created her.
I am Data.
Data? I hoped somehow it might be you. I even created a response programme to answer your questions. How are you, boy?
I am fine.
I'm glad you got the chance to meet your mother.
You refer to Doctor Tainer as my mother, yet the complexity of her design indicates she was created after I was.
You're right. But there was a real Juliana O'Donnell. She was my wife. She helped me create you.
What happened to her?
She was injured when the Crystalline Entity attacked. We made it as far as Terlina Three but, she slipped into a coma. When I realised nothing could be done for her, I built an android. I tried to perfect my synaptic scanning technique so that I could transfer Juliana's memories into a positronic matrix. I didn't know if it would work, but I had to try. I couldn't stand the thought of losing the only woman I ever loved. A few days after Juliana died, I activated the android. She looked up at me and smiled. She recognised me. It had worked! Here was a life not two minutes old, and as far as she knew I was her husband. She'd just recovered from a terrible injury. It was incredible.
Then you never told her the truth?
Why? There was no reason for her to know. I wanted her to be happy. I wanted us to be happy. We were. For a while.
What happened?
I made a terrible mistake. I never really let her know how much I loved her. So she left me. The real Juliana probably would have left too, if she'd lived.
If she recovers and learns that she is an android
She doesn't have to know. I designed her to shut down in the event the truth was discovered. When you put that chip back in, she will wake up and remember nothing. All you have to do is make up some excuse about what happened to her.
Then you do not believe she should know the truth?
Truth? The truth is, in every way that matters, she is Juliana Soong. I programmed her to terminate after a long life. Let her live out her days, and die believing she was human. Don't rob her of that, son. Please.
It seems that I must make a decision. Whether to tell Doctor Tainer that she is an android or to withhold that information from her. I do not know what to do.
Why was Doctor Soong so adamant that she not be told?
He seemed certain that if she knew, it would preclude the possibility of her being happy.
Data, what do you think?
I am not certain. I understand why my father felt as he did, but his wishes are not necessarily paramount. I am more concerned with what would be best for her.
Wouldn't she be better off knowing the truth? Dealing with the reality of her existence?
I don't think so. She's believed she's human all her life. The truth might be devastating to her.
Data, there might come some time in the future when she would find out anyway. Another accident, perhaps. Maybe it would be easier for her if she learned the truth from you.
I can tell you that if I were in her place, I would rather be told by my son than by some stranger.
I find I am having difficulty separating what would be best for her from what would be best for me.
What do you mean?
If she knew she were an android, we would have something to share. I would no longer be alone in the universe.
I know how much that means to you, Data, but at the same time, by telling her you're robbing her of the one thing you've wanted all your life. To be human.
It's a difficult choice. You must do what you think best, Data. But whatever decision you make, we will support it.
Data? What happened? The last thing I remember is jumping off a cliff.
You were knocked unconscious by the fall. You broke a bone in your arm, but Doctor Crusher repaired it. Everything is fine.
Captain's log, supplemental. The infusion of plasma into the core of Atrea Four has been accomplished. The core should remain molten for several hundred years.
When will I see you again?
Perhaps I can visit Atrea on my next leave.
I would like that very much. Well, I'd better be going.
There is something I thought you should know. My father told me that he had only one great love in his life and that he regretted never telling her how much he cared for her. I am certain he was referring to you.
That's nice to know. On Atrea there is a saying, that a child born from parents who love each other will have nothing but goodness in his heart. I guess that explains you. Take care of yourself, son.
Goodbye, Mother. Energise.
How about some different music, Computer. Something with a Latin beat. No, I meant something with a gentle Latin beat. Maybe a Spanish guitar. Perfect. Hey, what's the weather like on Risa?
Risa is climate-controlled for optimum tourist comfort,
Is that right? How long before we get there?
Arrival at Risa is scheduled for oh nine thirty two hours.
Three hours. How about a game, computer?
Please restate request.
Something to pass the time, you know, a diversion.
Select either visual interactive or verbal interactive.
Verbal.
You have twenty seconds to respond to each question. Level of difficulty will increase as you progress. Proceed when ready.
Begin.
List the resonances of the subquantum states associated with transitional relativity.
That's easy.
In alphabetical order.
Er, well, asymmetrical, inverted, phased, stable.
Your time has expired.
The fifth resonance is
LAFORGE + COMPUTER:Universal
I knew that. Okay, give me another one.
List the field patterns associated with warp modulation in order of decreasing energy.
Oh, there's the aft nacelle associative, the forward  Whoa! Computer, sequence zero one zero. Maximum power to the shields. Kill the music. Enterprise, this is shuttle seven. I've encountered a Romulan Warbird. Coordinates at three
Warning. Shield failure.
Damn. Risa Control. Anybody.
Captain's log, stardate 44891.6. The Enterprise has been ordered to accompany a special emissary from the Klingon High Council to the Kriosian System, where one of their colonies is fighting for independence.
There was a time when the Empire would crush a rebellion. Now it is tolerated. We have enough problems on the home planet. We don't wish to divert resources to such a trivial war.
You're prepared to grant them independence?
Perhaps. We'll conquer them again later, if we wish.
May I ask, Ambassador, what has this to do with us?
The Governor of Krios has charged that the Federation is secretly aiding the rebels.
Does he have evidence?
The Council has sent me here to examine that evidence. It was my decision to invite you to accompany me, Captain. Many on the Council have great respect for you.
K'adlo. I have been pleased to offer occasional assistance to the Klingon people in the past.
Your modesty is very human, Captain. I will excuse it.
I can assure you, Ambassador, the Federation would never interfere in the internal affairs of the Empire.
Let us hope not. Such interference would strike at the very basis of our alliance.
Captain, we are in the war zone.
Indeed. Ambassador, I will ask our Chief Security officer, Lieutenant Worf, to make a report
Captain, Worf's discommendation makes that very awkward. If I could work with one of the other security officers
Lieutenant Worf is my Chief of Security and my tactical officer. This matter clearly falls within his jurisdiction.
As you wish.
Hey! Hey! Hey! Hey, take it easy!  Hey.
Welcome, Mister La Forge. We've waited a long time to meet you.
I can tell you've gone to a lot of trouble.
Indeed we have. You are going to be of great help to us.
I wouldn't count on it.
Good. Very good. Do not enjoy yourself too much on Risa.
Hey!
Your visor will be returned to you, but first I want to show you something.
Show me something? That'll be an interesting trick seeing as how I can't see anything without the visor.
That is not quite true. Allow me to demonstrate. I now have direct access to his visual cortex. He has no choice but to see what I wish him to see. I can feed him any image I choose. He will be unable to ignore it. His galvanic skin response has increased nine percent. It seems Commander La Forge, like many humans, has a low tolerance for watching others suffer.
Why are you doing this?
I am sorry, Commander. It is a necessary step. I apologize for your discomfort.
Here. Observe how a spring day on his native Earth affects him. He's looking at a beautiful meadow, green trees, birds, a blue sky. The heartbeat slows, the galvanic skin response drops. The body responds to our stimuli. He is incapable of maintaining control of his own responses. Watch as I change the stimuli again. Once our work is done, La Forge will act normally, totally unaware of his conditioning. The perfect tool for our purpose.
Will there be any physical evidence of what you are doing to him?
None, Commander. That is why we chose La Forge. The utilisation of his pre-existing neural implants makes our work impossible to detect.
How will we be certain the procedure has been successful?
I will programme him to perform a series of specific tests, both before he leaves us and after he returns to the Enterprise. We'll be able to verify his effectiveness. Notice that his heart rate has slowed somewhat. He is becoming accustomed to the horrors he is witnessing. So, we change horrors.
There have been two rebel attacks on neutral freighters. One a Ferengi, the other Cardassian.
Both were engaged near the Ikalian asteroid belt. That's where the rebels must be hiding.
The actinides in the asteroids provide positive protection against our sensors.
They might attack a freighter, but I doubt they would challenge a Federation starship.
Especially with the Federation furnishing them support.
You would test the Captain's word with me, Kell? Is it because I have no honour in your eyes that you expect me to be disloyal?
Wrong of me to ask. My apologies.
Captain Picard does not lie. If he says there is no Federation assistance to the rebels, there is none.
Good. Because I risked my own reputation and honour coming to Picard.
He will not disappoint you. If that is all.
There are some members of the High Council who would thank you, Worf.
Thank me?
For killing Duras. No doubt that had he lived, one day he would ascended to head the Council. Many were not looking forward to that.
My motives were personal, not political.
Motives? Who cares for motives? Humans perhaps. What matters is you acted that day as a true Klingon.
Where are we, Mister La Forge?
This is Ten Forward.
Who is that man sitting over there?
That's Chief O'Brien.
How long has he served with you?
Almost four years.
I want you to kill him.
Okay.
Take this phaser and kill Chief O'Brien.
O'BRIEN:Finally I think I've found it. You see, this piece of conduit carrying the power to transporter seven, and I know that can't be right, so I take a closer look and sure enough
Freeze simulations. Commander, did you understand my request?
Well, I, it's just I, I don't
Look at me. Now, what did I ask you to do?
Kill Chief O'Brien.
Then do as I asked. Resume programme.
Chief.
O'BRIEN:I have to
Good, Mister La Forge. Very good. Why don't you enjoy a drink with your friends?
Mind if I join you, guys?
Sure.
He still hesitated. Prepare the equipment for another session.
Captain's log, stardate 44896.9. We are orbiting Krios, awaiting our first meeting with the Klingon Governor. Commander La Forge has rejoined the Enterprise from Risa.
Welcome back, Geordi.
Data!
How was the seminar?
Very informative. I'll tell you all about it.
It is fortunate we were able to coordinate your return on the Teldarian cruiser.
Yeah, when I heard the Enterprise had been ordered to the Krios system, I thought I might be forced to endure another couple of weeks on Risa.
I am sorry to hear you did not enjoy yourself.
I was joking.
Joking? Ah. Forced to endure Risa. Your actual intent was to emphasise that you did enjoy yourself. Yes, I see how that could be considered quite amusing.
I missed you, Data.
Commander La Forge.
Permission to come aboard, sir.
Granted. Welcome back.
Thank you, sir.
Commander La Forge is my Chief Engineer.
Commander.
He's has been attending a seminar on artificial intelligence on Risa.
I'm glad we got you back, Geordi. We're going to need your help on this.
Data tells me that the Federation has been accused of aiding Kriosian rebels.
We're to be presented with evidence today. We'll need your help in analysing it.
Anything I can do.
You had a good time.
Does it show?
You're more relaxed than I've ever seen you.
Captain, Governor Vagh has signalled he is ready to meet with you.
Very well. Advise him that we will transport sown to the surface immediately. Ambassador.
Commander Riker.
What is it, Data?
Our sensors have detected a brief energy fluctuation in the E-band.
E-band? That's unusual. What's the source?
Unknown, sir. E-band emissions are difficult to localise.
Collapsing protostars sometimes emit E-band bursts.
Yes, sir. However, there are no protostars in this sector.
You'd better run a complete scan. Keep me posted.
Yes, sir.
The Carnelians have actually done the most work on artificial intelligence, so I spent a lot of time in their research seminars.
Geordi, I get the feeling that something special happened on this vacation, and I'm not talking about computers.
Well, I did take second place in a chess tournament.
Yes.
And I swam a lot. I worked on my back stroke. The water is very calm on Risa.
And?
And I walked a lot. That's all. Well, I ate enough for twelve people. The food there is terrific. They've got a chocolate there, Counsellor, you would love.
And that's all?
Yeah. Well, there was this
Yes?
Her name is Jonek. But you wouldn't want to hear about that. Better get ready for duty. Nice talking to you, Counsellor.
We talk, we socialise, we waste time and the insurrection continues to grow. These rebels need to be crushed not coddled.
Governor, it does not matter what you or I think. The High Council's made its wishes clear.
The Council should be more interested in Federation interference.
Governor, exactly what do you think the Federation has done?
Your medical supplies have been found in rebel strongholds.
We make no effort to restrict access to our medical supplies.
Are your weapons also freely available?
No, they are not.
Then explain this.
You took this weapon from the rebels?
That and many more like it.
It does appear to be Federation issue.
Governor, with your permission, I would like to take this weapon back to the Enterprise to verify its origin.
As you wish. I have hundreds more.
Even if these weapons are genuine, I can assure you that a third party must have been involved. The Federation is not in the business of supplying arms to rebels.
This is the only Klingon colony on the border of Federation space. You cannot deny that Starfleet would be happy to see Krios gain its independence. It would reduce your vulnerability to an attack.
Governor, you speak as if we are enemies, not allies.
And you speak the lies of a taar'chek.
Qu'vath guy'cha b'aka.
Gentlemen.
You swear well, Picard. You must have Klingon blood in your veins.
Governor, I will report to you as soon as the analysis of that weapon is complete. Captain, Commander.
Enterprise, three to transport.
Intercooler flux down to five percent. Plasma deviation steady at point seven two.
Aye, sir.
Well, if you guys keep running at this efficiency, I might as well go back to Risa for another week. Just run through a level four series, and then call it a night, huh? I'd help you, but there's something I've got to take care of.
Red Torian, please.  Thank you.
Oh! I'm sorry.
O'BRIEN:It's all right.
My glass, it just slipped.
O'BRIEN:It's nothing, just a little cold.
Yeah, but you're all soaked here.
O'BRIEN:It's nothing serious.
Let me get you something to wipe that off with.
O'BRIEN:I'll just go to my quarters and change.
You sure?
O'BRIEN:Don't think twice about it, Commander.
Energy flow is within normal parameters, from the pre-fire chamber to the emission aperture.
Rapid nadion pulse, right on target. Beam control assembly, safety interlock, both checked out. Beam width intensity controls also responding correctly.
Energy cell usage remains constant at one point oh five megajoules per second. Curious. The efficiency reading on the discharge crystal is well above Starfleet specifications.
Yeah, by quite a bit. Ninety four point one percent efficiency.
Our most efficient discharge crystal typically fires with eighty six point five percent efficiency.
Let's take a closer look at the wave pattern on the emission beam. That might tell us why it's losing so little energy.
Pulse frequency out of pre-fire chamber reads steady.
There. That's not right. The initial output spike is inverted.
That might suggest that the weapon has been charged with a forced pulse, well into the terahertz range.
Then it's definitely not Starfleet issue and there can't be that many systems that use the terahertz feeds.
Three hundred twenty seven, to our knowledge. We can probably achieve an exact match with a random computer search. It will take approximately three hours.
I think we could narrow this down with a little common sense, Data. Who has the most to gain from a conflict between the Klingon Empire and the Federation?
The Romulans. They fashioned a perfect Federation rifle but they had to charge it from their energy sources. So the discharge crystal and the emission beam pattern correspond to those you'd find in a Romulan disrupter.
The Romulans have no interest in Kriosian independence. The planet is too far from their borders.
But they do have an interest in driving the Federation and the Empire apart. Our alliance is the only thing that has kept them in check.
Romulan replications using stolen Federation technology?
It's a typical Romulan ploy. An attempt to sow dissension and mistrust. Commander, you've done well. I would thank you on behalf of the Empire.
I still have my doubts, Picard. I will want my own technicians to confirm your findings.
Of course. My staff will give you their full cooperation.
You may go.
Another E-band blip?
Yes, sir. However, the difference in intensity indicates that this one did not originate from the same location as the first.
If it's changed intensity, it can't possibly be a protostar.
That is a reasonable assumption.
Is there any known instance of Romulans using E-band communications?
Not to my knowledge, sir.
Can you track the source?
We can reconfigure the primary sensor array. If we narrow their focus to scan for E-band emissions, we might be able to calculate a directional vector. But only if there are more occurrences.
Do it.
Computer re-route the power flow in the cargo bay four transporter to the auxiliary replicator system.
Please verify command with necessary protocol.
Initiate protocol three six four dash B.
Verify priority clearance.
Recognise La Forge, theta two nine nine seven.
Acknowledged. Power has been re-routed through auxiliary power distribution system code number four four seven six two.
Now, redirect transporter mode to the planetary sensor array.
Transporter mode has been redirected.
Verify that all record of these modifications are being erased from each directory.
Affirmative. Erasure process is proceeding.
Sir, we are being hailed by Governor Vagh.
On screen, Mister Worf. Governor.
You astonish me, Picard. Did you seriously believe you would succeed? Do you think we are blind?
I don't understand.
We intercepted the weapons you tried to transport to the surface.
Governor, I assure you
Do not insult us both by denying it. Maintain your position until further notice. Do not attempt to leave orbit.
Klingon attack cruiser uncloaking, sir.
On screen.
Two birds of prey approaching.
Sensors confirm an unauthorised transporter beam at eleven twenty three hours.
Do you know which transporter was used?
I'm not sure, Captain. Whoever did it apparently used the planetary array to bypass the transport sensors.
What about the transporter logs?
They're blank.
How many people on board are capable of doing this, Geordi?
I'm not even sure how it was done yet. As soon as I find out, maybe I can give you an answer. Not many, that's for sure.
Vagh is fully prepared to fire upon the Enterprise. I have convinced him it would not be wise to take any action without first consulting the High Council.
How long do we have?
A few hours at most.
Mister La Forge, your recommendations?
It might be possible to locate the point of origin by tracing power flows at the time of transport.
Make it so.
The primary plasma system does not indicate a power drain from any of the transporters.
Then whoever used the transporter must have bypassed the primary feeds.
Tracking power from secondary systems. No surges to any of the transporters indicated.
Damn, who could have pulled this off? Try the life-support power flows.
No abnormal surges indicated.
Replicator waveguides? There. That's not a replicator energy pattern. Trace it.
Cargo bay four.
La Forge to Worf. Security to cargo bay four.
O'BRIEN:I've run a level one diagnostic. As far as I can tell, the unit hasn't been tampered with.
This has to be the transfer point.
Perhaps the perpetrator reprogrammed the memory chips to erase any record.
O'BRIEN:You're talking about thirty or forty chips in half a dozen different control systems.
Which members of the crew could have accomplished that?
I think I could have done it, if I put my mind to it. The Chief, Data, Lieutenant Costa, that's about it.
Procedure requires that I ask each of you where you were at eleven twenty three hours.
O'BRIEN:I was with Keiko, in the Arboretum.
I was on the Bridge at my station.
I was in my quarters.
Was anyone with you?
No, I was alone. Costa was on duty in Engineering. I'm sure he's got twenty witnesses.
Then there is someone on board who isn't what he or she seems to be.
Data, let's do a detailed scan on every chip in this assembly. There's got to be some kind of trail we can follow.
The isolinear chips were definitely altered?
Programmed to erase all operator commands once the transfer was complete.
But with the chips erased, what evidence remained?
The erasures were complete. However, an analysis of the subatomic structure revealed an almost undetectable residual pattern. In time, we may be able to reconstruct the perpetrator's authorisation code.
Do you have any idea who's responsible?
No, sir. Everyone with the necessary skills also has an alibi, except for me, that is. I was alone in my quarters at the time.
Then whoever did this must have been specially trained for the task.
Our forensic team is trying to identify anyone who might have been in cargo bay four today.
It's not going to be easy. There were a lot of people in and out of there.
Riker to Data.
Yes, Commander.
Sensors have picked up another E-band emission.
Acknowledged, I will be there shortly.
E-band emission?
We have been picking up a curious intermittent blip. Commander Riker has speculated that it may be a Romulan transmission. I am attempting to track its source.
Proceed. Thank you, Mister La Forge.
We do not have much time, Picard. Vagh is not known for his patience.
Assure him that we are doing everything possible. And, advise him that if necessary I will defend my ship.
With your permission, I will transport down to the planet.
Of course.
May I suggest that you issue an invitation to Vagh, to personally witness your continuing investigation.
Do you think he will come?
I will do everything in my power to see that he does. Qapla', Picard.
Qapla', Ambassador.
Come in, Mister La Forge.
The investigation is moving faster than we expected. You are in danger of being exposed. I will transport to the surface. When I return, I'll have Governor Vagh with me. Your Captain and I will bring him to the cargo bay. I want you to kill him there, in front of many witnesses. Use a hand phaser. When he is dead, you will claim that you acted on behalf of Starfleet, in support of Kriosian independence.
I understand.
La Forge to O'Brien. O'Brien?
O'BRIEN:Go ahead, Commander, what can I do for you?
Nothing. Chief, I'm sorry to disturb you. I'm sorry.
Hiya, Doc.
Geordi, hi. What can I do for you?
Well, I just can't seem to get any sleep. I was hoping you could give me something.
Sit down. Let's take a look. You couldn't sleep at all?
I was restless. I kept waking up.
Would you take off your visor, please?
Sure.
Is there something on your mind?
No, I don't think so.
Well, everybody goes through these occasional bouts of insomnia. There's probably nothing to worry about. Let's just make sure there's nothing physically wrong. There's a minor vascular irregularity in the visual cortex. A slight dilation of the blood vessels. It's nothing serious. What about your visor? Has it been giving you any problems lately?
Nothing out of the ordinary.
All the same, it might be a good idea to have it examined when we get to Starbase thirty six next month.
Okay.
In the meantime, I will get you a somnetic inducer to put by your bed. It'll help you to sleep.
Thanks, Doc. I'm sure I'll be fine.
Energise.
Governor Vagh, thank you for coming.
You can thank Ambassador Kell. I am here against my better judgment.
Captain, I think the first thing the Governor should see is the investigation underway in the cargo bay.
Of course.
From inside the Enterprise? You're sure?
The first and third E-band blips were clearly generated on board the ship. The second came from the planet surface.
Generated by what?
Unknown, sir.
Mister Data, we have a known spy on board and now we have unexplained signals on board. I think it's reasonable to assume that they're related somehow, wouldn't you?
One could speculate that the E-band is being used for some form of covert communication.
We need more than speculation, Mister Data. We need to know who, what, where, when and why, or we may be going to war.
Yes, sir. Computer, run an analysis of all known Romulan transmission formats, all bands, Identify any commonalities with displayed waveform.
No commonalities noted.
Does this waveform match that of any known communication format?
Negative.
Broaden search pattern beyond communications. Does the waveform displayed conform to any natural phenomena, cryptographic formats or lifeform EM emissions?
The signal corresponds to a delta compressed wavelength spectrum similar to human neural frequencies.
As in a human brainwave pattern?
Affirmative.
What kind of receiver would be capable of processing these signals?
A system designed to modify the electromagnetic spectrum and carry those messages directly to the human brain.
Computer, link with the shuttle's onboard system. Access the isolinear storage assembly. Scan all chips which contain mission logs. Note any discrepancies.
No discrepancies noted.
Perform a level 5 diagnostic on the shuttle's power and navigational systems.
The components specified are all within normal tolerances.
O'BRIEN:My technicians have examined all of the ship's transporters, sir. I can assure you, this is the only unit that has been tampered with.
Computer, scan the shuttle's structural integrity.
Sub-microscopic deformations are present in the nose section and aft thrusters.
Probable cause of these variations?
The shuttle has been subjected to stress consistent with a tractor beam.
All our transporter containers have a slight impurity in the structural alloys which allows us to trace our material.
O'BRIEN:Commander La Forge?
What can I do for you, Chief?
O'BRIEN:Could you take a look at the pattern buffers? Considering what's happened, I'm not sure the control systems are reliable.
Sure. Sure, let's take a look.
Computer, I am reading anomalous variations in the molecular structure of these memory chips. Please confirm.
Analysis confirmed.
Probable cause?
Replication.
Compare these variations with established Romulan replication patterns.
The patterns are identical.
Maybe we should run a level one diagnostic on those phase transition coils.
O'BRIEN:Right, Commander.
Data to La Forge.
Report, please. Geordi.
Please respond.
Computer, current location of Commander La Forge?
Cargo bay four.
Data to Lieutenant Worf.
Priority One.
Go ahead.
Take Commander La Forge into custody immediately.
Sir?
That is an order.
DNA samples by tracing biochemical signatures, we'll be able to determine who has been in this bay recently.
But how will it be possible to prove which one was responsible?
Q'ac ken ta'vak!
La Forge!
Mister Worf, get him out of here.
Arming our enemies is not enough. Now the Federation would murder me to achieve its aims.
Governor, if I could explain this I would.
I believe I can help, Captain. I have been able to determine that Commander La Forge was abducted by Romulans en route to Risa. It is likely that he was somehow forced to take part in the plot to assassinate Governor Vagh.
I saw no evidence of Romulans. We just witnessed him acting very much alone.
No, sir, you did not. I do not believe the Commander is acting of his own accord. He has been receiving E-band signals through his visor. Signals which are carrying direct commands to his brain. I have surmised that Commander La Forge was conditioned by Romulans, a process referred to historically, and somewhat inaccurately, as brainwashing.
But to what end? Why would the Romulans want to kill me?
The Romulans have always wanted to destroy the alliance between the Federation and the Klingons. If Mister La Forge had killed you, Governor, I think you would agree, they might have succeeded.
Who sent these signals? A cloaked Romulan ship?
No, sir. That is not possible. The signals had to be transmitted within close proximity to the visor.
Are you suggesting there was a Romulan accomplice in close proximity to La Forge when he was receiving the signals?
Yes, sir, I am.
This Romulan accomplice, who is he?
I have narrowed the list of possibilities to two people. The only two people who were with Commander La Forge all three times a transmission was recorded. Captain Picard and Ambassador Kell. One of them may be concealing an E-band transmitter. If they would agree to be searched
I am a Klingon. An emissary of the High Council. I will not be submit to being searched by you or anyone else on this ship.
I am forced to agree, Captain. We will take the Ambassador with us and search him ourselves.
Captain, I believe it to be in all best interests if I remain on board. I formally request asylum.
I will certainly grant you asylum, when you have been absolved of this crime.
Gurt'ank te'la.
But I remember everything! Like, there was this one night at dinner, we had this Andorian waiter, he couldn't get our orders right. It did happen. I remember being on Risa.
I know you do. Just take that memory and put it aside for a moment, and tell me everything you remember about the shuttlecraft trip after you left the Enterprise.
Well, I was just trying to get in the mood. I played some music, I talked to the computer. You know what it's like on a long trip.
And when you saw the Romulan ship, did you try calling for help?
No, the first thing I did. Wait a minute, that's. But that's
It'll take time, Geordi. A long time. But we will reconstruct your memory. Together.
I'm just not sure about anything.
Believe it or not, that's a good sign. A beginning. Now, let's go back to the shuttlecraft. There was a Romulan ship and the first thing you did was?
Tarchannen Three Investigation. Stardate 40164.7. Ensign Anthony Brevelle recording. Lieutenant Susanna Leijten in command.
You up and running, Brevelle?
Yes, Lieutenant.
I've checked buildings four and five. Just like all the others. No phaser hits, no sign of a fight. It's like the entire outpost just vanished.
Lieutenant Leijten, you'd better come see this. No footprints, no vehicle tracks. The wind probably erased them. But look.
Freeze visual.
That's Hickman on the right, Mendez on the left, and as already noted, the recording was made by Ensign Brevelle five years ago.
Commander Leijten, you said that before Brevelle deserted Starbase one one two last week, he'd been ill for several days. What about Mendez?
Mendez was seen on the Aries an hour before she disappeared. According to witnesses, she seemed completely normal.
And Hickman?
He just passed a routine physical on Alia Four with flying colours.
No, wait, I know Paul Hickman. He's a family man, he's got two kids. He wouldn't steal a shuttle and desert.
Geordi, he was spotted by a Federation supply ship yesterday, on course to Tarchannen three.
The original Tarchannen disappearances were never solved, were they?
No, we never learned what happened or why. Forty nine people gone.
And five years later, the away team that was investigating their disappearances have started to disappear themselves.
Geordi and I are the only two left.
Captain's log, stardate 44664.5. We've set a course to intercept Lieutenant Hickman's stolen shuttlecraft, and, hopefully, to discover the whereabouts of the other missing officers.
And then I almost married Paul Bogrow.
Bogrow? Bogrow, now which one was he?
You remember. The one with the thin moustache.
Oh, not Bogrow.
I know.
The one who always used to drive you crazy? You always thought he was so full of himself.
Well, I decided I had prejudged him unfairly. And then I decided that I'd been right in the first place.
Bogrow.
What about you?
I enjoy the bachelor's life too much.
That doesn't sound like my little brother who always wanted advice on women.
Well, obviously you were a great advisor.  Well, Suz, what do you think?
I don't know. But I'm not ashamed to tell you I'm a little scared, you know?
Yeah, I know.
Well, if anybody's going to figure this out, it'll be the Leitjen and La Forge Show, right?
Yeah.
We always made a good team.
A hell of a team.
Commander La Forge, Commander Leijten, report to the Bridge. We have a fix on the missing shuttle.
On our way, Commander.
Entering the Tarchannen system, sir.
Slow to impulse power. Mister Worf?
Long range sensors holding on the shuttlecraft, bearing zero one zero, mark two seven one.
Hail the vessel.
Lieutenant Hickman does not respond, sir.
Put a repeating message on all subspace channels. Order the Lieutenant to come about and stand to. Make it a priority one communiqu.
Still no response, sir.
The craft is now within visual range.
On screen.
The shuttle's acceleration is increasing. Its trajectory is moving directly into the planet's atmosphere. He will reach an atmospheric interface at an altitude of two hundred and ten kilometres.
If he stays at that speed, he'll self-destruct.
That is correct, Commander.
How soon, Mister Data?
Fifty three seconds, sir.
Options?
He's out of transporter range.
He's still too far away to get a positive lock with the tractor beam, Captain.
Open a channel.
Open.
Lieutenant Hickman, listen carefully. This is Captain Picard of the Enterprise. You are in danger. You must slow your rate of approach.
The shuttle is approaching the outer thermosphere, Captain.
He's panicking.
At current rate of acceleration, the shuttle will be destroyed in twenty eight seconds.
Sixteen seconds to impact.
Lieutenant Hickman, you must do what I tell you. Reduce your velocity and bring your craft to a positive pitch of twenty degrees, now.
The shuttle's entering the lower ionosphere, sir.
Captain, sensors detect two more Federation shuttlecraft on the planet surface. No life signs.
Number One, prepare your away team.
Worf, Data, Geordi.
I'd like to volunteer to join you, sir.
Commander.
Commander Leijten, Geordi, check out the shuttle. Data, Worf, you've got the perimeter.
It's the shuttlepod Mendez stole from the Aries.
No life signs, Commander.
Sir, I am certain we are being watched.
Commander Riker. Found it in the shuttle.  Where's Commander Leijten?
Riker to Susanna, report. Fan out. Let's find her.
Susanna! La Forge to Leijten.
Over here.
Where have you been?
Mendez and Brevelle are alive. You saw the footprints?
Yeah, but they're not human.
They're here. Just stand still and listen. You can feel it. They're here.
I'm not picking up anything. Wait a minute. Where are you going? Susanna?
Stay away.
Suz?
La Forge to Enterprise, medical emergency. Two to Sickbay.
Do I look as bad as I feel?
You look fine, now.
What happened?
Your blood chemistry is way off. You had a histamine response, to what I don't know. I'm going to run a complete blood and tissue analysis.
I need to get back to the surface.
Until we have some answers, I don't want you to leave the Enterprise.
I have work to do.
Look, Commander, you may have just had an anxiety reaction down there, but I've got to know for sure.
Might not be such a bad idea to take it easy for a while.
I'm not going to stay locked up on this ship while the investigation's going on.
Your devotion to duty is admirable, Commander, but Doctor Crusher is right. You will remain on the Enterprise until we know whether or not this is connected to the disappearance of the others.
Captain.
We have completed our survey on the surface. Analysing that data will keep us busy for a while.
Yes, sir. I understand.
Data's got a preliminary report, if you're up to it.
Sure. Let's get going.
What about La Forge?
I gave him a complete bioscan. The results say he's in perfect shape.
That's what the reports said about Mendez and Hickman before they disappeared.
Captain Picard's wrong. The way to handle this is to get back down there with a dozen away teams, fan out from the shuttle, we could cover a lot of ground in a hurry. Use proximity detectors, infrared sensors.
Susanna.
Oh, Geordi, it's started. What if what happened to the others is happening to me?
You don't know that. Suz, I'm here, and I'm not going to let anything happen to you, okay? Okay, come on.
During microscopic examination of the torn uniform, I discovered these alien skin cells.
Source?
Undetermined.
Without something else to cross-reference, it would take us weeks to try and identify them.
Fortunately, we have more evidence. We were able to determine that these footprints found near the shuttle were not made by any known Tarchannen life form.
If we're pursuing a theory that somehow unknown aliens are involved, I think I should tell you that we didn't find tracks like that during the original investigation.
The planet is subject to frequent sandstorms. Footprints might have been obliterated prior to your arrival. Doctor Crusher and I will begin to search the medical database in an attempt to match these with some known life form.
Aliens or no aliens, why would our people start returning after five years, to be abducted?
Some sort of compulsion like a post-hypnotic command?
Something that happened while we were down there the first time?
We can go back to the mission record, construct a log of everyone's movements.
Look for some commonality, something we all touched. Maybe a plant, or the sand.
Or even something we ingested. It could even be in the air itself.
The parameters are pretty broad, Data. Any match we make is going to be inconclusive at best.
I am aware of that, Doctor. However, I can see no other reasonable course of investigation available to us. And we may not have much time.
You're worried about Geordi, aren't you?
I am an android. It is not possible
for you to feel anxiety.
Starfleet personnel have vanished. Others may be at risk. We must do the best we can to find out why. However, I am strongly motivated to solve this mystery.
Freeze visuals.
We're wasting our time.
That's not how you felt before. It was your idea to look for some sort of commonality.
Yeah, well, I was wrong. We're not going to find anything this way. We should go back to the planet. It's all down there. Everything we need to know.
That's just not an option. At least, not until Captain Picard says it is. Computer, resume.
I can't look at that anymore. It hurts my eyes. I can't think. My brain feels like it's wrapped up in a blanket.
Take a break, all right? I'll work on this.
I don't need a break. I need to get off the ship.
Susanna, why don't we go and see Doctor Crusher?
Forget Crusher and forget your logs. Tarchannen's down there, Geordi. It's waiting for us. That's where we should go.
Susanna, you can't leave. Susanna. Susanna!
Geordi!
Her blood pressure's still falling. Apply the T-cell stimulator. We have got to stabilise her immune system.
She has developed an extreme sensitivity to light. We're trying to make her as comfortable as we can.
Oh, God.
Geordi?
Susanna, hold on, okay? Doctor Crusher will help you, so just hold on.
It's inside of me, Geordi. I can't fight it. It's winning.
Don't give up. Do you hear me? You can't give up, Suz.
This is one of Susanna's altered skin cells, and this is one of the alien cells Data found.
They're almost identical. How do you explain that?
Jean-Luc, I think the people from Tarchannen Three who disappeared weren't abducted. I think they were transformed into another species.
Can you stop it, Doctor?
The T-cell stimulator will slow the rate of change, but until I find the cause.
Is the Enterprise at risk?
No. I checked the cell wall integrity. It's viability is extremely low. I don't think it's possible for Susanna to transmit it.
Then how did she get it?
I wish I knew. The only thing I do know, Geordi, is that it's very possible that you'll be next.
But I had two full bioscans today. You said I was fine.
I gave Susanna a bioscan, too. I didn't find anything wrong with her, either.
How long?
Brevelle was sick for days before he left. Mendez was normal an hour before she disappeared. You may have weeks or very few hours.
Then there's not much time to waste. I should get back to work.
Geordi, until I know what we're dealing with, I think you should stay here, in Sickbay.
Doctor, you said it would help if you knew the source of this. If I can continue my analysis of the mission records, I might find an answer.
Mister La Forge, what if you begin to change? What if you feel compelled to go down to the planet like the others?
Programme the computer to monitor my movements. That way we can be sure that I don't leave the ship. What would you do, Captain? Would you sit it out here in Sickbay or try to learn what it is that's got you and maybe stop it?
Very well, Mister La Forge. You proceed with your investigation, but I want you to report to Doctor Crusher for a bioscan at the start of day watch.
Aye, sir.
And Geordi, if you have symptoms of any kind, I want to know immediately.
Understood.
One to transport.
I want to make another sweep of the perimeter. La Forge, you start at building four. Mendez and Brevelle begin at two. I'll take five.
All right, computer. Analyse audio elements from time index fourteen four seven to fifteen five eight. List all anomalies.
No audio anomalies present.
Any subspace projections, z-particle emissions, interferometric frequencies?
No subspace projections present. No z-particle emissions present. No interferometric patterns present.
Damn.
Geordi. May I inquire how your investigation is proceeding?
It's not.
Have you attempted an audio analysis?
Yes, Data. And a spectrographic analysis, and a screen for ionising radiation. I even ran an enhancement for micro-seismic disturbances. I've tried it all, okay? I'm sorry, Data.
There is no need for an apology. Perhaps if you indulged in a brief rest period, you would be able to approach this problem with a fresh point of view.
Yeah, you're probably right, Data, but I've got to keep scanning these records while I can.
May I can assist you?
If I knew what I was looking for. Rally, Data, I think it's just a matter of me going over it, maybe finding something I forgot. I'll let you know if I come across anything, all right? All right, computer, one more time.
Sorry to disturb you, Doctor.
That's all right. What's happened?
I thought you should see this.
Her skin is simulating light. A radiant reaction. Some sort of mimetic ability?
That's not all. Her body temperature is dropping.
It's as if she's generating a disruptive field. I can barely get any readings off her now. What's her rate of transformation?
It's increasing.
That's not possible. It should have been inhibited by the T-cell stimulator. Unless. If there's a foreign body inside her that's producing these changes, something like a viral crche.
A very small one if our scans haven't found it.
I want a full genetic analysis. We're going to examine any abnormality we find no matter how insignificant it seems.
One to transport.
Computer, delete the audio.
Wait a minute. Freeze visual. Whose shadow is that?
Please restate question.
Computer, the shadow currently displayed in section B three, what is its source?
Unknown.
Come on, it's got to belong to somebody. Computer, replay a visual of the last time index. No audio, and slow to fifty percent. Okay, Brevelle's behind the camera ,Susanna and I head off in that direction. Mendez moves off that way. Freeze visual. Now, magnify four times, and spectrally enhance those shadows.  Computer, do you have sufficient data to compile a holographic simulation of this visual record?
A simulation would be limited to areas scanned by the visual recording device.
Good, fine. Scan the entire record and then recreate it on holodeck three.
Computer, is the Tarchannen simulation ready?
Affirmative. Programme complete. Enter when ready.
Computer, scan Starfleet records and create a simulation of Brevelle. Place him where he was while recording this. Okay, good. Computer, based on their speed and direction, can you extrapolate each officer's movements as they walk out of the recording device's field of view?
Affirmative, with an increasing probability of error reaching ninety five percent after ten seconds.
Understood. Run simulation.
HOLO-SUZ:I want to make another sweep of the perimeter. La Forge, you start at building four. Mendez and Brevelle, you begin at two. I'll take five.
Computer, freeze. It's all happening too fast. Computer, reverse simulation. Run it back to time index fourteen seven two.
Freeze programme. Computer, remove La Forge. And now remove Leitjen. And now remove Mendez.
Computer, using vector analysis, identify the source of this shadow.
There is no object in the programme which could generate the shadow.
There has to be something between the camera light and this wall. Computer, given the distance between the light and the wall, can you determine the most likely shape and position of the object causing this shadow?
There is insufficient data to reconstruct the requested object.
All right, let's say that my friend and I here are about the same size, say one pint seven metres. Now, can you extrapolate its shape and its position?
Affirmative.
Do it.
There, in the thymus. Some sort of parasite. It's using Susanna's immune system to spread genetic instructions.
How did it get there?
She could have become infected during the original mission. It's small enough to have entered through any of the mucous membranes. But it certainly isn't behaving like a typical parasite. It isn't feeding off of her. It's transforming her DNA to match its own.
There's not much of her original DNA left.
And we're going to need unaltered genes or we'll never get her back. We've got to get that thing out of her now.
Any luck?
Negative, Commander. Nothing in our survey suggests the source of a parasitic infection.
Crusher to Bridge.
Go ahead, Doctor.
The surgery was successful
But it's going to be a few more hours before we know how her regenerative systems are responding. In the meantime, we'd better get Commander La Forge down here.
Very well, Doctor, keep us informed.
Crusher to La Forge. Computer, locate Commander La Forge.
Commander La Forge is not on board the Enterprise.
Bridge, the Computer says Commander La Forge is no longer on board. Is that correct?
I am showing no transporter activity.
All shuttles are secure.
Negative. There's no indication that he's left the ship.
Computer, what was the last known location of Commander La Forge?
Holodeck three.
Captain, if Geordi has transformed, he may be virtually a chameleon.
The skin develops mimetic capabilities. He may still be on board, but undetectable to our sensors.
You search the structure. I will take the perimeter.
Commander.
Geordi's uniform.
Security. We have an intruder in transporter room six. Argh.
Captain, the security lockout on Transporter room six has been broken.
Re-engage now.
I cannot, sir. The transporter cycle has already begun.
Captain's log, stardate 44668.1. Doctor Crusher's research indicates that we have less than an hour before Commander La Forge's transformation becomes irreversible. However, all attempts to locate him on the surface have failed.
I do not read any life signs on the surface.
Our sensor array is useless. We must find some other way of locating him.
Captain, if we can get close enough to Geordi, we can read his absorption spectrum with an ultraviolet light.
Can you modify an emergency beacon to operate on UV?
Yes, sir.
Make it so. Number One, as soon as Data is ready, I want you to lead an away team.
Aye, sir.
How long, Data?
I must replace the emitter module and reconnect the power supply. It will take approximately two minutes to complete the modification, sir.
Hedrick to Commander Riker.
Go ahead.
I've been able to determine La Forge's transport coordinates. He beamed down next to the Aries shuttle.
Acknowledged. He's on foot, couldn't have gotten too far. Let's assume a radius of ten kilometres.
That still leaves a search area of more than three hundred square kilometres.
We've got to narrow that down. What's happening with the enhanced sensor arrays?
All scans are still negative.
We've got to find a way to track him. What about the high-resolution EM scans?
We are adjusting sensors to read Commander La Forge's absorption spectrum, but it will take several hours.
Geordi doesn't have several hours.
I have completed modifications, Commander.
Excellent. Doctor Crusher, meet us in Transporter room six immediately.
He's going to need a sedative. Give me ten cc's of kayolane.
Doctor Crusher.
Say, you look a lot better than you did an hour ago.
What did you do?
We've removed some kind of parasite from your thymus.
No, no, no. It's not a parasite, Doctor. It was their method of reproduction, to plant a DNA strand in a living host that causes metamorphosis. Geordi? He's gone?
Yes.
He's gone back to the planet?
Try to stay calm.
No, but we have to find him.
An away team is preparing to search for him.
You'll never be able to find him. I'm the only one who can.
No, you must turn them off. The light frightens them.
What about the ultraviolet?
That's beyond their visual spectrum. They won't run away from it.
He could be several kilometres away by now.
No, he's here. They're all here.
There.
Geordi?
Geordi, stop!
No, wait.
Geordi? Geordi, my voice is familiar. Listen to it. You can feel that we share this. You know I'm not a threat. The others, Mendez, Brevelle, they don't exist as humans any more, but a part of you still does. You're not one of them yet, Geordi. I can help you if you'll just trust me. I know what's going on inside of you, the war you're fighting with yourself. Your humanity slipping away. The instinct to run, it's overpowering, but they know how to beat it now, Geordi. Look at me! I've come back, Geordi. Let me take you back, too. Just take my hand. Please.
Crusher to Enterprise. Lock on to Commander Leitjen's signal. Prepare to beam two directly to Sickbay.
We're going home, Geordi.
Is there no hope for Brevelle or Mendez?
None.
Susanna.
I'm right here, Geordi, and so are Doctor Crusher and Captain Picard.
Here's your visor, Geordi.
Lieutenant Commander La Forge reporting for duty, Captain.
Welcome back, Mister La Forge.
Geordi, this species, can you communicate with it?
No. They act on instinct alone. In another few minutes, I wouldn't have responded to you, Susanna.
Then we will leave them be. I'll order warning beacons placed in orbit and on the surface. Hopefully, no one else will have to go through what you did.
You know, down there, I didn't know who you were, and yet somehow I believed you, I trusted you.
Must've been because of all the good advice I used to give you.
Thanks.
SS Tsiolkovsky, repeat your message.
Well hello, Enterprise. Welcome. I hope you have a lot of pretty boys on board, because i'm willing and waiting. In fact, we're going to have a real blow-out here.
Do it! Yeah, go ahead. Do it!
Captain, what we just heard is impossible.
Report.
I believe that last sound we heard was an emergency hatch being blown.
Are you certain? Yes, of course you are.
Data, Geordi, Tasha.
Sensor scan now reveals no life signs aboard, Captain.
Cover the ship as planned. Move out.
Indications of what humans would call a wild party?
Their Bridge. If this thing works, be sure to record everything.
You were right. Somebody blew the hatch. They were all sucked out into space.
Correction, sir, that's blown out.
Thank you, Data.
A common mistake, sir,
Commander Riker, Lieutenant Yar. Location Engineering. Ten people here, sir, all frozen. No vital signs.
Frozen? How?
It looks like someone has been playing with the environmental controls, sir. Just let all the heat bleed away into space.
Sir, Lieutenant La Forge in the crew quarters. Something in here.
Riker to Captain, I have a report for you, sir.
Picard here.
They're all dead.
Apparently some of them were apparently blown out the emergency hatches.
But there were eighty people on that ship, Number One.
Yes sir.
As I said, all dead.
Captain's log, supplemental. We are downloading the research information gathered on the collapsing star nearby. I am concerned at being in such close orbit, but the Tsiolkovsky's research records will no doubt predict the time of the star's final collapse.
I can't find anything unusual in any of the tricorder readings they've sent over, Captain.
Give me a theory, Doctor. Anything. Madness? Mass hysteria? Delusion?
Any or all, Captain.
All right. Let's bring the away team back. Set the transporter to maximum decontamination, and then full examination and observation when they're here.
If you were any more perfect, Data, I'd write you up in a Starfleet medical textbook.
I am already listed in several bio-mechanical texts, Doctor.
Yes of course. You're next, Lieutenant.
Normal all across. Except, why are you perspiring, Lieutenant?
I suppose because you have it too hot in here. What else would it be?
That doesn't sound like you, Geordi.
Well, maybe it's not. Maybe she threw her voice. Hey, it was a joke.
Of course, but I would like to run one or two more tests on you, Lieutenant.
Sickbay to Bridge,
Picard here. Go ahead, Doctor.
I'm confining Lieutenant La Forge to Sickbay until further notice.
Do we have a problem, Doctor?
I don't know yet.
Data, I need help in locating some library computer information.
Specifics, sir?
All I have is a vague memory of reading somewhere about someone taking a shower in his or her clothing.
Ah. The body Geordi discovered.
I believe it may have happened before.
To someone, somewhere.
This ought to be easy for someone written up in bio-mechanical texts.
About that, sir. Did the Doctor believe I was boasting?
Probably. This may take some time.
At least several hours. But what I said was a statement of fact. Perhaps she will look it up.
You can depend on it.
Geordi!
Security. Lieutenant La Forge just left Sickbay while I was in my office.
He doesn't have his communicator. It is very important that we find him.
Security team alert, pick up Lieutenant La Forge. He just left Sickbay moments ago. Captain, anything further?
Affirmative. Make it a ship-wide search, Lieutenant.
It's a model of the same kind of tractor beam our ship uses with a few ideas of my own added.
So that's your science project, huh? Wes, you're really something.
And since the Captain won't let me on the Bridge, I use this to imagine I'm there.
Take the helm, Mister Crusher. Set a course for thirty seven mark one hundred eighty. Warp six.
It's the Captain's voice.
It's pieced together from words he's used on the intercom. With this, I can pretend he's ordering me to take the Enterprise anywhere. And listen to this,
Chief Engineer, report to the Bridge. Commander Riker, report to the Bridge. Doctor Crusher, report to the Bridge.
What do you think?
I think the Captain's lucky you're on his side.
But he still won't let me on the Bridge. And there's nothing there I don't understand.
I wish I understood myself that well.
Are you okay?
No, Suddenly I seem to be burning up inside. It's hot in here.
Geordi? Geordi? Lieutenant Yar in the Observation lounge. Send a team here now. Medical's been worried about you.
Help me. Help me to not to give in to the wild things coming into my mind,
Geordi, my job is security,
Tasha, please.
Alright. Alright, helping is more important. Geordi, how can I help you?
Help me to see. Like you do.
But you already see better than I can.
I see more. But more isn't better.
Geordi, please put
I want to see in shallow, dim, beautiful human ways.
We'll talk about it, Geordi. Right now I'm going to take you to Sickbay. All right?
Yeah.
Okay. Good.
And then we got him down to Sickbay so Doctor Crusher could examine him.
He wasn't violent?
No, sir. He was very upset. He kept talking about wanting normal vision.
Thank you, Lieutenant.
According to our medical readouts, there's still nothing wrong with him. He looks like he's running a temperature but every instrument we have says he's not.
Doctor, every person on that ship over there died. Is there any chance that whatever did it is loose on my ship?
If you mean a disease, sir, I'd say there's no chance of it. We used full decontamination, we examined every team member very carefully,
The entire crew somehow managed to kill themselves, Doctor. If it's not a disease, what else could have made them do that?
The obvious alternatives would be in areas of insanity and severe emotional upset. Troi, do you feel anything unusual in the lieutenant?
Security just told me that he was longing for normal eyesight. That's a sudden yearning for that.
Since his records show no previous mention of that, the fact that it's happened now could be important. But all I sense from him is confusion. If I didn't know better, I'd say he was intoxicated.
Our tests would have shown that. Also any other signs of drugs, hallucinogens or other contaminants.
Can you provide more information, sir? Seeking an instance of someone showering in his or her clothing is
I know. It's like looking for a needle in a haystack.
Why should anyone wish to expend his time in such a search?
Correction, Data, I should have said proverbial needle in a haystack.
Ah, a human proverb! As in folklore, or an historical allusion, or tribal memories
Historical. That's it. I remember I was reading a history of all the past starships named Enterprise.
Enterprise history. Aberrant behavior. Medical cross reference,
Captain, I believe we've have the answer to what happened over there.
The Constitution class Enterprise, Captain James T. Kirk commanding.
Similar conditions. They were monitoring a planet that was breaking up, not a collapsing star as in this case. But there were the same huge shifts in gravity,
Which somehow resulted in complex strings of water molecules which acquired carbon from the body and acted on the brain like alcohol. Data, download this information to Medical immediately.
Aye, sir. Downloading.
Fascinating! The entire crew going out of control,
Like intoxication, but worse. Judgment almost completely impaired,
Until they found this formula, barely in time. Picard to Doctor Crusher, come in.
This is Crusher. Go ahead Captain.
You can relax, Doctor.
The answer to all of this is feeding into your medical banks right now. Including a cure.
Are you certain, Captain?
Absolutely.
Tasha? What are you doing?
I need your advice. That's why I came to your quarters.
Of course. Anything I can do
On clothes. You always wear such beautiful clothes off duty. And your hair always looks so nice. I want to change my image. What do you think about this? Or this one?
It's not for you. Tasha, I feel you're very uncertain. Yhat you're fighting something.  What is it?
Never mind. I'll find what I need myself. Ship's stores will have it.
Tasha? Tasha, wait.
Troi to Captain Picard.
Picard here.
Sir, I think Tasha's been infected too.
She just left my quarters,
Counsellor, it's not actually an infection.
Yes, sir. It's more like an intoxication. Nut whatever it is, she's got it.
Thank you, Counsellor. Number One, it seems our Security Chief has the equivalent of a snootful.
Inquiry, sir. Snootful?
Forget it.
Hey, Mom, look what I can do.
I've been able to widen and strengthen the beam, just like I told you last night.
Do me a favour, Wes. There's something happening on this ship. Just to be safe, I'd like you to stay in our quarters until it's solved.
Sure, Mom, sure. Your wish is my command.
Now, Wes.
Okay, but you could be stunting my emotional growth, you realise that. Why is it so hot in here, anyway?
Picard to Crusher.
Crusher here.
Have you made a test injection yet? We're getting indications that this condition is spreading.
No test yet, Captain, but very soon.
Captain, another forty-one minutes will see the information from the Tsiolkovsky downloaded to us.
Why so slow?
Slow, sir? The Tsiolkovsky has been eight months in accumulating it.
How much danger from that star? Worse case.
Like a full collapse, sir? Any stellar material it threw this way we could still outrun on half impulse power.
Picard to Engineering. Chief Engineer report to the Bridge.
Assistant Chief Engineer Shimoda, report to Medical.
Hi, Jim. Was that the Captain sending you to Medical?
Which would leave no one on duty here. The Chief was just summoned to the Bridge.
What about me? I could call the Chief on the Bridge if anything happened.
Reporting as ordered, sir.
What?
You ordered me to report to the Bridge, sir.
I did no such thing. I want you down in the Engine room just in case we need to move out of here.
Attention all decks, all divisions. Effective immediately, I have handed over control of this vessel to Acting Captain Wesley Crusher.
Acting Captain?
Thank you, Captain Picard, thank you. And with that order dawns a brave new day for the Enterprise.
Captain's log, Stardate 41209.3. The strange contaminant that led to the deaths of the Tsiolkovsky crew is now aboard the Enterprise and our Engineering section has been commandeered by young Wesley Crusher.
And henceforth, a dessert course shall precede and follow every meal. Including breakfast.
Hurray for the acting Captain!
Never got as far as Sickbay, Wes. I feel too good for that.
Incredible. How did you do that?
Hooked my model tractor beam into ship's power. Now its a repulser beam too. Want in?
Swear to be faithful to you, Captain.
Number One, MacDougal, get that boy out of Engineering.
Sir, I'm getting very strange reports from all decks.
Such as?
Such as the ship's Training Division ordering all officers to attend a lecture on metaphysics.
Metaphysics?
Confirmed, sir. And there was a rather peculiar limerick being delivered by someone in the Shuttlecraft bay. I am not sure I understand it. There was a young lady from Venus whose body was shaped like
Captain to Security, come in!
Did I say something wrong?
I don't understand their humour either.
Yeah, Captain?
Where is my security chief! Get me Lieutenant Yar.
Keep your britches on.
Captain Picard.
Lieutenant, where are you?
I'm in my quarters, and I'm pretty busy right at the moment, Jean-Luc.
All right, Lieutenant, you just stay right there. Data, please go to Lieutenant Yar and take her down to Sickbay.
Yes, sir.
Captain to Security, I want all your senior supervisors to report to the Bridge immediately.
Lieutenant Yar?
Here, Data. You wanted me?
Captain Picard ordered me to escort you to Sickbay, Lieutenant.
Did he say when?
I am sure he meant now. So, you need time to get into uniform.
But I got out of uniform for you, Data. Do you know how old I was when I was abandoned?
Chronological age? No, I am afraid I am not familiar with
Five. Five years old, but I survived. I learned how to stay alive, how to avoid the rape gangs. I was fifteen before I escaped.
I am sorry. I did not know,
And what I want now is gentleness. And joy. And love. From you, Data. You are fully functional, aren't you?
Of course, but
How fully?
In every way, of course. I am programmed in multiple techniques, a broad variety of pleasuring,
Oh, you jewel! That's exactly what I hoped.
What have you learned, Number One?
Captain, the ship's engines are cut off from the bridge. The Assistant Chief Engineer pulled out the isolinear optical chips from command. All engines are offline. Wesley has hooked some kind of tractor beam to ship's power and he has it aimed at the door. We can't get past to get at the computer.
Can you short out the power?
Yes, I can. But it's going to take some time.
Do it!
Bill. RIKER Deanna, what?
So many minds on this ship, all free. Released,
Deanna.
I can feel them all. What they want, what they feel. It's a side of humans I've never felt before.
Come on, I'm getting you to Sickbay.
Wouldn't you rather be alone with me? With me in your mind?
The medical records we found say this works almost instantly.
It's not fair, Doc. I've never seen a rainbow, sunset, sunrise. This is going to help me? Help me see like you?
Doctor Crusher?
Deanna needs your help.
The formula from the old Enterprise didn't work.
What?
This water-carbon complex may induce the same symptoms, but somehow it's different. Maybe it's mutated. But I've got to isolate it in order to analyse it,
We don't have that kind of time.
You brought Deanna in.
She's infected with
Then you touched her! Oh, God. And you touched me. Wait! I've got to quarantine you.
If I don't get the command computer back online soon, none of this, whatever this is, won't matter. We'll all be dead.
Captain's log, supplemental. It is no longer an inconvenient, childish prank. Young Wesley Crusher, admittedly a victim of the Tsiolkovsky infection, is now in control of my starship.
Wes, this is Captain Picard. Do you see me?
Yes sir?
You will now return control of this vessel to the Bridge where it belongs. At once.
I'm sorry, sir. Why don't you just tell me what you want done and I'll do it.
Because ship captains control their own vessels, young man!
But, sir, you don't do it yourself. You give the orders, but someone else does it. What's wrong with giving me the orders to do it?
Captain, getting unusual readings now from the dwarf star.
Stand by a moment on that. Wesley. Wes. Are you aware that you're acting strangely, that a kind of infection was brought over from the Tsiolkovsky which acts like intoxication?
Are you saying that's why I feel so so hot? So strange?
That's a very adult bit of reasoning, Wes,
So you mean I'm drunk! I feel strange, but also good.
Because, because you've lost the capacity for self-judgment. Now, alcohol does this, Wesley. But this contaminant we've brought back from the Tsiolkovsky does it even more so.
What would you do if you got your ship back?
Oh, it's very important I do, Wesley, because I must immediately lock a tractor beam onto the Tsiolkovsky, then tow it out of,
Tractor beams are my specialty, Skipper! I'll contact you when that's done. Wesley out!
Wesley! Wesley!
Conn, where are you headed?
Sir. The star. It's beginning to collapse.
What the hell is happening in Engineering?
Lock on. Lock on Tsiolkovsky.
Where's that sonic driver?
It's over there. Okay, let's see if this cuts out his tractor beam power.  Oh, come on.
Oh no! I must find the answer. I've got to find the answer.
Captain, tractor beam. We just locked onto the Tsiolkovsky.
Captain to. Wesley. Wesley Crusher, come in!
Ah, Data. At least you're functioning.
Fully, Captain.
Data, intoxication is a human condition. Your mind is different, it's not the same as
We are more alike than unlike, my dear Captain. I have pores. Humans have pores. I have fingerprints. Humans have fingerprints. My chemical nutrients are like your blood. If you prick me, do I not leak?
Doctor,
Captain, can I see you in your Ready Room? It's a private matter. No, actually it's an urgent one.
But. Damn it.
Now, Doctor
I believe I'm infected myself, Captain.
Do you know what the infection is? Come on, quickly.
Sorry. It is definitely like alcohol intoxication. The same lack of good judgment, For example, right now I find you extremely, extremely, Of course we haven't time for that sort of thing,
What sort of thing?
Oh God, would I love to show you.
Doctor, there must be a cure. Some formula, similar to the old one,
Damn it, damn it, Captain. My dear Captain.
You owe me something. You do realise that, don't you? I'm a woman. I haven't the comfort of a husband. A man.
Not now, Doctor. Please.
Bridge to Riker, Urgent.
Riker here.
Sir.
Sir, regret to inform you that the Captain appears to be infected. And Data.
Thank you, Lieutenant. I'm on my way. You'll have to handle this.
Are you saying you're going to handle that?
What we're seeing, sir, is a huge chunk of the star's surface blown away, heading for us.
Take us
Are you alright, sir?
Worf, you know what to do. Take us er
Take us out of here.
Right.
Controls are still offline, sir.
Override.
Same result, sir.
Wes, come in please.
Wesley Crusher, this is Riker. Come in.
This is urgent. Come in, please.
Engineering, urgent. We must have ship's power,
Those are control chips! Bridge from Engineering.
The star is still collapsing. We're directly in the path of
I can't help you, Bridge! Someone here has yanked out all the control chips.
It was an adult who did it!
Sir, I estimate fourteen minutes until that mass gets here.
No way, sir. I cannot replace these chips in fourteen minutes. Two hours, three
Maybe.
Data could assemble them back faster.
What, what's that? What's that, Wesley?
Well, they're just simple isolinear chips, sir, to Data anyway. He can shuffle them like cards.
Come on, Data, hurry.
Ship's log, First Officer Riker. Enterprise will be destroyed unless it can be moved out of the path of the star material hurtling toward us. Our only hope is for Lieutenant Commander Data, in the time we have left, to regain his senses and reconnect engine power to the Bridge.
Nice to see you, Wesley.
Hi, Mister Data.
No time for courtesy. Get the damned control chips back in place, in the correct order. Now!
It's like a game. How fast can you do it?
Ah, a game!
I think I can switch this to main viewer, sir,
Data, we've got eight or nine minutes at most. Can you finish by then?
No, this will take slightly more time than we have, sir.
Damn it, no. I can't afford to get this.
Beverly.
Yes, Jean-Luc?
You will address me as Captain.
Captain? Well then, my dear Captain, you will address me as Chief Medical Officer or Doctor.
I will? That's true. I started off calling you Beverly, and of course, naturally, you. I'm still not thinking straight.
Likewise. Where the hell was I headed?
If that's something you were going to test,
Yes, on Geordi. Come here.
See how I reversed the fields on this, Commander? I made it into a repulser beam.
If we just had one minute more, sir,
If this were a hundred times more powerful than it is. Why not try it with the real thing? Why not reverse fields on this, Ma'am? If we just need an extra minute,
It would take weeks of laying out new circuits.
Why not just see it in your head? Come off the main lead, split off at the force activator, then, then. If I could just think straight about this,
I made this a broader based remedy. I hope. But it's still close to the formula from the old Enterprise records.
Decades ago, light years away,
But almost exactly the same conditions as here.
Wow! What was in that, Doctor? My head's beginning to clear,
Come here.  Here, take this to Engineering. I'll make up more hypos for the others.
Okay, Bev.
We're not going to make it, Captain. If we had just a minute or so.
Then reversing power leads, back through the force activator. Repulser beam hard against Tsiolkovsky. Don't you see? It's giving us a push off. The extra time we need.
We're pushing away.
Bridge, engage engines!
Captain , something seemed to move us aside at the last minute.
Do we owe our thanks to Commander Data, sir?
Yes, and Wesley may have given us a few seconds, too.
Did he say Wesley? The boy?
He said Wesley.
It's only fair to mention Wesley in a log entry, sir.
Fair's fair. And let's credit his science teacher, too.
Congratulations, sir.
To many people.
Data. I'm only going to tell you this just once. It never happened.
I put it to you all. I think we shall end up with a fine crew, if we avoid temptation. So, Number One, let's go to our next job.
Aye, sir. Helm, prepare for warp three. Heading two hundred and ninety four mark thirty seven.
Warp three, heading two hundred and ninety four mark thirty seven, sir.
Engage.
Repulse shuttle has cleared docking bay three.
Open hailing frequencies.
Hailing frequencies opened.
Repulse, this is the Enterprise. We are getting underway.
Acknowledged, Enterprise. Transfer complete. Good luck on your mission.
And to you.
Give my regards to your Captain. Repulse out.
Shuttlebay is secure, sir.
Thank you, Mister Crusher. Make all preparations to get underway.
We're constructing the enclosure on cargo deck five.
Come.
The transfer's been complete. Doctor Pulaski is being shown to her quarters. We're ready to get underway.
Grand. Take a look at the containment module our Chief Engineer has designed.
Chief Engineer. It still has a nice ring to it.
Each of these units will have total environmental control. Gravity, temperature, atmosphere, light, all in a protective stasis field.
And these get put into the large containment unit.
Right. See, these modules will keep the specimens alive, but it's this large containment area that's going to keep us alive. Now, I have to go and replicate this five hundred and twelve times, which means I'll have to divert power from the warp engines to the replicator for a while.
How long will we be on impulse power?
A couple of hours. Can't be helped.
When we leave 'audet Nine, I'm going to need all the power you can slam into those warp engines.
You'll have it.
I'll relieve you at zero three zero zero.
Take us out of orbit, Mister Crusher. Set course for 'audet Nine.
Aye, sir. Course for 'audet Nine has been input.
Maximum impulse velocity.
Aye, sir.
Engage.
Engineering, this is Science One. I have just observed what appeared to be a random energy transference.
Where?
Aft. Outboard of the port nacelle.
Hold on, I'll check.
No, I show nothing here, Data.
Problem, Commander?
Possibility, sir. An unexplained power fluctuation.
Let me know if it reoccurs.
Aye, sir.
Captain's log, Stardate 42073.1. There has been an outbreak of an unclassified plasma plague in the Rachelis system. We are on an emergency run to collect specimens of the deadly plague and transport them to Science Station Tango Sierra, where hopefully an antidote can be produced.
How's it going?
Finished. Just waiting to insert the modules.
Number One.
Lieutenant La Forge says we will be able to engage the warp drive within the hour.
Grand. Mister Data, when we have a complete list of all the specimens we will be carrying, I want you and Doctor er,
Pulaski, sir.
Doctor Pulaski. I want you to go through them.
Aye, sir.
By the way, where is our new doctor? Has she reported in?
Not yet.
Sickbay, this is the captain.
Sickbay, aye.
Is Doctor Pulaski there?
Er, no, sir. The Doctor is in Ten forward.
Thank you.
Aye, sir.
A few hours on board and already she's found Ten forward.
I'll go get her.
No. I'll go.
Not the best way to meet your new Captain.
Deck ten, forward station one.
Hello, Captain.
Ensign. I'm sorry this mission will delay your reunion with your mother.
That's all right. That will give me the time to finish some projects I have to do. It's going to be hard leaving the Enterprise.
Mixed feelings for all of us. It's always difficult leaving any ship, just as it was for your mother
When she left to become head of Starfleet Medical. But going from one assignment to another is part of the life which you are choosing.
I know, but this isn't any ship.
How true.
Guinan.
Captain.
Where is Doctor Pulaski?  Thank you.
Doctor Katherine Pulaski?
Ah you must be Captain Picard.
Doctor, protocol may have been lax on your last assignment, but here on the Enterprise.
Sit down, Captain. You'd better listen to this.
Lieutenant La Forge, status report.
The containment area is completed, Captain, and the last of the modules are being inserted.
Take us to warp six as soon as possible.
Acknowledged.
This is Doctor Katherine Pulaski. We will handle the formal introduction later. Counsellor Deanna Troi is pregnant. She is going to have a baby.
Baby? This is a surprise.
More so for me.
This pregnancy is unlike anything I have ever encountered. Since she came to me a few hours ago, I have done two complete examinations of Counsellor Troi.  This is from the first examination. The foetus is about halfway through the first trimester, about six weeks old. Now, understand we believe conception took place eleven hours ago.
What?
It gets better. This is the second exam one hour later. Now, it's consistent, except for the fact that it appears the foetus is several weeks older. At this growth rate, Counsellor Troi will have her baby in about thirty six hours. The normal gestation rate for a Betazoid is ten months.
I don't mean to be indelicate, but who's the father?
Last night, while I slept, something which I can only describe as a presence, entered my body.
A life form of unknown origin and intent is breeding right now inside Counsellor Troi. Our purpose here is to determine what is to be done about this very unusual situation. Discussion.
No, wait. Let me get this straight. Deanna was impregnated by by what? Doctor, what do the tests show? Is it a humanoid? An alien?
It's a male human, or in this case half-human half-Betazoid.
Exactly the same as Deanna.
In every way. In fact, there is nothing to indicate that there are any genetic patterns other than hers.
I don't think this is a random occurrence. I think there's a purpose here. A reason. What, I don't know.
Captain, obviously the pregnancy must be terminated for the safety of the ship and crew.
Worf, you can't assume the intent was belligerent.
That is the safest assumption.
Captain, this is a life form. Not to allow it to develop naturally would deny us the opportunity to study it.
If the foetus is aborted, laboratory analysis is still possible.
Doctor, is there any health risk to Counsellor Troi if the foetus is aborted?
Captain, do whatever you feel is necessary to protect the ship and the crew, but know this. I'm going to have this baby.
Then it seems that the discussion is over.
Captain's log, supplemental. We have finally arrived at 'audet Nine, where we will pick up the specimens of plasma plague for transport to Rachelis. It is only because so many lives are at stake that I am willing to put this ship and crew at such great risk. Meanwhile, Counsellor Troi's pregnancy continues to progress at an astonishing rate.
How are you feeling?
I should be feeling uncomfortable with all the changes in my body but, I don't. I feel fine. Better than fine. Wonderful.
Standard orbit.
Standard orbit, sir.
Open hailing frequencies.
Hailing frequencies open.
'Audet Nine, this is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the USS Enterprise.
Ah, the Enterprise, here at last. Well, good. Let's get going.
Excuse me, to whom am I speaking?
To whom are you speaking? Oh I'm Lieutenant Commander Hester Dealt, Medical Trustee, Federation Medical Collection Station.
Are the specimens ready for transfer?
Yes, but with your permission I would like to inspect the containment area before we proceed. Now it's not that I doubt the ability of your crew, but we cannot afford a mistake.
I appreciate your caution. In the like vein, I want a complete, detailed manifest of everything you intend to bring on board my ship.
Very good. I will allow access you to my computer banks, okay?
Mister Data, download the inventory and cross-reference it with the medical computer. Number One, arrange to have Hester Dealt transported up.
Captain's log, supplemental. Although it's been fourteen hours since we arrived at 'audet Nine. Hester Dealt has still not completed inspection of the containment unit. A transfer will not be permitted until he's assured of zero growth during our voyage. Meanwhile, the desperate pleas from the Rachelis System continue.
Captain, the final manifest has been received.
At last. Review it with Doctor Pulaski. I want you both to be completely familiar with it.
Aye, sir.
Data, will you help me get to Sickbay.
It's time.
Oh, you bet it is. Let's get you to Maternity.
Worf, assemble your security team in Sickbay.
